IMPROVING  CONSUMER  PROTECTION  IN  THE 

PREPAID  CALLING  CARD  MARKET 

S.  HRG.  110–1218 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

SECOND  SESSION 

SEPTEMBER  10,  2008 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

80–091 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2013 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

SECOND  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas,  Ranking 
TED  STEVENS,  Alaska 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 
ROGER  F.  WICKER,  Mississippi 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

PAUL NAGLE,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on September 10, 2008  .....................................................................
Statement of Senator Hutchison  ............................................................................
Statement of Senator Nelson  ..................................................................................
Statement of Senator Pryor  ....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Thune  ...................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Acampora, Hon. Patricia L., Commissioner, Public Service Commission, State 
of  New  York;  Member,  Committee  on  Consumer  Affairs,  National  Associa-
tion of Regulatory Utility Commissioners  ..........................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Engel, Hon. Eliot L., U.S. Representative from New York  ..................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Greenberg, Sally, Executive Director, National Consumers League  ...................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Kovacic, Hon. William E., Chairman, Federal Trade Commission  ......................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
West, Gus K., President and Chairman of the Board, The Hispanic Institute  ..
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

O’Brien, Rosemary G., President, Military Marketing LLC 

APPENDIX 

Submission of Mark E. Budnitz, J.D., Professor of Law, Georgia State Univer-
sity,  Martina  Rojo  and  Julia  Marblue,  entitled,  ‘‘Deceptive  Claims  for  Pre-
paid  Telephone  Cards  and  the  Need  for  Regulation,’’  Loyola  Consumer 
Law Review, 2006  .................................................................................................

Page 
1 
1 
1 
46 
48 

35 
36 
6 
8 
21 
22 
15 
9 
33 
33 
27 
28 

55 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

IMPROVING  CONSUMER  PROTECTION  IN  THE 

PREPAID  CALLING  CARD  MARKET 

WEDNESDAY,  SEPTEMBER  10,  2008 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

Washington, DC. 

The Committee met, pursuant to notice, at 10 a.m., in room SR– 

253, Russell Senate Office Building, Hon. Bill Nelson, presiding. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. BILL NELSON, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM FLORIDA 

Senator NELSON. Good morning. The meeting will come to order. 
And  as  a  nod  to  our  distinguished  Senator  from  Texas  who  has 
another  important  appointment,  I  want  to  yield  to  her  to  please 
make an opening statement. 

STATEMENT OF HON. KAY BAILEY HUTCHISON, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM TEXAS 

Senator HUTCHISON. Mr. Chairman, thank you so much. 
I  really  appreciate  your  letting  me  go  first,  and  I  just  want  to 

make a brief statement. 

First of all, I will cosponsor your bill. I think it is very important 
that  we  have  the  ability  to  establish  a  standard  and  it  is  kind  of 
a  clear,  easy  bar  to  clear  that  whatever  is  on  a  card  should  be  on 
a  card.  And  we  have  had  trouble  in  my  home  State  of  Texas  and 
the  Attorney  General  has  even  filed  a  lawsuit  against  a  company 
that was found not to have produced the correct number of minutes 
for what was promised. And I think it particularly preys on people 
who  perhaps  do  not  speak  English  or  elderly  people,  people  who 
use these cards in good faith. 

So  I  think  we  need  to  take  action,  and  I  really  appreciate  the 
leadership that you are showing. And I will look forward to reading 
the  testimony  from  the  Chairman  and  look  forward  to  working 
through this so that there is a standard that Americans or anyone 
buying a card can rely on. 

Thank you very much. And thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator  NELSON.  And  I  want  to  thank  the  Senator  from  Texas 
for her leadership also with regard to our Space Subcommittee. We 
have a real challenge, as she well knows, in trying to get little old 
NASA  back  on  track.  And  now  with  insurgent  and  resurgent  Rus-
sia,  how  can  we  continue  to  rely  on  the  Russians  to  get  to  the 
International  Space  Station,  which  is  a  national  laboratory  thanks 
to the Senator from Texas, for a 5- or 6- or 7-year period? 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

2 

And  this  is  one  of  the  most  mismanaged  programs  that  we  have 
ever  seen.  It  has  put  us  in  this  terrible  circumstance  of  having 
built  and  paid  $100  billion  for  a  national  lab  that  is  an  Inter-
national  Space  Station,  and  come  2011,  we  may  not  even  be  able 
to  get  to  it.  The  Russians  would  have  total  control  of  it,  and  who 
knows, they might decide to form a joint partnership with the Chi-
nese and take advantage of our $100 billion. 

Senator  HUTCHISON.  Mr.  Chairman,  I  think  we  need  to  take  a 
very strong action because the possibilities I think have been clari-
fied  even  in  the  last  2  months  that  Russia  may  not  be  a  reliable 
partner for us to use. And I think we should step up the efforts to 
get  the  Crew  Return  Vehicle  moved  up.  And  then  I  think  we  need 
to  extend  our  shuttle  missions  to  finish  out  the  Space  Station  so 
that  it  can  do  the  most  good  for  us  in  energy  research,  as  well  as 
the other research that’s being done there. I think that it will take 
a  very  bold  action,  and  I  think  we  should  start  that  effort  right 
now. 

Senator  NELSON.  Well,  I  am  going  to  need  the  Senator  from 
Texas’  help  because  we  want  to  put  all  of  this  in  the  NASA  reau-
thorization bill, but we are having difficulty with a certain Senator 
from South Carolina. And I need the Senator’s help. 

Senator  HUTCHISON.  I  was  not  aware  that  we  had  a  problem  in 

South Carolina, but I am certainly willing to discuss that. 

So  that  this  wonderful  conversation  we  are  having  is  relevant, 

we all want to have calling cards that can take us to Mars. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator NELSON. And I thank the Senator. 
Well,  let  us  come  back  down  to  Earth.  We  have  got  all  kinds  of 
skullduggery  going  on  here  that  we  need  to  attack.  It  has  to  do 
with  prepaid  calling  cards  which  are  used  by  millions  of  folks  and 
they  buy  these  cards  to  stay  in  touch  with  their  loved  ones.  It  is 
a  simple,  little  card.  They  buy  these  and  they  can  call  their  loved 
ones  around  the  country,  around  the  world.  It  is  particularly  help-
ful  to  military  members,  seniors,  immigrants,  and  low  income 
Americans. With limited financial resources, these things become a 
lifeline to their family and their friends. 

But  what  we  have  seen  is  a  number  of  unscrupulous  providers 
that  are  now  operating  in  the  market.  And  basically  what  it  is  is 
deception. 

Now, most of the calling cards are from large, well-known compa-
nies  offering  these  prepaid  cards  at  good  rates  and  conditions  that 
are  fair  and  reasonable.  That  is  most  of  it.  But  as  is  the  case  in 
many things, we have people that are taking advantage of the sys-
tem, and so that is now spilling over into the good companies that 
are fair and reasonable and their reputation is on the line. 

Unlike  a  legitimate  prepaid  calling  card,  the  fly-by-night  opera-
tors increasingly are not interested in the welfare of the Americans 
buying the calling cards trying to connect with their loved ones. In-
stead, what they are doing is scamming consumers. And what they 
end  up  doing  is  imposing  junk  fees,  exorbitant  rates,  selling  cards 
that  expire  shortly  and,  in  some  cases,  start  expiring  right  when 
the consumer starts using the card. 

Now,  I  want  to  give  you  two  examples.  Here  is  one.  It  is  two 
bucks.  It  is  marketed  to  people  as  if  you  can  use  this  for  $2  worth 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

3 

of  calling.  But  you  see  that  little  red  circle  up  there?  That  is  what 
is  on  this  card.  Now,  I  could  get  a  magnifying  glass  and  I  might 
be  able  to  read  this.  I  can  tell  you  with  my  eyes,  even  with  my 
magnifiers, it is hard for me to read this. 

Senator  NELSON.  And  would  you  flip  it  over  to  the  next  chart? 
Let  us  give  you  an  example  of  some  of  the  things  that  are  in  that 
small  type.  Now,  this  is  blown  up  and  bolded  and  underlined  so 
that  you  all  can  see  it.  This,  obviously,  is  not  in  that  small  little 
writing there. ‘‘Rates and fees vary and are subject to change with-
out  prior  notice.  Advertised  minutes  and  rates  are  based  on  a  sin-
gle, non-pay phone call from the contiguous United States.’’ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.

2
D
R
A
C
0
1
9

.

s
p
e
1
D
R
A
C
0
1
9

4 

Congressman, just have a seat there at the table and we will get 

to you in a second. 

‘‘Succeeding  calls  are  billed  at  a  higher  rate.  Calls  are  billed  in 
3-minute increments.’’ So if the calling person calls and they get an 
answering machine and they take all of 30 seconds, it is still billed 
at  3  minutes.  ‘‘A  post-call  service  fee  of  40  percent  and  a  hang-up 
fee of 99 cents apply per call.’’ Now, that’s just that one. 

Flip it over to the next one. Is this on the same card? This is on 
the  Africa  Card  or  the  Go  Card?  This  is  on  this  one.  This  is  the 
Go Card. 

‘‘A  semi-monthly  charge  of  up  to  89  cents  applies  to  24  hours  of 
first  use.  Card  expires  180  days  after  the  date  of  first  use.  Stand-
ard off-peak hours are from 2 a.m. to 4 a.m.—— 

[Laughter.] 
Senator NELSON.—‘‘weekdays, excluding holidays.’’ 
Can you flip it to the next one? 
Now, this is a card that is aimed at immigrants so that they can 
call  their  loved  ones  in  Africa.  Look  down  at  the  bottom.  Can  you 
lift  it  up  there?  Down  at  the  bottom,  it  is  so  small  on  this  blowup 
I  cannot  read  it,  much  less  can  I  read  it  on  that.  And  that’s  the 
card. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

.

s
p
e
3
D
R
A
C
0
1
9

5 

Senator  NELSON.  And  what  that  says  is:  ‘‘Call  time  is  deducted 
in 1- to 3-minute increments. Service fees of up to 25 percent apply. 
A  disconnect  fee  up  to  98  cents  may  apply.  A  weekly  maintenance 
fee  of  69  cents  may  apply.’’  This  is  for  a  $5  card.  ‘‘Card  expires  3 
months from first use or 2 years from purchase.’’ 

Senator NELSON. You got any more up there? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.

5
D
R
A
C
0
1
9

.

s
p
e
4
D
R
A
C
0
1
9

6 

OK. You see the problem. 
So  I  hope  we  can  hear  some  testimony  on  this  subject  and  try 
to expose it. You might think that the language might tell you how 
much  it  costs  to  make  a  domestic  or  international  call,  but  it  does 
not.  And  instead,  we  have  a  bunch  of  statements  telling  you  how 
the card will not work and listing numerous add-on fees and cave-
ats, all of which we have just gone over and which you cannot read 
on  the  card.  If  you  can  read  the  King’s  English,  you  better  have  a 
microscope.  Otherwise,  you  are  not  going  to  be  able  to  understand 
what you have just bought for $2 or $5. 

So  the  bottom  line  is  if  you  use  that  card  twice,  you  lose  it.  You 
lose the value of the card. And you may lose it just by using it once 
with all those add-ons. 

So  with  that  as  an  intro,  I  want  to  call  on  the  Honorable  Eliot 
Engel,  Congressman  from  New  York,  who  wants  to  make  a  state-
ment.  And  Congressman,  we  understand  that—was  it  Delta  or  the 
US Air Shuttle that was late? 

Representative ENGEL. It was Delta. 
Senator NELSON. OK. Duly noted in the record. 
Representative ENGEL. The truth is US Air probably would have 

been even later, but that is OK. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator NELSON. Give us a quick statement. We have pretty well 
laid  it  out.  Senator  Hutchison  was  here  and  I  have  laid  it  out.  We 
want your endorsement and your observation on this. 
STATEMENT OF HON. ELIOT L. ENGEL, 
U.S. REPRESENTATIVE FROM NEW YORK 

Representative ENGEL. Well, thank you, Senator. 
As you have been stating, legislation of this kind should be a no- 
brainer.  I  mean,  it  is  just  crying  out  for  attention,  and  it  is  some-
thing that everybody can agree on. 

And I want to thank you and the Ranking Member Hutchison for 
holding  today’s  hearing  and  for  the  invitation  to  speak.  I  know, 
Senator, you have done lots of work on this issue. 

I must comment that you have certainly come a long ways since 
we  were  House  colleagues  together,  and  I  am  always  happy  to  see 
my good friends in the House move on to the Senate and do really 
great  work.  And  that  is  especially  true  of  the  work  that  you  have 
done.  I  am  always  pleased  to  have  your  cooperation  and  your 
friendship. 

I  am  here  to  discuss  my  legislation,  the  Calling  Card  Consumer 
Protection  Act,  and  the  reasons  that  I  introduced  this  bill.  I  think 
that  you  have  made  it  very  clear  as  to  why  we  have  introduced 
bills like this and why it is needed. 

Obviously,  calling  cards  are  an  invaluable  resource  for  people 
who  do  not  have  long  distance  telephone  service  in  their  home  or 
those  who  make  frequent  overseas  calls.  Common  users  of  these 
cards are students, members of the armed forces, and those whose 
family  lives  outside  of  the  country.  They  are  also  popular  among 
people  who  either  choose  not  to  subscribe  to  long  distance  tele-
phone service or who simply cannot afford it. They are a necessary 
tool  for  keeping  in  touch  with  friends  or  family  members.  Calling 
cards  that  provide  the  services  that  the  companies  advertise  can 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

7 

save  consumers  a  great  deal  of  money  when  they  call  home.  But, 
unfortunately, as you have pointed out, Senator, and we are seeing 
over  and  over  again,  many  companies  fail  to  keep  their  advertised 
terms or hide them. 

About  2  years  ago,  I  started  hearing  from  a  number  of  constitu-
ents  regarding  their  prepaid  calling  cards.  They  were  contacting 
me  because  their  calling  cards  were  not  providing  the  number  of 
minutes that were advertised. In fact, many were not even close to 
delivering the promised number of minutes. Furthermore, when my 
constituents  attempted  to  contact  the  calling  card  company,  they 
found it difficult or impossible to reach a customer service line. 

I  investigated  this  myself  by  purchasing  a  calling  card.  I  found 
the  same  problem  that  my  constituents  were  having.  This  is  when 
I  decided  to  introduce  my  legislation  with  Congressman  Mike  Fer-
guson of New Jersey to ban these practices. 

In independent tests, as well as those conducted by States Attor-
neys  General—and  I  know  Florida  has  done  a  lot  in  this  regard— 
calling  cards  were  shown  to  provide  far  fewer  minutes  than  they 
advertised.  One  study  by  The  Hispanic  Institute  found  that  on  av-
erage the caller only received about 60 percent of the minutes guar-
anteed  by  the  card.  In  a  $4  billion  a  year  industry,  obviously  this 
deception  is  costing  consumers  and  honest  companies  hundreds  of 
millions  of  dollars  every  year,  and  of  course,  these  companies  prey 
on  minority  communities,  communities  that  do  not  speak  English 
well. This is especially prevalent in those communities. 

Companies  have  also  instituted  a  variety  of  hidden  fees.  For  ex-
ample, some cards deduct minutes even if the call is not connected 
or  if  you  get  a  busy  signal.  Other  cards  cut  off  the  call  after  a  few 
minutes so the consumer must redial and again be subjected to the 
connection  charge.  And  the  connection  charge  is  obviously  on  top 
of the regular charge, and so people find that it might take 5 min-
utes  or  10  minutes  away  just  for  a  connection.  Some  cards  round 
up the number of minutes used in 4-minute increments. Others ad-
vertise  no  connection  fees  in  big  letters  on  a  sign,  but  instead 
charge  you  a  hang-up  fee.  These  fees  take  considerable  money  out 
of consumers’ pockets every time they pick up the phone. 

Obviously,  calling  card  fraud  harms  segments  of  the  population 
who are among the most vulnerable to being victimized by unscru-
pulous  companies  only  seeking  to  make  a  quick  profit.  These  un-
scrupulous  companies  are  known  to  target  poor,  minority,  and  im-
migrant populations, and they do not stop there. Even our soldiers 
in  Iraq  have  been  preyed  upon  by  deceptive  practices  of  calling 
card companies. 

In a recent article in BusinessWeek magazine, the author detailed 
one  example  of  a  company  that  marketed  towards  Spanish-speak-
ing  consumers,  but  the  fine  print  that  detailed  all  the  various  fees 
they would charge the user was in English. The company’s answer 
to  this?  We  are  in  America,  they  said.  They  had  the  temerity  to 
claim that even when they put Spanish language advertisements in 
markets  with  Spanish-speaking  consumers,  they  can  hide  all  their 
fees in English. 

My  legislation,  like  yours,  Senator  Nelson,  would  put  a  stop  to 
a  number  of  deceptive  practices  employed  by  these  companies.  It 
would  require  an  advertisement  or  packaging  to  include  clear  dis-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

8 

closure  of  all  terms,  conditions,  and  fees  in  the  language  in  which 
the calling card is advertised. In addition, it would ensure that the 
Federal  Trade  Commission  has  the  jurisdiction  to  pursue  enforce-
ment  of  these  rules  against  companies  who  are  not  abiding  by 
them. 

Calling cards can be extremely useful for consumers, and I do not 
want  to  see  honest  companies  punished  and  there  are,  obviously, 
a lot of honest companies. But the honest companies are also being 
harmed  by  these  dishonest  companies.  There  is  a  large  enough 
market for a company to live up to its promises and to turn an hon-
est profit. If consumers know that the card they purchase will pro-
vide  the  full  amount  of  calling  time  that  is  advertised,  this  will 
benefit both consumers and the marketplace. 

So  I,  in  conclusion,  would  strongly  encourage  the  Members  of 
this  Committee  to  support  S.  2998,  Senator  Nelson’s  legislation  to 
protect  consumers  from  calling  card  fraud.  With  only  a  few  weeks 
remaining in the 110th Congress, our constituents should not have 
to wait for Congress to reconvene in 2009 for action on this impor-
tant legislation. 

Once  again,  Senator,  thank  you  for  holding  this  hearing  today 

and allowing me to testify. 

[The prepared statement of Representative Engel follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. ELIOT L. ENGEL, 

U.S. REPRESENTATIVE FROM NEW YORK 

Chairman Inouye, Ranking Member Hutchison: 
I  want  to  thank  you  for  holding  today’s  hearing  and  for  the  invitation  to  speak 
on this important topic. I especially want to thank Senator Bill Nelson for his work 
on this issue. I have collaborated with Senator Nelson in the past, and I am always 
pleased to have his cooperation and his friendship. 

I  am  here  to  discuss  my  legislation,  the  Calling  Card  Consumer  Protection  Act, 

and the reasons that I introduced the bill. 

Calling  cards  are  an  invaluable  resource  for  people  who  don’t  have  long  distance 
telephone service in their home or those who make frequent overseas calls. Common 
users are students, members of the Armed Forces, and those whose family lives out-
side  of  the  country.  They  are  also  popular  among  people  who  either  choose  not  to 
subscribe to long distance telephone service, or who cannot afford it. They are a nec-
essary tool for keeping in touch with friends or family members. Calling cards that 
provide  the  services  that  the  companies  advertise  can  save  consumers  a  great  deal 
of money when they call home. 

Unfortunately, as we are seeing over and over again, many companies fail to keep 

their advertised terms. 

About 2 years ago, I began hearing from a number of constituents regarding their 
prepaid calling cards. They were contacting me because their calling cards failed to 
provide  the  number  of  minutes  that  were  advertised.  In  fact,  many  were  not  even 
close  to  delivering  the  promised  number  of  minutes.  Furthermore,  when  my  con-
stituents  attempted  to  contact  the  calling  card  company,  they  found  it  difficult  or 
impossible to reach a customer service line. 

I investigated this myself by purchasing a calling card. I found the same problems 
that  my  constituents  were  having.  This  is  when  I  decided  to  introduce  my  legisla-
tion, with Congressman Mike Ferguson, to ban these practices. 

In  independent  tests,  as  well  as  those  conducted  by  states’  Attorneys  General, 
calling  cards  were  shown  to  provide  far  fewer  minutes  than  were  advertised.  One 
study  by  The  Hispanic  Institute  found  that  on  average,  the  caller  only  received  an 
average of 60 percent of the minutes guaranteed by the card. In a $4 billion a year 
industry, this deception is costing consumers and honest companies hundreds of mil-
lions of dollars every year. 

Companies have also instituted a variety of hidden fees. For example, some cards 
deduct  minutes  even  if  the  call  is  not  connected.  Other  cards  cut  off  the  call  after 
a few minutes so the consumer must redial and again be subjected to the connection 
charge.  Some  cards  round  up  the  number  of  minutes  used  in  4  minute  increments. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

9 

Others  advertise  ‘‘no  connection  fees,’’  in  big  letters  on  a  sign,  but  instead  charge 
you  a  hang-up  fee.  These  fees  take  considerable  money  out  of  consumers’  pockets 
every time they pick up the phone. 

Calling  card  fraud  harms  segments  of  the  population  who  are  among  the  most 
vulnerable  to  being  victimized  by  unscrupulous  companies  only  seeking  to  make  a 
quick profit. These unscrupulous companies are known to target poor, minority, and 
immigrant  populations.  And  they  don’t  stop  there.  Even  our  soldiers  in  Iraq  have 
been preyed upon by deceptive practices of calling card companies. 

In  a  recent  article  in  BusinessWeek  magazine,  the  author  detailed  one  example 
of a company that marketed toward Spanish-speaking consumers. But the fine print 
that  detailed  all  the  various  fees  they  would  charge  the  user  was  in  English.  The 
company’s  answer  to  this?  ‘‘We’re  in  America,’’  they  said.  They  had  the  temerity  to 
claim  that  even  when  they  put  Spanish  language  advertisements  in  markets  with 
Spanish-speaking consumers, they can hide all their fees in English. 

My  legislation,  like  Senator  Nelson’s,  would  put  a  stop  to  a  number  of  deceptive 
practices employed by these companies. It would require an advertisement or pack-
aging  to  include  clear  disclosure  of  all  terms,  conditions,  and  fees  in  the  language 
in which the calling card is advertised. In addition, it would ensure that the Federal 
Trade Commission has the jurisdiction to pursue enforcement of these rules against 
companies who are not abiding by them. 

Calling cards are a useful product for consumers, and I do not want to see honest 
companies  punished.  There  is  absolutely  no  reason  why  a  company  can’t  deliver 
what  is  promised,  and  still  turn  an  honest  profit.  If  consumers  know  that  the  card 
they  purchase  will  provide  the  full  amount  of  calling  time  that  is  advertised,  this 
will benefit both consumers and the marketplace. 

I  would  strongly  encourage  the  Members  of  this  Committee  to  support  S.  2998, 
Senator Nelson’s legislation to protect consumers from calling card fraud. With only 
a  few  weeks  remaining  in  the  110th  Congress,  our  constituents  shouldn’t  have  to 
wait for Congress to reconvene in 2009 for action on this important legislation. 

Once again, thank you for holding this hearing today, and allowing me to testify. 

Senator NELSON. Thank you, Congressman. Thank you. 
You are welcome to stay. You can leave—whatever is your pleas-
ure. We are very grateful to you for having come over here and also 
for having introduced this legislation in the House. 

Representative ENGEL. Thank you very much. 
Senator  NELSON.  So  thank  you  and  good  luck  to  you  in  the 

House. 

We  are  pleased  to  have  William  Kovacic,  the  Chairman  of  the 
Federal Trade Commission. What I am going to do to truncate this 
hearing  is  we  are  going  to  take  your  written  testimony  and  enter 
it into the record. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Kovacic follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. WILLIAM E. KOVACIC, CHAIRMAN, 

FEDERAL TRADE COMMISSION 

I. Introduction 

Chairman  Inouye,  Ranking  Member  Hutchison,  Members  of  the  Committee  on 
Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation,  I  am  William  Kovacic,  Chairman  of  the 
Federal  Trade  Commission  (‘‘Commission’’  or  ‘‘FTC’’).1 Thank  you  for  giving  the 
Commission this opportunity to testify before the Committee about consumer protec-
tion issues associated with the sale of prepaid calling cards. 

The  Commission  appreciates  the  Committee’s  decision  to  hold  a  hearing  to  shed 
light  on  deceptive  practices  in  the  calling  card  industry.  Over  the  last  decade,  the 
prepaid  calling  card  industry  has  grown  into  a  multi-billion  dollar  a  year  industry. 
Prepaid calling cards can provide consumers with a convenient and inexpensive way 
to  call  friends  and  family  at  home  and  abroad.  Unfortunately,  however,  purchasers 
of  prepaid  calling  cards  often  do  not  receive  the  number  of  calling  minutes  adver-
tised  for  the  cards  they  purchase  and  are  charged  undisclosed  or  inadequately-dis-

1 The written statement presents the views of the Federal Trade Commission. Oral statements 
and  responses  to  questions  reflect  the  views  of  the  speaker  and  do  not  necessarily  reflect  the 
views of the Commission or any other Commissioner. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

10 

closed  fees  and  surcharges  that  reduce  the  value  of  the  prepaid  calling  cards  they 
purchased. 

As  the  Nation’s  consumer  protection  agency,  the  FTC  is  committed  to  protecting 
consumers  from  deceptive  marketing  of  prepaid  calling  cards.  The  FTC  recently 
brought two cases alleging that distributors of prepaid calling cards had been decep-
tively  marketing  such  cards.  The  Commission  also  has  other  active  prepaid  calling 
card investigations. 

This  statement  provides  the  Committee  with  background  information  about  the 
prepaid  calling  card  industry  and  describes  the  FTC’s  recent  law  enforcement  ac-
tions  against  distributors  of  prepaid  calling  cards.  It  also  discusses  the  FTC’s  con-
sumer  education  and  outreach  efforts.  Additionally,  it  offers  comments  on  S.  2998, 
the  ‘‘Prepaid  Calling  Card  Consumer  Protection  Act  of  2008,’’  introduced  by  Sen-
ators Bill Nelson, Olympia Snowe, John Kerry, and Mel Martinez. Finally, the Com-
mission  reiterates  its  support  for  the  provision  of  the  FTC  reauthorization  bill  that 
would  amend  the  FTC  Act  to  repeal  the  exemption  for  common  carriers  subject  to 
the  Communications  Act.  Repealing  the  exemption  for  telecommunications  carriers 
would  ensure  that  the  Commission  can  bring  law  enforcement  actions  against  all 
participants in the prepaid calling card industry that are engaging in deceptive and 
unfair  practices,  including  those  companies  that  provide  the  underlying  tele-
communications services for these cards. 
II. Background 

Calling  card  providers  market  their  cards  for  a  variety  of  uses.  Some  cards  are 
marketed  primarily  for  use  by  consumers  making  calls  within  the  United  States. 
Such cards usually offer consumers the ability to make domestic long distance calls 
for  pennies  per  minute.  Other  cards  are  marketed  to  U.S.  consumers  who  want  to 
call  the  United  States  when  they  are  traveling  or  working  in  other  countries.  In-
deed, many such cards are marketed to members of the United States armed forces 
serving around the world. In addition, a substantial number of prepaid calling cards 
are  sold  to  recent  immigrants  to  the  United  States  who  depend  on  calling  cards  to 
stay  in  touch  with  family  and  friends  abroad.2 Such  calling  cards,  which  typically 
retail for between $2 to $10 each, are generally sold in small retail outlets, including 
grocery and convenience stores, gasoline stations, and newsstands. 

To  advertise  prepaid  calling  cards  directed  to  consumers  making  international 
calls from the U.S., companies distribute eye-catching posters that are displayed on 
the  walls  and  windows  of  the  stores  where  such  cards  are  sold.  One  hallmark  of 
such posters is bold claims, made in large, colorful type, about the number of calling 
minutes  the  advertised  cards  provide  for  calls  to  particular  countries.  In  stark  con-
trast  to  the  claims  about  available  calling  minutes  that  dominate  the  posters,  the 
bottom  of  the  posters  generally  contains  small  print  disclaimers  about  a  wide  vari-
ety  of  fees  and  surcharges  that  reduce  the  value  of  the  cards.  The  disclaimers  are 
frequently  in  type  so  small  as  to  be  nearly  illegible  and  in  language  so  vague  as 
to be effectively incomprehensible.3 

Consumers typically use their prepaid calling cards as follows: the consumer dials 
an  ‘‘access  number’’  printed  on  the  back  of  the  card.  A  recorded  message  then 
prompts the consumer to enter the card’s authorization code or Personal Identifica-
tion  Number  (‘‘PIN’’),  which  is  printed  on  the  card.  Next,  the  consumer  usually 
hears  an  announcement  of  the  monetary  value  of  the  card.  The  consumer  then  en-

2 See Susan Sachs, Immigrants See Path to Riches in Phone Cards, N.Y. TIMES, Aug. 11, 2002, 
available  at  http://query.nytimes.com/gst/fullpage.html?res=9800E7D6123AF932A2575BC0A9 
649C8B63&sec=&spon=&pagewanted=2; Talk Isn’t So Cheap on a Phone Card, BUSINESS WEEK, 
July  23,  2007,  available  at  http://www.businessweek.com/magazine/content/07l30/b4043 
079.htm; Mark E. Budnitz, Martina Rojo and Julia Marlowe, Deceptive Claims for Prepaid Tele-
phone Cards and the Need for Regulation, 19 LOYOLA CONSUMER L. REV. 1 (2006). 

3 For example, in FTC v. Alternatel, Inc., G.F.G. Enterprises LLC, also d/b/a Mystic Prepaid, 
Voice  Prepaid,  Inc.,  Voice  Distributors,  Inc.,  Telecom  Express,  Inc.,  Lucas  Friedlaender,  Moses 
Greenfield,  Nickolas  Gulakos,  and  Frank  Wendorff,  08–21433–CIV–Jordan/McAliley  (S.D.  Fla.), 
the  FTC  has  alleged  in  its  complaint  that:  ‘‘in  numerous  instances  defendants’  posters  contain 
vague  disclosures  about  fees  in  tiny  font  on  the  bottom  of  the  poster,  stating  in  relevant  part: 
by using this card you agree to the following: Prompted minutes are before applicable charges 
and  fees,  application  of  surcharges  and  fees  have  an  effect  of  reducing  total  minutes  on  cards. 
One  or  all  of  the  following  may  apply:  (1)  A  weekly  maintenance  fee  ranging  between  $.49  and 
$.79. (2) A hang-up fee between $.05 and $1 depending upon length and destination of the call. 
(3) A destination surcharge of between 0 percent and 100 percent.—minutes and/or seconds are 
rounded  to  multiple  minute  increments.—International  calls  made  to  cellular  phones  are  billed 
at  higher  rates.—Toll  free  access  numbers  are  subject  to  an  additional  fee  of  up  to  4  cents  per 
minute.—Prices  are  subject  to  change  without  notice.—This  card  has  no  cash  value.—Card  ex-
pires 3 months after first use or 12 months after activation.’’ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

11 

ters  the  phone  number  he  or  she  is  trying  to  reach  and  hears  an  automated  ‘‘voice 
prompt’’ announcing the number of minutes of time ostensibly available on the card. 
As discussed in more detail below, the FTC, our state law enforcement colleagues, 
and third parties who have tested a wide variety of prepaid calling cards have found 
that prepaid calling cards offered by a number of industry participants routinely fail 
to  deliver  the  minutes  promised  in  their  advertising  and  voice  prompts.  As  alleged 
in  two  cases  recently  brought  by  the  FTC,  our  testing  showed  that  the  defendants’ 
prepaid calling cards delivered about half the number of promised minutes. 
III. Law Enforcement Actions 

The FTC works closely with the offices of State Attorneys General and other state 
agencies.  In  the  fall  of  2007,  the  FTC  established  a  joint  Federal-state  task  force 
concerning  deceptive  marketing  practices  in  the  prepaid  calling  card  industry.  The 
task  force  members  include  representatives  from  the  offices  of  more  than  35  State 
Attorneys General and other state and local agencies, and the Federal Communica-
tions  Commission  (‘‘FCC’’).  Working  cooperatively  allows  us  to  share  information 
and facilitate law enforcement activity in the prepaid calling card area.4 

Currently, the Commission is litigating two actions in Federal district court, alleg-
ing  that  the  defendants  deceptively  marketed  their  prepaid  calling  cards.  In  addi-
tion,  as  discussed  below,  the  Attorneys  General  for  the  states  of  Florida  and  Texas 
recently have taken action against prepaid calling card companies for their allegedly 
deceptive practices. 
A. FTC Enforcement Actions 

Under  Section  5  of  the  FTC  Act,  the  FTC  has  authority  to  bring  cases  against 
companies  and  individuals  for  engaging  in  deceptive  or  unfair  acts  or  practices  in 
or  affecting  commerce.5 Since  the  1990s,  the  FTC  has  used  this  power  to  bring  en-
forcement  actions  against  entities  for  deceptively  selling  prepaid  calling  cards.  The 
Commission brought its first two prepaid calling card cases against companies that 
the  FTC  alleged  were  deceptively  marketing  prepaid  calling  cards  by,  among  other 
things,  misrepresenting  the  per-minute  rates  consumers  would  be  charged  when 
using  the  cards  and  by  failing  to  clearly  and  conspicuously  disclose  connection  and 
maintenance  fees  associated  with  the  cards.6 Since  then,  the  FTC  has  brought  sev-
eral  cases  alleging  that  telemarketers  deceptively  marketed  calling  cards  to  con-
sumers and charged consumers without their authorization.7 

This spring, the FTC filed two cases against major distributors of prepaid calling 
cards.  On  March  25,  2008,  the  FTC  sued  Clifton  Telecard  Alliance,  a  national  dis-
tributor of prepaid calling cards based in New Jersey, and the company’s principal.8 
The FTC alleged that the defendants, which market their cards chiefly to recent im-
migrants,  engaged  in  deceptive  marketing  practices  by:  (1)  misrepresenting  the 
number of calling minutes provided by their cards; (2) failing to adequately disclose 
fees  and  charges  associated  with  their  cards;  and  (3)  failing  to  adequately  disclose 
that  the  value  of  their  cards  may  be  reduced  even  when  a  call  does  not  connect. 
In support of its case, the FTC tested 46 of Clifton Telecard Alliance’s calling cards 
purchased  at  various  retail  outlets.9 In  the  FTC’s  tests  of  these  cards,  none  deliv-

4 Representatives  from  the  following  Offices  of  Attorneys  General  are  members  of  the  task 
force: Alabama, Arizona, Arkansas, California, Colorado, Connecticut, District of Columbia, Flor-
ida,  Georgia,  Hawaii,  Idaho,  Illinois,  Indiana,  Iowa,  Kansas,  Kentucky,  Maryland,  Maine,  Mas-
sachusetts, Minnesota, Missouri, Montana, New Mexico, Nevada, New Hampshire, New Jersey, 
New York, North Carolina, North Dakota, Ohio, Oregon, Pennsylvania, Rhode Island, South Da-
kota, Tennessee, Texas, Virginia, Washington, Wisconsin. In addition, the New York State Con-
sumer  Protection  Board  and  the  New  York  City  Department  of  Consumer  Affairs  have  partici-
pated in the task force. 
5 15 U.S.C. § 45(a)(2). 
6 FTC v. PT–1 Comm’cns, Inc., 99–CIV–1432 (S.D.N.Y.) (Stip. Final Order filed Feb. 25, 1999) 
(order  requiring  monetary  relief  and  barring  defendants  from  misrepresenting  the  value  of  its 
prepaid calling cards and from failing to clearly and prominently disclose fees and charges); FTC 
v.  Trans-Asian  Comm’cns,  Inc.,  97–CIV–5764  (S.D.N.Y.)  (Stip.  Final  Order  filed  Mar.  17,  1998) 
(order  requiring  $1  million  performance  bond  before  defendants  can  advertise  or  sell  prepaid 
calling cards and barring future material misrepresentations about prepaid calling cards). 

7 FTC v. 9131–4740 Quebec, Inc., CV–02242 (N.D. Ohio) (Compl. filed July 25, 2007) (pending); 
FTC v. T2U, Inc., 101–CV–811 (N.D. Ohio) (Stip. Final Order filed Sept. 13, 2001); FTC v. En-
hanced Billing Servs., Inc., 101–CV–1060 (D.D.C.) (Stip. Final Order filed Aug. 1, 2001). 

8 FTC  v.  Clifton  Telecard  Alliance  One  LLC,  d/b/a  Clifton  Telecard  Alliance  and  CTA,  Inc., 

and Mustafa Qattous, 2:08–cv–01480–PGS–ES (D.N.J.). 

9 The FTC has been able to test prepaid calling cards thanks in part to the invaluable assist-
ance  of  El  Salvador’s  Defensorı´a  del  Consumidor,  Colombia’s  Superintendencia  de  Industria  y 
Comercio,  the  Egypt  Consumer  Protection  Authority,  Mexico’s  Procuradurı´a  Federal  del 
Consumidor  (PROFECO),  Panama’s  Autoridad  de  Proteccio´n  al  Consumidor  y  Defensa  de  la 
Continued 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

12 

ered  the  number  of  calling  minutes  advertised  in  posters  displayed  at  the  point  of 
sale. Three of the 46 cards failed to work at all, and, on average, the remaining 43 
cards delivered only 43 percent of the advertised calling minutes. On April 2, 2008, 
the  Federal  district  court  in  New  Jersey  granted  the  FTC’s  motion  for  a  temporary 
restraining order. 

On  May  19,  2008,  the  FTC  filed  a  similar  action,  FTC  v.  Alternatel,  against  sev-
eral companies alleged to act as a common enterprise in distributing prepaid calling 
cards  out  of  Florida,  Massachusetts,  and  New  Jersey.  In  the  Alternatel  case,  the 
Commission  alleged  that  the  defendants  violated  Section  5  of  the  FTC  Act  by  mis-
representing  the  number  of  calling  minutes  their  cards  provide  and  failing  to  ade-
quately  disclose  fees  and  charges  associated  with  their  cards.  As  in  the  Clifton 
Telecard Alliance case, the FTC conducted extensive testing of the Alternatel defend-
ants’  prepaid  cards  and  found  that  the  actual  number  of  minutes  provided  by  the 
cards fell far short of the defendants’ advertising claims. In tests of 87 of the defend-
ants’  cards,  the  cards  delivered  on  average  only  50.4  percent  of  the  minutes  adver-
tised  on  posters  at  the  point  of  sale.10 On  May  23,  2008,  the  Federal  district  court 
for  the  Southern  District  of  Florida  entered  a  temporary  restraining  order  in  the 
Alternatel matter. 

In  both  the  Clifton  and  Alternatel  actions,  the  defendants  have  moved  to  dismiss 
the FTC’s case on the grounds that the underlying telecommunications carriers are 
necessary  parties  that  the  FTC  cannot  join  because  of  the  exemption  in  the  FTC 
Act  for  common  carriers  subject  to  the  Communications  Act.  The  FTC  has  opposed 
defendants’  motions,  and  is  confident  that  it  will  win  on  the  merits.  As  final  relief 
in  both  cases,  the  FTC  seeks  a  permanent  injunction  and  consumer  redress  and/or 
disgorgement of ill-gotten gains. 
B. State Law Enforcement Actions 

Two states recently brought law enforcement actions against a number of prepaid 
calling card companies. Over the last few months, the Florida Attorney General has 
announced  that  he  has  entered  into  Assurances  of  Voluntary  Compliance  (‘‘AVC’’) 
with  eleven  prepaid  calling  card  companies  doing  business  in  Florida.11 These  set-
tlements  are  the  culmination  of  a  broad  investigation  into  the  prepaid  calling  card 
industry  launched  by  the  Florida  Attorney  General  in  July  of  2007.  Notably,  while 
the FTC has brought its lawsuits solely against distributors of prepaid calling cards, 
the Florida Attorney General entered into AVCs with eleven companies that include 
both distributors and telecommunications service providers for prepaid calling cards. 
On  May  23,  2008,  the  Texas  Attorney  General  filed  a  lawsuit  against  Next-G 
Communication, Inc., a telecommunications service provider that produces, sells and 
distributes  prepaid  calling  cards.12 The  Texas  lawsuit  alleges  that  Next-G  Commu-

Competencia,  and  Peru’s  Instituto  Nacional  de  Defensa  de  la  Competencia  y  de  la  Proteccio´n 
de  la  Propiedad  Intelectual  (INDECOPI).  In  this  area,  as  in  so  many  others,  international  co-
operation has proved to be vital to the Commission’s law enforcement actions. 

10 The results of the FTC testing of the defendants’ cards in the Clifton Telecard Alliance and 
the Alternatel cases are consistent with the testing results of The Hispanic Institute, a nonprofit 
organization  that  has  issued  a  report  on  its  testing  of  a  wide  variety  of  prepaid  calling  cards. 
The  Hispanic  Institute  reports  that,  on  average,  the  cards  it  tested  delivered  only  60  percent 
of  the  minutes  promised  in  voice  prompts.  See  http://www.thehispanicinstitute.net/research/ 
callingcard/qa  (visited  June  18,  2008).  They  are  also  consistent  with  testing  results  that  have 
been  offered  in  private  litigation.  See  IDT  Telecom,  Inc.  v.  CVT  Prepaid  Solutions,  Inc.,  et  al., 
Civil  Action  No.  07–1076  (D.N.J.)  (Pls.  Mem.  In  Supp.  of  Their  Order  to  Show  Cause  Why  a 
Prelim.  Inj.  Should  Not  Issue,  at  6–10;  Ex.  1  to  Suppl.  Aff.  of  Gabi  Schechter,  dated  Mar.  26, 
2007)  (alleging  the  defendants’  calling  cards  delivered  on  average  only  60  percent  of  prompted 
minutes); IDT Telecom, Inc. v. Voice Distributors, Inc., d/b/a Voice Prepaid, et al., Civil Action 
No. 07–2465 (Mass. Sup. Ct., Middlesex Cty.) (Compl. ¶ 16) (alleging that the defendants’ calling 
cards delivered on average only 65 percent of prompted minutes); IDT Telecom, Inc. v. Diamond 
Phone  Card,  Inc.,  et  al.,  Index  No.  3682–08  (N.Y.  Sup.  Ct.,  Kings  Cty.)  (Compl.  ¶ 15)  (alleging 
that  the  defendants’  calling  cards  delivered  on  average  only  59  percent  of  prompted  minutes). 
11 See  McCollum  Announces  Prepaid  Calling  Card  Settlements,  Industry-Wide  Reform  (June 
11,  2008)  available  at  http://myfloridalegal.com/newsrel.nsf/newsreleases/79C6666DB24608 
D785257465004EC901 (visited on August 27, 2008) (announcing settlements with IDT America, 
Inc.; Union Telecom Alliance; Total Call International, Inc.; Blackstone Calling Card, Inc.; CVT 
Prepaid  Solutions,  Inc.;  Dollar  Phone  Enterprise,  Inc.;  STi  Prepaid,  LLC;  Alternatel,  Inc;  and 
Cristel  Telecommunications,  LLC);  Prepaid  Calling  Company  Reaches  Settlement  with  Attorney 
General  (July  2,  2008)  available  at  http://myfloridalegal.com/newsrel.nsf/newsreleases/1439 
BD5308D470588525747A006423B8  (visited  on  August  27,  2008)  (announcing  a  settlement  with 
Touch-Tel Partners USA, LLC); Attorney General Reaches Settlement with 11th Prepaid Calling 
Card  Company  (August  21,  2008)  available  at  http://myfloridalegal.com/newsrel.nsf/news 
releases/C410C546EB409C93852574AC006C9499  (visited  on  August  27,  2008)  (announcing  set-
tlement with Cinco Telecom Corp. d/b/a Orbitel). 

12 State  of  Texas  v.  Next-G  Commnc’n,  Inc.,  Taj  Khwaja,  2008CI08149  (Bexar  County,  TX) 

(Pet. filed May 23, 2008). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

13 

nication  has  marketed  and  sold  prepaid  calling  cards  throughout  Texas  that  fail  to 
deliver the number of minutes it advertises to customers and that the defendant has 
failed to disclose fees and charges associated with its calling cards. The Texas Attor-
ney  General  alleges  that  Next-G’s  prepaid  calling  cards  consistently  delivered  only 
40  percent  of  the  minutes  claimed  on  the  Next-G’s  advertising  posters  and  con-
firmed by Next-G’s voice prompt given at the beginning of each call.13 

The  FTC  applauds  the  actions  of  the  Florida  and  Texas  Attorneys  General  and 
is  grateful  for  the  participation  of  all  of  our  law  enforcement  partners  in  the  joint 
Federal-State calling card task force. 
IV. Consumer Education and Media Outreach 

In  addition  to  bringing  enforcement  cases,  the  Commission  has  made  consumer 
education and outreach a high priority. The FTC recently updated its consumer edu-
cation brochure on calling cards, which is available in both English and Spanish on 
the  Commission’s  website.14 The  Commission  also  has  done  extensive  outreach 
about  prepaid  calling  cards  to  media  outlets  that  cater  to  non-English  and  English 
speaking consumers. The FTC wants to make sure consumers know that it is unlaw-
ful to advertise calling cards that misrepresent the number of minutes that the call-
ing cards provide or to fail to clearly and conspicuously disclose the fees and charges 
that  reduce  the  value  of  the  calling  cards.  The  FTC  also  wants  consumers  to  know 
that they can and should complain to the FTC if they do not get what they pay for. 
V. The Proposed Legislation 

As  described  above,  the  FTC  Act’s  prohibitions  on  deceptive  and  unfair  practices 
provide  the  Commission  with  a  powerful  tool  to  bring  enforcement  actions  against 
the  distributors  of  prepaid  calling  cards.  Senate  Bill  2998,  the  proposed  ‘‘Prepaid 
Calling Card Consumer Protection Act,’’ is directed at the conduct of prepaid calling 
card service providers (carriers) as well as distributors, and therefore would implic-
itly  give  the  FTC  jurisdiction  over  common  carriers  engaged  in  the  deceptive  prac-
tices  prohibited  by  the  proposed  legislation.  Consumers  would  benefit  greatly  from 
legislation  giving  the  FTC  jurisdiction  over  such  practices  by  telecommunications 
carriers. The legislation also would authorize the FTC to seek civil penalties for vio-
lations of the Act or of the rules issued by the FTC pursuant to the Act, thus adding 
an important remedy to those already available to the Commission. 

Generally,  S.  2998  requires  the  FTC  to  promulgate  a  rule  requiring  that,  among 
other  things,  prepaid  calling  card  providers  and  distributors  provide  clear  and  con-
spicuous  disclosures  of  the  number  of  minutes  provided  by  the  calling  cards,  the 
amount and frequency of all fees assessed for use of the calling cards, and the expi-
ration  date  of  the  cards.  The  bill  also  prohibits  prepaid  calling  card  providers  and 
distributors from selling or distributing calling cards that do not provide the adver-
tised  number  of  calling  minutes  or  from  assessing  inadequately  disclosed  fees.  The 
bill further provides for the FTC to bring suit alleging violations of the Prepaid Call-
ing  Card  Consumer  Protection  Act  as  if  they  were  violations  of  an  FTC  rule,  thus 
enabling  the  agency  to  seek  civil  penalties  for  violation  of  the  Act  and  the  FTC’s 
rule promulgated pursuant to the Act. 

The  FTC  supports  the  goals  of  S.  2998,  and  appreciates  the  implied  extension  of 
jurisdiction—which  will  ensure  a  level  playing  field  by  allowing  the  Commission  to 
act  to  hold  violators  responsible  for  deceptive  trade  practices  whether  they  are  pro-
viding  the  telecommunications  services  or  distributing  the  prepaid  calling  cards— 
and the proposed authority to seek civil penalties. Two aspects of the bill raise con-
cerns, however. First, the bill creates a knowledge standard for holding prepaid call-
ing  card  distributors  liable  if  they  violate  the  Act  by  distributing  calling  cards  that 
provide  fewer  minutes  or  a  higher  per  minute  rate  than  advertised,  or  announced 
on  the  voice  prompt  given  when  a  consumer  places  a  call.15 Incorporating  a  knowl-
edge  standard  into  the  law  could  create  an  additional—and  potentially  very  chal-
lenging—evidentiary  burden  on  the  FTC  when  seeking  injunctive  relief  in  a  civil 
case.16 Second,  the  bill  explicitly  exempts  from  its  coverage  prepaid  wireless  phone 

13 See  Attorney  General  Abbott  Takes  Legal  Action  Against  Prepaid  Calling  Card  Company 
(May  23,  2008)  available  at  http://www.oag.state.tx.us/oagNews/release.php?id=2479  (visited 
on August 27, 2008). 

14 See  Buying  Time:  The  Facts  About  Pre-Paid  Phone  Cards  (2008)  available  at  http:// 

www.ftc.gov/bcp/edu/pubs/consumer/products/pro04.pdf (visited on August 27, 2008). 

15 The bill does not have a parallel knowledge requirement for prepaid calling card service pro-

viders. 

16 Indeed,  under  general  consumer  protection  principles  and  traditional  jurisprudence  under 
Section  5  of  the  FTC  Act,  15  U.S.C.  § 45,  the  Commission  need  not  show  knowledge  or  intent 
in order to stop an entity from engaging in unfair or deceptive practices. Notably, however, Sec-
Continued 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

14 

services where the consumer has established a relationship with the wireless carrier 
by  purchasing  a  wireless  service  handset  package.  The  Commission  is  concerned 
that the bill’s exception for prepaid services based on the purchase of a handset and 
wireless  calling  services  would  provide  a  powerful  incentive  for  the  worst  actors  in 
the prepaid calling card industry to migrate their business practices to prepaid wire-
less  handsets  and  refill  cards,  and  thereby  avoid  the  mandates  of  the  proposed 
law.17 

To  enable  the  Commission  to  address  problems  with  deceptive  conduct  involving 
prepaid calling cards more effectively, the Committee might also consider giving the 
Commission  authority  to  bring  actions  seeking  civil  penalties  in  its  own  right 
against prepaid calling card providers and distributors rather than through the De-
partment of Justice. Giving the FTC authority to bring its own civil penalties cases 
in  this  area  would  help  ensure  that  the  Commission  does  not  have  to  forego  quick 
relief in order to seek civil penalties. 

The  Commission  recognizes  that  the  agency  and  the  Committee  share  the  same 
goal: stopping unscrupulous calling card companies from defrauding vulnerable con-
sumers.  The  Commission  looks  forward  to  working  with  the  Committee  regarding 
the language of the legislation as the Committee moves forward. 
VI. The Common Carrier Exemption 

On  several  occasions,  the  Commission  has  testified  in  favor  of  the  repeal  of  the 
common  carrier  exemption.18 The  Commission  continues  to  endorse  its  repeal,  and 
thanks  the  Committee  for  its  continued  support  for  this  measure.  The  FTC  Act  ex-
empts  common  carriers  subject  to  the  Communications  Act  from  its  prohibitions  on 
unfair  and  deceptive  acts  or  practices  and  unfair  methods  of  competition.  This  ex-
emption  originated  in  an  era  when  telecommunications  services  were  provided  by 
highly-regulated  monopolies.  The  Commission  believes  that  the  exemption  is  now 
outdated.  In  the  current  marketplace,  firms  are  expected  to  compete  in  providing 
telecommunications  services.  Congress  and  the  FCC  have  dismantled  much  of  the 
economic  regulatory  apparatus  formerly  applicable  to  the  industry.  Removing  the 
exemption from the FTC Act would not alter the jurisdiction of the FCC, but would 
give the FTC the authority to protect consumers against unfair and deceptive prac-
tices  by  common  carriers  in  the  same  way  that  it  can  protect  against  unfair  and 
deceptive practices by non-common carriers involved in the provision of similar serv-
ices. 

Prepaid calling cards are a case in point. In contrast to the State Attorneys Gen-
eral, who are able to bring enforcement actions to stop both telecommunications pro-
viders  and  distributors  offering  prepaid  calling  cards  from  engaging  in  unfair  and 
deceptive  practices,  the  FTC  has  targeted  only  the  deceptive  practices  of  prepaid 
calling  card  distributors,  because  of  the  FTC  Act  common  carrier  exemption.  Fur-

tion 5(m)(1) of the FTC Act includes a knowledge standard for instances where the FTC is seek-
ing  civil  penalties  for  violations  of  an  FTC  Rule,  as  opposed  to  equitable  relief,  such  as  an  in-
junction.  15  U.S.C.  § 45(m)(1)  (‘‘The  Commission  may  commence  a  civil  action  to  recover  a  civil 
penalty  in  a  district  court  of  the  United  States  against  any  person,  partnership,  or  corporation 
which  violates  any  rule  under  this  chapter  respecting  unfair  or  deceptive  acts  or  practices  . . . 
with  actual  knowledge  or  knowledge  fairly  implied  on  the  basis  of  objective  circumstances.’’). 
Eliminating the knowledge threshold from the bill would not change the Commission’s elevated 
burden for obtaining monetary relief in civil penalty cases. 

17 Some  participants  in  the  prepaid  calling  card  industry  are  beginning  to  offer  prepaid  wire-
less services. As the cost of providing cellular phones and calling minutes continues to decrease, 
the incentive to move consumers to prepaid wireless accounts from more traditional prepaid call-
ing cards has increased. 

18 See  Prepared  Statement  of  the  Federal  Trade  Commission,  Before  the  Subcommittee  on 
Interstate  Commerce,  Trade,  and  Tourism  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transpor-
tation,  U.S.  Senate  (April  8,  2008),  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/os/testimony/P034101 
reauth.pdf;  Prepared  Statement  of  the  Federal  Trade  Commission,  Before  the  Subcommittee  on 
Interstate  Commerce,  Trade,  and  Tourism  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transpor-
tation  U.S.  Senate  (Sept.  12,  2007),  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/os/testimony/070912 
reauthorizationtestimony.pdf; Prepared Statement of the Federal Trade Commission On FTC Ju-
risdiction Over Broadband Internet Access Services, Before the Committee on the Judiciary, U.S. 
Senate (Jun. 14, 2006), available at http://www.ftc.gov/opa/2006/06/broadband.shtm; The Re-
authorization of the Federal Trade Commission: Positioning the Commission for the Twenty-First 
Century:  Hearing  Before  the  Subcomm.  on  Commerce,  Trade  and  Consumer  Protection  of  the  H. 
Comm.  on  Energy  and  Commerce,  108th  Cong.  (2003)  (‘‘FTC  2003  Reauthorization  Hearing’’) 
(statement  of  the  FTC),  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/os/2003/06/030611reauthhr.htm;  see 
also  FTC  2003  Reauthorization  Hearing  (statement  of  Thomas  B.  Leary,  FTC  Commissioner), 
available at http://www.ftc.gov/os/2003/06/030611learyhr.htm; FTC Reauthorization Hearing: 
Before  the  Subcomm.  on  Consumer  Affairs,  Foreign  Commerce,  and  Tourism  of  the  S.  Comm. 
on Commerce, Science, and Transportation, 107th Cong. (2002) (statement of Sheila F. Anthony, 
FTC Commissioner), available at http://www.ftc.gov/os/2002/07/sfareauthtest.htm. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

15 

thermore,  even  when  the  Commission  has  identified  and  brought  enforcement  ac-
tions against non-common carriers, the common carrier exemption can impose addi-
tional  litigation  costs  on  the  FTC.  For  example,  as  noted  above,  in  both  the  Clifton 
Telecard Alliance and Alternatel cases, which the FTC has brought against distribu-
tors of prepaid calling cards, the defendants have moved to dismiss the FTC’s cases 
on  the  grounds  that  the  FTC  has  not  sued  and  cannot  sue  the  underlying  carriers, 
which defendants allege to be necessary parties. While the Commission is confident 
that  it  will  prevail  in  its  opposition  to  these  motions,  the  burden  of  having  to  re-
spond to such motions is not insubstantial. 

The American public will benefit greatly from S. 2998’s grant to the FTC of juris-
diction  over  common  carriers  in  the  prepaid  calling  card  arena.  The  FTC  respect-
fully  continues  to  recommend  that,  rather  than  take  a  piecemeal  approach  to  pro-
viding  the  FTC  with  jurisdiction  in  this  important  area  of  commerce,  Congress  re-
peal  altogether  the  FTC  Act  exemption  for  common  carriers  subject  to  the  Commu-
nications Act. The FTC has extensive expertise with such areas as advertising, mar-
keting,  billing,  and  collection,  areas  in  which  significant  problems  have  emerged  in 
the  telecommunications  industry.19 In  addition,  the  FTC  has  powerful  procedural 
and  remedial  tools  that  could  be  used  effectively  to  address  developing  problems  in 
the telecommunications industry if the FTC were authorized to reach them. 
VII. Conclusion 

The  Commission  will  continue  its  aggressive  law  enforcement  and  consumer  out-
reach  and  education  programs  in  the  prepaid  calling  card  arena.  The  Commission 
thanks  this  Committee  for  focusing  attention  on  this  important  issue  and  for  the 
opportunity to discuss its law enforcement program. 

Senator NELSON. I am going to start asking questions of you, Mr. 
Chairman,  and  if  you  would  then  feel  free  to  expand  as  much  as 
you want with regard to your answers. 

STATEMENT OF HON. WILLIAM E. KOVACIC, CHAIRMAN, 

FEDERAL TRADE COMMUNICATION 

Mr. KOVACIC. Great. 
Senator NELSON. I understand that the FTC has taken some ac-
tions  to  rein  in  some  of  these  bad  actors  and  the  costs  of  entering 
this business are fairly low, and it seems like a lot of these bad ac-
tors  may  be  able  to  get  around  the  injunctions  against  them  and 
consent  decrees  by  reincorporating  and  moving  on  to  safer  regions 
or other states. 

So  as  these  bad  actors  are  trying  to  avoid  the  arm  of  the  law, 
what  do  you  need  to  do  at  the  FTC  to  address  this  problem?  Give 
us your thoughts as to whether we need to get the criminal justice 
system involved in going after these bad actors. 

Mr.  KOVACIC.  Let  me  begin  by  thanking  you,  Mr.  Chairman, 
Ranking  Member  Hutchison,  for  the  privilege  of  speaking  about 
this enormously high priority area of concern. 

I  would  say  there  are  three  things  that  we  should  focus  on  in 

considering the phenomenon that you mentioned. 

One  is  to  continue  our  existing  efforts  to  strengthen  our  compli-
ance program. Over the past couple of years, we have devoted a lot 
of resources to increasing our ability to follow what happens to our 
existing orders and to identify instances in which people subject to 

19 For example, the FTC has brought numerous cases involving the cramming of unauthorized 
charges  onto  consumers  phone  bills.  See,  e.g.,  FTC  v.  Verity  Int’l  Ltd.,  335  F.  Supp.  2d  479 
(S.D.N.Y.  2004),  aff’d  in  part,  rev’d  in  part,  443  F.3d  48  (2d  Cir.  2006),  cert.  denied,  127  S.  Ct. 
1868  (2007);  FTC  v.  Audiotex  Connection,  Inc.,  C–97  0726  (DRH)  (E.D.N.Y.  1997);  FTC  v.  Int’l 
Telemedia Assocs., Inc., 1–98–CV–1925 (N.D. Ga., 1998); FTC v. Sheinkin, 2–00–363618 (D.S.C., 
2000);  FTC  v.  Mercury  Marketing  of  Delaware,  Inc.,  00–CV–3281  (E.D.  Pa.  2000);  FTC  v. 
Epixtar  Corp.,  03–CV–8511  (DAB)  (S.D.N.Y.  2003);  FTC  v.  Nationwide  Connections,  Inc.,  06– 
80180–CIV–Ryskamp/Vitunack (S.D. Fla. 2006); FTC v. Websource Media, LLC, Civ. No. H–06– 
1980 (S.D. Tex. 2006). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

16 

our  orders  have  violated  them,  and  to  make  a  point  of  going  after 
recidivists  both  with  our  own  resources  and  in  cooperation  with 
other  enforcement  agencies.  I  think  we  have  converted  what  used 
to  be  a  system  of  manual  retrieval  to  an  electronic  database  that 
lets us follow these folks along. 

Second,  where  there  are  recidivists  who  violate  existing  orders, 
I think you put your finger on a key consideration. Increasingly, we 
seek  to  engage  the  efforts  of  Federal  and  State  officials  who  have 
the  capacity  to  enforce  infringements  of  that  type  as  crimes.  And 
it  is  our  view  that  where  the  kind  of  misconduct  that  you  and  the 
Congressman have been describing is repeated, the only truly cred-
ible  sanction  is  to  take  their  freedom  away  because  in  many  in-
stances  they  dissipate  assets.  They  hide  them  effectively  so  that 
the  sanction  that  counts  is  the  sanction  that  involves  imprison-
ment. So greater cooperation through what we call our Criminal Li-
aison  Unit,  which  is  now  roughly  at  its  fifth  anniversary,  but  ex-
panded efforts of those types, and with your encouragement and co-
operation, we will make that a focal point of what we do. 

Senator  NELSON.  Now,  does  that  unit  work  with  the  U.S.  Attor-

Mr. KOVACIC. Yes, sir. 
Senator  NELSON.  And  then  the  U.S.  Attorney  prosecutes  the 

ney? 

case. 

Mr.  KOVACIC.  Precisely.  The  partnership  that  is  developed  is 
with the U.S. Attorney’s Office with the Department of Justice, and 
with our state government counterparts. We assist in preparing the 
cases and they deliver them through their own efforts and through 
our cooperation. And I would be happy to share for the record later 
with  you  and  your  staff  the  extraordinary  success  that  this  co-
operation has had in putting serious offenders in prison. 

Senator NELSON. Do you want to do that in testimony or submit 

it in writing? 

Mr.  KOVACIC.  If  I  could  submit  that  in  writing  to  you,  I  would 
be  delighted  to  do  it.  But  your  encouragement  to  continue  on  that 
path is very important. 

[The information referred to follows:] 
But  there  are  a  couple  of  ideas  the  Senate  may  want  to  consider  including  in  its 
legislation.  First,  you  can  specify  that  the  FTC  can  freely  share  and  coordinate  en-
forcement activities and complaint information with authorized State officials in af-
fected States; for instance, State Attorneys General, State Commissions, and certain 
categories  of  statutorily  authorized  consumer  advocates.  At  a  minimum,  complaint 
information  could  be  shared  with  suitable  advanced  disclosures  to  the  complainant 
specified. (Meaning the FTC should notify complainants—up front—orally or on the 
website—that information about their complaint may be shared with State authori-
ties to facilitate resolution). Second, you can require that the FTC maintain the task 
force  initiative.  In  his  testimony,  FTC  Chairman  Kovacic  stated  the  task  force  was 
formed  at  his  behest  and  is  not  statutory  required.  Should  Chairman  Kovacic  step 
down  from  his  post  there  is  no  guarantee  that  a  successor  would  continue  this  col-
laborative  effort.  Memorializing  Chairman  Kovacic’s  task  force  innovative  in  law 
would provide consumers with higher level of protection from fraud and abuse. 

Mr.  KOVACIC.  The  third  element  I  think  is  to  improve  our  co-
operation  with  our  state  and  local  government  counterparts.  Last 
year, with a number of people quite happily in this room whose ef-
forts  you  will  hear  about  later  today,  we  formed  a  joint  Federal- 
State  task  force.  What  we  have  come  to  understand  is  that  in  the 
archipelago of public institutions that work in this area, only if we 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

17 

link  the  islands  together  and  work  effectively  will  we  be  able  to 
track  and  identify  offenders  no  matter  where  they  go  within  the 
United  States.  And  increasingly,  they  exploit  gaps  in  cross-border 
enforcement so that the cooperative effort has to involve not simply 
our partners at the state and local level. 

And  as  you  have  already  heard  today,  our  state  counterparts 
have  done  wonderful  things  using  their  own  authority.  Someone 
you  know  quite  well,  Attorney  General  Bill  McCollum  in  Florida, 
has done a fantastic job as well. 

But  to  deepen  the  integration  of  our  efforts  with  our  state  coun-
terparts  because  the  sum  of  our  efforts  will  be  much  greater  if 
those  are  improved,  and  by  having  local  authorities  and  state  au-
thorities  work  with  us,  sharing  the  resources  we  have,  both  access 
to information about infringements, access to information about ex-
isting  orders,  sharing  information,  we  greatly  increase  the  likeli-
hood that individuals will not evade the force of the law simply by 
moving from one place to another. 

Those would be three key priorities for us. 
Senator  NELSON.  Tell  us  about  standardized  disclosure  require-

ments. Would they help the Commission’s enforcement efforts? 

Mr.  KOVACIC.  I  think  the  disclosure  requirements  that  are 
spelled  out  in  S.  2998  are  an  excellent  foundation  for  providing 
standardized disclosures. I think those key ingredients adopted into 
law  will  be  enormously  useful.  They  address  precisely  the  kinds  of 
concerns  that  you  identified  in  reviewing  the  card  examples  that 
we  have  seen  today,  that  assist  in  overcoming  the  misleading  rep-
resentations  or  nonrepresentations  that  Congressman  Engel  just 
mentioned  a  moment  ago.  And  I  think  S.  2998—simply  adopting 
that  menu  of  considerations  into  law—would  be  a  great  step  to-
ward providing greater assurance about what is actually associated 
with each of these transactions. 

Senator  NELSON.  What  can  the  FTC  do  to  collect  more  accurate 

information regarding the consumer complaints? 

Mr.  KOVACIC.  We  have  got,  I  think,  the  framework  of  a  superb 
system  in  place  now.  It  is  our  Sentinel  database  through  which  a 
large  number  of  government  and  nongovernment  organizations 
now,  again,  owing  to  efforts  that  had  been  encouraged  with  enor-
mous  effectiveness  by  this  committee,  by  this  chamber,  and  by  the 
House—to  build  Sentinel,  which  is  an  electronic  database,  we  ob-
tain  information  directly  through  complaints  that  come  into  our 
Complaint  Center  and  through  our  state  and  local  government  en-
forcement counterparts. So we have not only an excellent repository 
now  that  collects  information  from  a  variety  of  streams—literally 
dozens  of  partners  participate  in  this—but  owing  to  resources, 
again,  that  Congress  has  generously  provided  us,  we  now  have 
mechanisms  for  identifying  almost  in  real-time  patterns  of  mis-
conduct. 

An  important  supplement  to  that  is  to  increase  our  consumer 
education  efforts,  that  is,  to  alert  consumers  about  where  to  go. 
And  this  is  where  the  point  about  economic  disadvantage  and  vul-
nerability is terribly important. We realize that an increasing focus 
of  our  work  has  to  be  to  reach  populations  that  are  not  likely  to 
go to public authorities, immigrant populations that are the victims 
of  misconduct,  minority  individuals  in  poor  communities  who  may 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

18 

have simply despaired at the prospect that public authorities of all 
types will assist them in matters of need. 

We are increasing our efforts through our Hispanic language ini-
tiative  now,  which  is  about  5  years  old,  where  we  are  retooling 
many  of  our  brochures  that  deal  with  prepaid  calling  cards  to  en-
sure Spanish language speakers inform us and exercise precautions 
on  their  own.  To  inform  us,  we  are  also  developing  efforts  that  we 
are  pursuing  now  to  work  with  a  host  of  different  organizations  to 
reach  populations  that  might  not  otherwise  alert  us  to  patterns  of 
misconduct.  So  to  expand  these  consumer  education  efforts,  but  in 
particular,  to  reach  populations  that  for  a  variety  of  reasons,  eco-
nomic disadvantage, social disadvantage, historical disadvantage of 
all  types,  may  simply  not  have  confidence  that  public  institutions 
at  all  levels  of  our  government  are  willing  to  help  out  because  if 
we can detect the misconduct, we now have the apparatus in place 
to  identify  problems  quickly,  to  build  the  cooperative  framework 
with  our  state  and  local  counterparts  and  our  counterparts  at  the 
Federal level to do something about it promptly. 

Senator  NELSON.  And  are  you  doing  an  outreach  to  our  military 

population? 

Mr.  KOVACIC.  We  are  indeed.  Under  our  Sentinel  program,  we 
have  a  cooperative  program  with  the  Department  of  Defense.  One 
of our main partners is the Department of Defense. And a number 
of our projects involving not simply prepaid calling cards but other 
areas of concern involving consumer protection, financial practices, 
and  others  have  our  military  service  people  as  important  focal 
points.  And  again,  these  are  relationships  that  we  can  deepen  and 
strengthen  over  time,  but  I  am  happy  to  report  to  you  that  the 
basic infrastructure to do that work is in place and is working now, 
but it can be enhanced. 

Senator NELSON. Describe how you have a mechanism as part of 
the task force for sharing the complaint information with State and 
local governments. 

Mr. KOVACIC. Through the Sentinel system, our law enforcement 
counterparts  are  able  to  share  and  access  information  in  those 
databases.  That  is  a  condition  of  participating.  And  these  are  se-
cure systems, and the eligible participants, to obtain that informa-
tion,  are  law  enforcement  authorities,  public  authorities  with  law 
enforcement  responsibilities.  They  have  access  to  this  information. 
But it is, I think, again something you pointed to before. It is not 
simply  the  access  to  the  raw  information.  It  is  building  the  per-
sonal relationships and the institutional networks that ensure that 
we  share  information  about  better  practices  and  techniques  about 
what is taking place, patterns we are observing, as well as enforce-
ment  techniques  that  put  us  in  a  better  position  to  apprehend 
wrongdoers and sanction them. 

Senator  NELSON.  Now,  some  of  these  charges  that  they  list  are 
payments  to  the  Federal  Universal  Service  Fund  and  the  pay 
phone  owner  compensation.  How  do  you  go  about  determining 
whether  these  calling  card  companies  have  remitted  the  money  to 
these  government  entities  or  in  the  case  of  pay  phone  compensa-
tion, to the pay phone owners? 

Mr.  KOVACIC.  Senator,  that  is  an  ingredient  of  the  problem  that 
we  have  not  focused  on.  Typically  the  payments  to  the  Universal 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

19 

Service  Fund  and  the  fulfillment  of  obligations  have  tended  to  be 
the province of our telecommunications regulators at the state and 
Federal  level.  That  is  a  level  of  expertise,  a  specific  concern  we 
have  not  focused  on.  But  we  do  work  actively  with  our  state  and 
local  counterparts  involving  telecommunications  oversight  on  the 
other dimensions of the problem. 

Senator  NELSON.  And  that  would  be  in  the  case  of  Government 

as well where it might be the Federal Universal Service Fund? 

Mr. KOVACIC. We tend not to focus on fulfillment of those obliga-
tions,  but  we  do  work  actively  with  the  Federal  Communications 
Commission in sharing information, what we learn about the oper-
ation of the sector itself. 

Senator  NELSON.  It  seems  like  that  is  important  because  that  is 

another case of fraud about which a prosecutor needs to know. 

Mr. KOVACIC. No question. 
Senator  NELSON.  What  percentage  of  the  total  calling  card  mar-

ket would you say constitutes these bad actors? 

tors? 

Mr.  KOVACIC.  Very  hard  to  determine,  Senator,  and  I  do  not 
know  that  we  have  attempted  a  precise  calculation.  It  is  about  a 
$4  billion-plus  a  year  sector.  And  as  you  and  your  colleagues  and 
Congressman Engel have mentioned today, the vast bulk of activity 
in that sector is performed by legitimate enterprises. 

Our concern is that whatever the actual percentage of commerce 
accounted  for  by  illegitimate  enterprises  is,  it  has  the  capacity  to 
taint  the  entire  sector.  That  is,  if  individuals  repeatedly  have  bad 
experiences,  it  becomes  very  difficult  for  the  legitimate  enterprise 
to step forward and say you can trust me. ‘‘My representations are 
honest.  I  am  not  going  to  cheat  you.’’  So  the  real  hazard  here, 
again,  whatever  the  precise  calculation  is—and  for  the  record,  we 
would be glad to take our best stab at giving you our own estimate. 
Whatever  it  is,  it  has  a  unique  capacity  to  taint  the  entire  field, 
and that is the menace that we have to deal with. 

Senator  NELSON.  Are  you  getting  cooperation  from  the  good  ac-

Mr.  KOVACIC.  Indeed,  we  are,  sir.  Yes.  It  is  the  good  actors  who 
help  identify  the  nature  of  the  problem.  They  have  made  sugges-
tions  about  what  to  do  about  it.  And  I  think  for  the  very  reason 
that you and Senator Hutchison mentioned originally, their own in-
vestments,  their  own  good  name  is  at  stake.  And  if  consumers  be-
lieve that this is a bad commercial neighborhood, they will stay out 
completely and the others will suffer. They are helping us. 

Senator NELSON. A minute ago, you mentioned the activity of the 
states  going  after  these  bad  actors.  And  I  would  like  you  to  com-
ment on what occurs if a state goes after them, the state gets them 
in a scenario that applies just to that state. So the bad actors move 
to another state. So the FTC is going to have to coordinate the ac-
tivities of those state lawsuits when they raise the violation of sec-
tion 5 of the FTC Act. Tell us about that. 

Mr.  KOVACIC.  I  think  what  we  will  certainly  have  to  do  is,  first, 
to  have  a  network  that  ensures  that  all  of  us  are  aware  of  the  ac-
tivity of each institution so that we have a sense of what the indi-
vidual  pieces  of  enforcement  look  like,  but  also  a  sense  of  how  to 
develop  a  collective  strategy  about  the  timing  and  the  prosecution 
of matters. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

20 

One  thing  that  increasingly  has  become  part  of  our  portfolio  is 
what we call sweeps, where we work in cooperation with our State 
counterparts  and  sometimes  our  international  counterparts  where 
on  a  single  day  we  will  announce  the  prosecution  or  completion  of 
literally  dozens  of  matters  involving  a  related  practice.  And  these 
sweeps  have  become  an  extremely  valuable  tool  to  ensure  that  we 
get broad coverage and from the point of view of raising conscious-
ness, the fact of bringing lots of them at once tends to generate lots 
of  attention  which  ensures  that  the  consequence  of  prosecution  is 
greater deterrence. 

Senator  NELSON.  Do  you  want  to  comment  on  the  controversial 

issue in the Committee on common carrier exemption? 

Mr. KOVACIC. I would like to thank the Committee, to thank Sen-
ator  Dorgan,  to  thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  for  the  possibilities  in 
S. 2998 to permit us to operate much more extensively in instances 
in  which  a  potential  wrongdoer  is  a  communications  service  pro-
vider that is a common carrier. 

As you know, there are other public institutions that have the ca-
pacity in some ways to do what we do, Federal and State. The rea-
son  we  are  keen  on  eliminating  and  attenuating  these  restrictions 
is  that  there  are  many  instances  in  which  we  are  dealing  with 
firms that are not, we believe, common carriers, but they raise de-
fenses  that  implicate  the  common  carrier  exemption.  In  the  two 
matters that you are aware of, our two cases brought in the spring, 
Clifton Telecard and Alternatel, we are having to spend precious re-
sources to defeat—and we believe we will—arguments that commu-
nications firms are necessary parties and must be brought into the 
lawsuit. 

In  other  instances,  we  see  clear  evidence  of  misconduct  by  firms 
that  are  unmistakably  communication  services  providers.  We  can-
not  address  those  directly.  We  have  to  hand  those  off.  And  that 
handoff can be a source of fumbles, and it is not always clear that 
someone else will inevitably take the ball and run with it. 

We  think  that  given  the  changes  in  the  sector  today,  that  if  we 
have  the  capacity  to  deal  universally  across  the  country  with  not 
only  the  distributors  of  these  cards  whom  we  are  dealing  with  in 
the  Clifton  and  Alternatel  cases,  but  also  with  telecommunication 
services providers, we have the ability to create a much more effec-
tive source of protection. 

And it is not to denigrate the work that other public institutions 
have  done  in  any  way.  We  are  simply  proud  of  the  experience  we 
built. If I can go back to the Delta or US Airways Shuttle example 
before,  we  have  flown  these  routes  in  advertising  and  misleading 
conduct lots of times. And if it is a dark, rainy night on the north-
ern approach coming down the Potomac, which we have done many 
times into National Airport, which has sort of a short runway, and 
you  think  about  who  you  want  in  the  cockpit,  you  want  someone 
there with a little bit of gray in the temples who has done it a lot, 
who  says  this  is  the  2,500th  landing  I  have  made  at  National  on 
a dark, rainy night. 

We have flown this route lots of times, and we think we are pret-
ty  good  pilots  when  it  comes  to  dealing  with  deceitful  and  mis-
leading  behavior  so  that  there  are  other  good  pilots  out  there,  but 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

21 

we  think  we  can  fly  this  route  very  well  if  we  are  given  authority 
to fly over this part of the commercial space. 

Senator NELSON. So the bottom line is you support the legislation 

and you think it would be a step in the right direction. 

Mr.  KOVACIC.  No  question,  Senator.  We  have  some  specific  sug-
gestions  which  we  are  happy  to  share  with  your  staff  and  to  con-
tinue to discuss with you about areas in which we think the legisla-
tion  can  be  improved.  There  are  some  technical  adjustments  we 
would suggest. But we think the legislation is unmistakably a step 
ahead  and  a  crucial  element  that  you  and  the  Committee  appre-
ciate  quite  well.  Our  regulatory  frameworks  need  upgrades  over 
time,  and  your  colleagues,  your  counterparts  in  the  House,  under-
stand this quite well, as Representative Engel just mentioned. And 
we  see  the  adoption  of  this  type  of  legislation  as  being  the  equiva-
lent of getting the upgrades we need to make sure that the enforce-
ment operating system works well over time. 

Senator  NELSON.  Well,  thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  And  without 
objection,  part  of  the  record  will  be  the  written  material  that  you 
wanted to insert in the record. 

Mr. KOVACIC. Thank you. 
Senator NELSON. And I thank you, and let me call up the second 

Mr.  KOVACIC.  Thank  you  very  much  for  the  chance  to  be  here 

panel. 

today. 

Senator NELSON. Thank you. 
We  are  happy  to  have  Sally  Greenberg,  Gus  West,  Patricia 
Acampora,  and  Rosemary  O’Brien.  Sally  Greenberg  is  the  Execu-
tive  Director  of  the  National  Consumers  League.  Gus  West  is  the 
President of The Hispanic Institute. Patricia Acampora is Commis-
sioner of the New York State Public Service Commission. Rosemary 
O’Brien is the Director of Marketing of Military Marketing. 

As  stated  in  the  previous  panel,  your  written  testimony  will  be 

included as part of the record. 

Senator NELSON. Mr. West and Ms. Greenberg, both of you have 
followed this issue for some period of time, and it seems that in the 
past  couple  of  years,  there  has  been  a  dramatic  spike  in  the  num-
ber  of  complaints  against  the  bad  actors  in  the  industry.  Can  you 
tell  us  what  factor  is  responsible  for  this  increase  in  complaints? 
Is it the low cost of entry into this lucrative market? Is it the fail-
ure of regulators? What is your opinion? Ms. Greenberg? 

STATEMENT OF SALLY GREENBERG, EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, 

NATIONAL CONSUMERS LEAGUE 

Ms.  GREENBERG.  I  do  believe  that  the  low  cost  of  entry  is  a  con-
tributing factor. It is really easy to get in and out. It is easy to get 
out  from  under  the  lens  of  law  enforcement.  I  have  in  my  written 
statement  a  quote  that  I  could  not  resist  adding  from  one  episode 
of  The  Sopranos  where  Tony  Soprano  is  talking  about  how  he  and 
his  cronies  are  in  the  business  of  prepaid  calling  cards  and  some-
body  else  is  left  holding  the  bag.  Very  easy  to  get  in,  very  easy  to 
take people’s money and run. 

One of the things that we are recommending in our testimony is 
that there be some bond that entrants to the market who are sell-
ing  prepaid  calling  cards  put  up  so  that  if  law  enforcement  finds 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

22 

that  the  cards  are  not  providing  the  minutes  that  are  promised, 
that  we  have  a  place  to  go  to  look  for  and  compensate  consumers 
who  have  been  ripped  off  or  defrauded  as  a  result  of  these  cards. 
So I think that low barrier to entry is a real problem then. I think 
we could tackle that. 

[The prepared statement of Ms. Greenberg follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF SALLY GREENBERG, EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, 

NATIONAL CONSUMERS LEAGUE 

Introduction 

Good  morning,  Mr.  Chairman.  My  name  is  Sally  Greenberg  and  I  am  Executive 
Director of the National Consumers League. I appreciate this opportunity to appear 
before  the  Senate  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation  to  discuss 
the need for greater consumer protections in the purchase and use of prepaid calling 
cards.  This  largely  unregulated  consumer  product  is  a  ‘‘Wild  West’’  of  sellers  and 
merchants  who  too  often  prey  upon  the  most  vulnerable  consumers  by  promising 
minutes  they  don’t  deliver  and  loading  up  on  hidden  or  undisclosed  charges  and 
fees.  In  an  industry  like  this,  with  low  barriers  to  entry  and  a  totally  unregulated 
market,  you  can  be  sure  there  will  be  unscrupulous  operators  who  will  take  the 
money and run. 

The  National  Consumers  League,  whose  founding  in  1899  makes  us  the  oldest 
consumer  organization  in  the  United  States,  has  a  longstanding  interest  in  pro-
tecting  consumers  from  fraudulent  practices  and  is  the  only  consumer  group  that 
operates  a  national  fraud  center.  (The  NCL’s  Fraud  Center  is  described  at 
www.fraud.org). 

I  want  to  commend  you,  Senator  Nelson,  for  your  leadership  in  offering  S.  2998, 
the Prepaid Calling Card Consumer Protection Act of 2008. Consumers rely on you, 
an  outspoken  defender  of  consumer  rights  and  protections,  to  look  out  for  their  in-
terests. In my testimony, I will address some of the facts and figures describing the 
magnitude of the prepaid calling card industry and the large amounts of money in-
volved.  I’ll  discuss  the  fraud  and  deceptive  practices  associated  with  that  industry 
and  actions  taken  at  the  state  and  Federal  levels  in  response  to  fraud  I’ll  discuss 
why  NCL  supports  your  bill,  S.  2998,  and  I’ll  make  some  policy  recommendations. 
Our written testimony also includes a timeline detailing the growth of the industry 
and the rise in fraud associated with that growth. 

Let’s start with the industry. It is illustrative that the shady practices of the pre-
paid  calling  industry  were  featured  prominently  on  the  HBO  series,  The  Sopranos. 
In  Episode  26,  Tony  is  discussing  the  mob’s  work  with  prepaid  cards.  I’ve  deleted 
the obscenities: 

TONY SOPRANO.  ‘‘So,  telecommunications  once  again  fails  to  disappoint.  What’s 
this  thing?  Telephone  calling  cards.  You  find  a  front  man  who  can  get  a  line 
of  credit,  you  buy  a  couple  of  million  units  of  calling  time  from  a  carrier.  You 
become  ‘acme  telephone  card  company’.  ‘Acme’.  You’re  now  in  the  business  of 
selling  prepaid  calling  cards.  Immigrants  especially,  no  offense.  They’re  always 
calling back home to whoever (deleted). And it’s expensive, right? You sell thou-
sands  of  these  cards  to  the  (deleted),  cards  at  a  cut  rate.  But  you  bought  the 
bulk  time  on  credit,  remember?  The  carrier  gets  stiffed.  He  cuts  off  the  service 
to  the  card  holders,  but  you  already  sold  all  your  cards.  That’s  (deleted)  beau-
tiful! (Laughing) it’s a good one.’’ 

Of  course,  no  one  should  conclude  that  the  whole  prepaid  calling  card  industry 
is  controlled  by  organized  crime:  we  have  no  such  evidence,  but  this  vignette  from 
The  Sopranos  demonstrates  how  easy  it  is  to  get  into  the  industry,  rip  off  con-
sumers, and disappear with no accountability whatsoever. That must change. 
Prepaid Calling Card Facts 

in 2004.1 

• Prepaid  cards  are  a  $4  billion  a  year  industry,  responsible  for  11  billion  calls 
• The industry is estimated to reach $6.4 billion in revenue in 2008.2 
• Examples of fraudulent practices used by the prepaid companies include ‘‘hang- 
up fees,’’ periodic maintenance fees, destination surcharges, and high billing in-
crements.5 
• Companies that try to ‘‘play by the rules’’ are often punished by a loss of market 

share due to fraudulent carriers.6 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

23 

• Only 11 states, including California, Connecticut, Florida, and Illinois, currently 
have  laws  pertaining  to  calling  card  fraud,  specifically.  Most  turn  to  generic 
consumer protection statutes, but enforcement has been extremely light.7 

• Hispanic  consumers  may  be  losing  up  to  $1  million  per  day  because  of  fraudu-

lent phone cards.4 

• The  average  calling  card  delivers  only  60  percent  of  the  minutes  promised,  ac-

cording to The Hispanic Institute, a non-profit research group.3 

• The  FTC’s  survey  of  prepaid  calling  cards  confirms  The  Hispanic  Institute’s 
findings.  For  instance,  one  calling  card  tested  by  the  FTC  claimed  to  offer  360 
minutes  to  Panama,  but  only  delivered  23  minutes  of  calling  time.  The  FTC 
said that in 87 tests of the prepaid cards, the cards delivered an average of only 
50 percent of the advertised minutes.8 

• The cost-per-minute rates for prepaid phone cards can be up to 87 percent high-
er than expected. An expected call rate of 15 cents per minute, for example, may 
end up costing 28 cents per minute.9 

Customer  service  representatives  for  prepaid  calling  cards  are  often  unavailable 
or not knowledgeable regarding the prepaid phone cards their employers are selling. 
A 2005 University of Georgia study found that in a third of the calls to prepaid call-
ing  card  customer  service  lines,  callers  couldn’t  reach  a  representative.  When  they 
did  make  contact,  the  representative  often  was  unable  to  answer  basic  questions 
about fees or rounding up of minutes.10 
Why We Need To Protect Users of Prepaid Calling Cards 

The  rapid  growth  of  the  prepaid  calling  card  industry  combined  with,  until  re-
cently,  a  lax  enforcement  of  consumer  protection  statues  at  the  state  and  Federal 
levels, has enabled consumer fraud to flourish. Like so many other scams, the most 
frequent victims of the fraud and deception are the most vulnerable consumers: im-
migrants and the working poor; and those lower income Americans who often cannot 
afford or obtain regular phone service. These consumers rely on calling cards to stay 
in touch with friends and loved ones in the U.S. and abroad. Sadly, we believe that 
military families are also likely victims of the prepaid card scams and rip-offs. 

Yes, the cards provide these users with an alternative means of calling home, but 
many  use  false  and  deceptive  practices  in  the  process,  and  impose  unconscionable 
terms.  Fraud  is  fraud—if  an  automobile  is  sold  with  the  promise  of  a  sun  roof  and 
chrome wheels, it better have a sunroof and chrome wheels—if a phone card prom-
ises 500 minutes to call El Salvador, it should deliver those 500 minutes. 

Some  state  attorneys  general—notably  in  your  state  of  Florida,  Senator  Nelson— 
have  done  a  commendable  job  in  prosecuting  fraudulent  prepaid  card  companies. 
The  Federal  Trade  Commission  has  also  conducted  investigations  and  brought  im-
portant cases against individual prepaid phone card providers. Unfortunately, these 
scattered efforts are insufficient. We need basic Federal protections to stem the tide 
of the many deceptive practices in this industry. 

NCL  believes  that  FTC  regulations,  as  called  for  S.  2998,  would  help  to  level  the 
playing  field  for  all  phone  card  providers.  Such  regulations  include  requirements 
that prepaid phone card providers and distributors disclose the terms and conditions 
of the cards, and list the per minute rates, preferred international destination rates, 
and any fees or surcharges, in their advertising. 

We  need  a  national  floor  of  minimum  requirements  stating  what  industry  prac-
tices  won’t  be  permitted.  We  applaud  S.  2998’s  provisions  preserving  the  rights  of 
states to go forward with their own civil cases—as Florida did. The Federal Govern-
ment  should  set  minimum  standards  and  permit  states  to  go  forward  with  provi-
sions  that  don’t  conflict  with  the  Federal  law.  That’s  a  pro-consumer  position  and 
acknowledges  the  important  role  states  have  played  in  enacting  and  enforcing  con-
sumer protections. 

NCL  believes  that  both  your  bill,  Senator  Nelson,  S.  2998,  and  Congressman  El-
liot Engel’s bill, H.R. 3402, would go far in addressing the false promises and decep-
tion associated with these cards. Anecdotal evidence suggests that the simple threat 
of  regulation  has  already  increased  pressure  on  the  prepaid  calling  card  industry 
to  reform  its  marketing  practices.12 We’ve  also  seen  evidence  through  the  IDT  set-
tlement  in  Florida  that  if  one  company  is  forced  to  disclose  accurately  how  many 
minutes a card will provide and what the surcharges and fees will be, they will lose 
market  share  to  the  other  firms  who  are  shading  the  truth.  Therefore,  we  need  to 
create  a  level  playing  field  where  all  participants  are  required  to  provide  accurate 
information. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

Beyond Disclosure: What More Can We Do To Protect Consumers 

24 

While  NCL  supports  your  efforts,  Senator  Nelson,  to  require  full  disclosure  of 
terms  and  conditions  on  these  prepaid  calling  cards,  we  find  that  the  terms  them-
selves, when they are disclosed, are too often unconscionable. 

For  example,  the  text  in  fine  print  on  the  back  of  my  $5.00  ‘‘Africa  Sky’’  card 

states the following: 

All  of  the  following  fees  will  reduce  the  number  of  available  minutes  and  the 
value of the card. Use of a toll free number from a pay phone will incur a $.99 
per  call  fee.  Per  minute  rate  will  be  $.02  higher  for  calls  placed  using  toll  free 
access  numbers.  Call  time  for  multiple  calls  is  calculated  by  rounding  the  last 
minute  up  to  the  closest  multiple  of  3  and  then  adding  1  minute  except  that 
if  your  call  lasts  less  than  1  minute  you  will  be  charged  only  for  a  minute.  If 
available  minutes  are  not  all  used  up  on  the  first  call  the  following  fees  will 
apply:  (1)  the  multiple  call  rate  will  be  40  percent  higher  and  will  apply  to  all 
calls  (see  poster  for  details);  (2)  a  fee  per  call  of  $.59  will  apply  to  each  call; 
and  (3)  on  midnight  after  the  first  call  a  fee  of  $.69  will  be  deducted  and  then 
weekly  thereafter.  Card  Expires  Three  Months  After  First  Use  . . .  Rates  and 
Fees are Introductory and are subject to change anytime. . . . 

The  same  or  similar  text  is  found  on  most  of  the  cards.  So,  though  we  have  the 
terms  disclosed,  albeit  in  fine  print,  we  have  a  company  that  is  rapidly  subtracting 
money  from  the  user’s  original  purchase.  A  40  percent  higher  rate  is  imposed  after 
the  first  call;  a  fee  of  59  cents  per  call  will  apply  to  each  one  after  the  first  call; 
and after midnight of the first call, the fee is 69 cents, which will be deducted week-
ly  thereafter.  This  is  from  an  original  $5.00  card.  No  wonder  users  find  that  two 
or 3 weeks—or sooner—after first use, the card has no credit remaining. Notice the 
card  also  contains  this  catch-all  phrase  ‘‘Rates  and  Fees  are  Introductory  and  are 
subject to change anytime . . .’’ leaving the card distributors the option of changing 
the rules whenever they wish. 

Worse still is the ‘‘Majestic DMV’’ Card I purchased for $2.00: 

(1) A $.99 fee applies on the 1st day of use and every 5 days thereafter; (2) Calls 
made  through  tollfree  access  numbers  are  subject  to  a  fee  of  up  to  4  cents  a 
minute; (3) payphone surcharge of $.99; (4) A destination surcharge of between 
20–60 percent of the total call; and/or (5) a fee of $.10–$.99 for connected calls, 
$.15/minute  maximum  domestic  call  rate  (before  applicable  charges  and  fees); 
minutes and/or seconds are billed at a minimum of 1 minute and up to 5 minute 
increments,  plus  any  applicable  fees.  Card  expires  3  months  after  first  use  or 
12 months after activation. 

As  a  consumer  advocate,  I’ve  often  found  it  useful  to  look  at  consumer  protection 
measures in other countries. I lived in Australia 2 years ago and used prepaid cards 
for calls to the United States. My experience was uniformly positive—the Australian 
prepaid  cards  tended  to  deliver  the  minutes  they  promised,  and  they  were  good  for 
multiple  uses.  Choice  Magazine,  Australia’s  counterpart  to  our  Consumer  Reports, 
tested these international calling cards and found that indeed, many delivered good 
value and low rates without connection fees or added charges. When I arrived back 
in  the  United  States  and  began  buying  cards  here,  I  found  that  their  value  tended 
to disappear after the first call. When I read the fine print, I understood why. 

I  also  consulted  the  document  Consumer  Protection  in  the  European  Union—Ten 
Basic  Principles—and  note  that  the  Fifth  Principle  is  relevant  to  our  discussion  of 
prepaid calling cards: 

Contracts Should Be Fair To Consumers 
Have  you  ever  signed  a  contract  without  reading  all  the  small  print?  What  if 
the  small  print  says  the  deposit  you  just  paid  is  non-refundable—even  if  the 
company fails to deliver its side of the bargain? What if it says you cannot can-
cel  the  contract  unless  you  pay  the  company  an  extortionate  amount  in  com-
pensation? EU law says these types of unfair contract terms are prohibited. Ir-
respective  of  which  EU  country  you  sign  such  a  contract  in,  EU  law  protects 
you from these sorts of abuses. 

We  could  apply  the  EU’s  notion  of  contract  fairness  to  this  issue.  NCL  supports 
S. 2998’s disclosure requirements and hopes that they will satisfactorily address the 
problem of consumers paying good money for a prepaid calling card that fails to de-
liver the service. An open marketplace where all prepaid calling card companies are 
providing  accurate  information  may  do  the  trick;  the  market  has  a  way  of  working 
very  effectively  when  consumers  have  accurate  information  upon  which  to  compare 
rates. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

25 

NCL  would  like  to  suggest,  however,  that  after  passage  of  your  bill,  the  FTC 
closely  monitor  the  industry  and  in  a  year’s  time,  report  on  whether  disclosure  is 
addressing the problem adequately. 

Diogenes called the market ‘‘a place set apart where men can deceive each other.’’ 
We  must  impose  some  limits  on  that  paradigm.  If  after  a  year  we  still  see  failure 
to  accurately  disclose  rates  and  unconscionable  terms  when  the  rates  are  disclosed, 
we would urge this Committee to consider stronger regulation of this industry. 
NCL Policy Recommendations Related to Disclosure and S. 2998 

The  National  Consumers  League  strongly  supports  S.  2998  and  its  provisions  to 
give  enforcement  authority  to  the  Federal  Trade  Commission  under  the  ‘‘unfair  or 
deceptive act or practice,’’ clauses of the Federal Trade Commission Act. While pre-
paid  calling  cards  generally  offer  savings  on  international  long  distance  calling 
versus  traditional  ‘‘Dial  1,’’  10–10  dial-around  and  wireless  long  distance  calling,13 
these savings are no excuse for fraud or deception. 

We  also  support  FTC’s  call  to  appoint  a  monitor  to  oversee  the  prepaid  calling 
card business,14 and a requirement that the FTC report back to Congress on a peri-
odic  basis  regarding  the  status  of  its  efforts  to  enforce  the  terms  of  the  proposed 
legislation. 

As a general proposition, we applaud the requirements included in the Florida At-

torney General’s June 2008 settlement with prepaid card companies, such as: 

card. 

at consumers’ expense. 

(if applicable) on the card. 

• Ceasing all deceptive advertising. 
• Providing 100 percent of the minutes advertised. 
• Not using hidden fees or misleading minute calculations to increase their profits 
• Printing  disclosures  for  a  given  card  in  any  language  used  to  advertise  that 
• Printing  the  exact  number  of  minutes  available  and  the  card’s  expiration  date 
• Prohibiting naming of card surcharges to resemble taxes. 
• Requiring one-minute increment billing. 
While  S.  2998  requires  that  the  disclosure  text  on  the  calling  card  itself,  pack-
aging,  or  other  promotional  material  (including  online)  be  in  same  language  used 
to  advertise  the  card,  we  would  recommending  expanding  Sec.  3.(b)(4)  of  the  bill  to 
require  that  prepaid  phone  card  providers  provide  toll-free  customer  service  lines 
staffed  by  customer  service  representatives  able  to  converse  in  the  languages  that 
the cards are advertised in. 
Further  Recommended  Action  If  Disclosure  Requirements  Are  Not 

Sufficient 

If  after  1  year,  the  FTC  reports  back  to  Congress  with  evidence  indicating  that 
greater  disclosure  is  not  reducing  the  consumer  abuses  in  the  industry,  we  rec-
ommend  that  further  action  be  considered  by  this  Committee,  with  the  Federal 
Trade Commission given the authority to enforce these provisions: 

• Require  all  market  entrants  to  be  licensed  and  post  a  bond  before  marketing 
cards  to  consumers.  That  bond  would  go  into  a  fund  to  compensate  consumers 
who  are  victims  of  fraud.  Those  companies  that  market  prepaid  calling  cards 
should  also  be  required  to  provide  a  name,  address  and  place  of  incorporation. 
Right  now,  the  barriers  to  entry  are  so  low  and  the  penalties  for  not  making 
good  on  the  value  of  the  cards  are  so  minimal  that  it’s  simply  open  season  on 
consumers.  We  believe  requiring  a  bond  will  act  to  keep  many  bad  actors  out 
of the industry. 
• Require all market entrants to have a 24 hour, 7 days a week toll free number 
that  has  a  live  person  on  the  other  end  who  must  be  knowledgeable  about  the 
use of the card. 
• Require  that  fees  and  surcharges  imposed  be  related  to  actual  costs.  Congress 
has imposed rules on other industries that were charging consumers outrageous 
fees—the  moving  van  industry,  payday  lenders,  and  funeral  homes,  to  name  a 
few.  If,  in  a  year’s  time,  this  Committee  finds  that  disclosure  is  not  easing  the 
deception and rip-offs that plague this industry, the Committee should consider 
imposing stronger regulations on prepaid calling card companies and the many 
fees and surcharges they impose on consumers. 
• Require that all cards have an expiration date and that this date be no shorter 
than 1 year after activation. If a seller fails to make a disclosure on expiration, 
the card should be valid indefinitely. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

26 

• Require sellers to list the minimum charge per call and the balance in minutes 

and dollars remaining on the card. 

• Require  sellers  to  inform  consumers,  via  a  website  or  toll-free  phone  number, 
of  any  proposed  changes  in  terms  and  conditions,  with  consumers  given  the 
chance to reject these changes and receive a refund on the card with no fee im-
posed for requesting such a refund within an appropriate grace period of no less 
than  30  days  after  posting  of  the  proposed  change.  Prepaid  calling  card  pro-
viders  should  also  be  required  to  prominently  list  a  mailing  address  to  which 
customers  can  direct  refund  requests  and/or  a  website  with  a  refund  form  that 
the consumer can access easily. 

• Require  uniform  terms  in  all  prepaid  calling  card  contracts  so  that  consumers 
can  comparison  shop.  Companies  should  not  be  allowed  to  confuse  consumers 
by  using  a  variety  of  terms  for  charges  such  as  ‘‘administrative  fee’’  or  ‘‘service 
fee.’’ 

• The amounts involved in prepaid phone card transactions are too small for any 
one  individual  to  bring  a  case  to  court.  The  only  meaningful  way  to  allow  con-
sumers  to  hold  prepaid  card  sellers  accountable  is  through  use  of  the  class  ac-
tion process. Consumers need to be guaranteed a private right of action and the 
ability  to  band  together  as  a  class  to  bring  cases  against  dishonest  prepaid 
phone card providers. 

Conclusion 

We strongly support S. 2998 and commend this Committee for holding the hearing 
today.  By  requiring  much  better  disclosure  on  prepaid  calling  cards,  this  bill  will 
help  to  mitigate  the  deception  and  fraud  associated  with  these  cards.  We  also  sup-
port further monitoring of the industry by the FTC, which will in turn report to the 
Members of this Committee. 

NCL also urges Congress to find a way to require that prepaid calling card compa-
nies  go  beyond  simple  disclosure  of  their  onerous  rates.  The  most  vulnerable  con-
sumers—military  families,  immigrants,  low-income  families—rely  on  these  cards 
and  spend  their  hard-earned  money  only  to  see  the  value  of  the  cards  disappear 
quickly  after  first  use.  NCL  believes  we  can  do  better  by  consumers.  We  support 
the  disclosure  required  under  this  bill  and  hope  that  it  works.  If  we  need  to  take 
stronger action, this bill’s requirements will represent an excellent first step. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman, for giving the National Consumers League this oppor-
tunity to comment on your bill. We commend you for your pro-consumer record and 
look  forward  to  working  with  you  and  your  staff  to  see  this  bill  enacted  into  law. 
Issue Timeline 

We  have  provided  a  timeline  of  enforcement  actions  and  legal  settlements  per-

taining to prepaid calling cards below. 

1986 
1996 
April 2001 

2006 

2007 
January 2007 

March 2007 

Prepaid calling cards introduced to the North American market.15 
U.S. prepaid card sales reach $1.1 billion.16 
New  York  Attorney  General  Eliot  Spitzer  announces  settlement  with  five 
companies  accused  of  deceptively  marketing  prepaid  telephone  cards 
throughout upstate New York. This settlement was part of Spitzer’s ongo-
ing  efforts  to  combat  illegal  marketing  practices  of  prepaid  phone  card 
companies dating back to 1999.17 

Newark,  NJ-based  IDT  Corp.,  the  largest  prepaid  calling  card  company  in 

the U.S. reports $2.2 billion in total sales.18 

U.S. prepaid market reaches $4 billion in revenue. 
IDT Corp. settles Federal class action suit brought on behalf of hundreds of 
phone card customers alleging fraudulent and deceptive advertising prac-
tices.19 

IDT  files  lawsuit  against  9  competitors,  alleging  that  they  provide  40  per-
cent less time than advertised. Epana Networks, Dollar Phone, and Locus 
Telecommunications quickly reach settlement with IDT, agreeing to cease 
any  misleading  marketing  practices.  Six  other  companies  named  in  the 
suit, including CVT Prepaid Solutions Inc. issue an open letter to the in-
dustry,  claiming  that  IDT’s  suit  is  ‘‘nothing  but  an  underhanded  ploy  to 
regain lost market share by intimidation.’’ 20 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

27 

Florida Attorney General Bill McCollum announces investigation of 10 pre-

paid calling card companies for fraudulent or deceptive advertising.21 

Representative Eliot Engel (D–NY) introduces H.R. 3402 ‘‘Calling Card Con-

sumer Protection Act.’’ 22 

FTC asks U.S. District Court for the District of New Jersey to halt allegedly 
illegal  marketing  practices  of  prepaid  card  companies  CTA  Inc.,  Clifton 
Telecard Alliance One LLC, and Mustafa Qattous.23 

Senator  Bill  Nelson  (D–FL)  introduces  S.  2998  ‘‘Prepaid  Calling  Card  Con-

sumer Protection Act of 2008.’’ 24 

Texas  Attorney  General  Greg  Abbott  announces  filing  of  legal  enforcement 
action against prepaid calling card company Next-G Communications, Inc. 
over allegedly deceptive marketing practices employed by the company.25 

July 2007 

August 2007 

March 2008 

May 8, 2008 

May 23, 2008 

Endnotes 

1 ‘‘THI  Praises  FTC  for  Standing  Against  Calling  Card  Fraud,’’  The  Hispanic  Institute.  2007. 

Retrieved on July 24, 2008. 

ruary 2003. Retrieved on July 25, 2008. 

2 ‘‘Prepaid Calling Cards: Market Dynamics and Forecast 2003–2008,’’ ATLANTIC–ACM. Feb-

3 Ibid. 
4 ‘‘Facts and Figures,’’ The Hispanic Institute. Retrieved on July 24, 2008. 
5 Office  of  the  Attorney  General  of  Florida  (June  11,  2008).  ‘‘McCollum  Announces  Prepaid 

Calling Card Settlements, Industry-Wide Reform’’. Press release. Retrieved on July 24, 2008. 

6 Holden,  Diana.  ‘‘Calling  Out  Prepaid  Phone  Cards,’’  BusinessWeek.  July  9,  2008.  Retrieved 

7 ‘‘Facts and Figures,’’ The Hispanic Institute. Retrieved on July 24, 2008. 
8 Dang,  Dan  Thanh.  ‘‘Avoid  These  Prepaid  Calling  Cards,  FTC  says,’’  Baltimore  Sun.  June  6, 

2008. Retrieved July 24, 2008. 

9 Horton, Denise. ‘‘Prepaid Phone Cards: Caller Beware,’’ University of Georgia Research Mag-

azine. Fall 2005. Retrieved on July 24, 2008. 

10 Ibid. 
11 ‘‘Calling  Card  Questions  &  Answers,’’  The  Hispanic  Institute.  Retrieved  on  July  25,  2008. 
12 Marshalian, Jonathan. ‘‘You’ve Come a Long Way, Baby,’’ The Prepaid Press. September 17, 

2007. Retrieved July 25, 2008. 

13 ‘‘Facts and Figures,’’ The Hispanic Institute. Retrieved on July 24, 2008. 
14 Federal  Trade  Commission  (March  26,  2008).  ‘‘FTC  Asks  Court  to  Halt  Prepaid  Calling 
Card  Scam;  Alleges  Consumers  Receive  Fewer  Calling  Minutes  Than  Advertised  and  Pay  Hid-
den Fees’’. Press release. Retrieved on July 24, 2008. 

15 Frost and Sullivan. ‘‘North American Prepaid Calling Cards Market,’’ August 10, 2006. Re-

July 24, 2008. 

16 ‘‘Prepaid  Phone  Cards:  The  Facts,’’  State  of  New  York  Attorney  General.  Retrieved  on 

trieved on July 25, 2008. 

July 25, 2008. 

2007. 

2007. 

17 Office of the New York State Attorney General (April 11, 2001). ‘‘Prepaid Phone Card Sweep 

Cleans Up Deceptive Posters’’. Press release. Retrieved on July 25, 2008. 

18 ‘‘Talk Isn’t So Cheap,’’ BusinessWeek. July 23, 2007. Retrieved on July 25, 2008. 
19 IDT  Corporation  (January  25,  2007).  ‘‘IDT  Reaches  a  Settlement  in  Calling  Card  Class  Ac-

tion Lawsuit’’. Press release. Retrieved on July 25, 2008. 

20 Hatcher,  Monica.  ‘‘McCollum  probes  calling  card  deceptions,’’  The  Miami  Herald.  July  24, 

21 Hatcher,  Monica.  ‘‘McCollum  probes  calling  card  deceptions,’’  The  Miami  Herald.  July  24, 

22 U.S. House. 110th Congress, 1st session. H.R. 3402, Calling Card Consumer Protection Act. 
Online.  Thomas.gov.  Available  at  http://www.thomas.gov/cgi-bin/bdquery/z?d110:HR03402 
:@@@L&summ2=m& [Retrieved on July 25, 2008]. 

23 Federal  Trade  Commission  (March  26,  2008).  ‘‘FTC  Asks  Court  to  Halt  Prepaid  Calling 
Card  Scam;  Alleges  Consumers  Receive  Fewer  Calling  Minutes  Than  Advertised  and  Pay  Hid-
den Fees’’. Press release. Retrieved on July 25, 2008. 

24 U.S. Senate. 110th Congress, 2nd session. S. 2998, Prepaid Calling Card Consumer Protec-
tion  Act  of  2008.  Online.  Thomas.gov.  Available  at  http://www.thomas.gov/cgi-bin/query/ 
F?c110:1:./temp/∼ c110YZkszS:e930: [Retrieved on July 25, 2008]. 

25 Attorney  General  of  Texas  (May  23,  2008).  ‘‘Attorney  General  Abbott  Takes  Legal  Action 

Against Prepaid Calling Card Company’’. Press Release. Retrieved on July 25, 2008. 

Senator NELSON. Mr. West? 

STATEMENT OF GUS K. WEST, PRESIDENT AND CHAIRMAN OF 

THE BOARD, THE HISPANIC INSTITUTE 

Mr.  WEST.  Mr.  Chairman,  I  do  not  know  that  we  necessarily  at 
The  Hispanic  Institute  would  want  to  make  it  harder  to  do  busi-
ness. We sort of believe that the problem really lies in the enforce-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

28 

ment.  It  seems  that  these  fraudulent  practices  are  illegal  at  the 
Federal,  State,  and  local  level  already,  and  it  just  needs  to  be  en-
forced.  Feedback  that  we  have  gotten  from  a  few  of  the  companies 
is  that  they  were  not  going  to  change  their  practice  until  the  en-
forcement  was  stepped  up,  until  they  were  forced  to  deliver  what 
they are promising. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. West follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF GUS K. WEST, PRESIDENT AND CHAIRMAN OF THE BOARD, 

THE HISPANIC INSTITUTE 

Mr. Chairman and distinguished Senators of the Commerce Committee, my name 
is  Gus  West,  President  and  Board  Chair  of  The  Hispanic  Institute,  a  Washington 
D.C.  based  non-profit.  Thank  you  for  inviting  us  here  today  to  give  testimony  re-
garding  international  prepaid  calling  cards.  These  calling  cards  are  an  economical 
way  to  make  international  phone  calls.  In  the  United  States,  Latinos  purchase  and 
use these cards more frequently than any other group. The cards are used primarily 
to talk with family, friends, and relations. 

These  cards  are  sold  in  neighborhood  stores/tiendas/bodegas.  We  all  have  seen 
posters  in  the  windows  of  these  stores,  advertising  the  cost  of  a  certain  number  of 
minutes to a particular country. The cards are normally in boxes behind the cashier 
and  the  customer  is  able  to  select  the  card  they  wish  to  purchase.  On  the  back  of 
each  card  is  an  800-number  and  a  PIN  number  assigned  to  the  card.  One  calls  the 
800-number,  enters  the  PIN  number,  the  international  phone  number  desired,  and 
then  receives  a  message  telling  the  caller  how  many  minutes  he  has  for  a  phone 
call. 

We  have  tested  hundreds  of  these  cards  and  have  found  that  on  average  these 
cards  deliver  about  half  the  minutes  promised.  In  an  effort  to  have  the  most  objec-
tive analysis we hired a private firm, Washington-based Network Analytics, to con-
duct testing of international prepaid calling cards sold in the Florida, New York and 
the Washington D.C. markets. I have a copy of our study here today and it is posted 
on  our  website  at  www.thehispanicinstitute.net.  The  conclusions  of  the  independent 
study  mirror  the  results  of  the  internal  testing  that  we  conducted  at  The  Hispanic 
Institute. 

I  have  been  using  these  cards  myself,  and  been  cheated  out  of  minutes.  In  my 
current  role  as  Chairman  of  The  Hispanic  Institute,  I  have  often  been  asked  by  re-
porters if we could put them in contact with other victims of this fraud. I ask them 
to  go  to  anyone  of  these  neighborhood  stores  where  these  cards  are  sold,  and  ask 
anyone  you  see  buying  these  cards,  if  they  have  been  cheated  out  of  call  minutes. 
You  will  find  that  100  percent  of  the  people  who  use  these  cards  will  tell  you  that 
they have been cheated out of minutes. 

The  most  popular  cards,  the  ones  that  are  purchased  most  often,  are  the  $2  and 
$5 cards. While losing money on a $2 or $5 card may seem minimal to some, it can 
be  significant  to  a  low  wage  earning  family.  For  reasons  such  as  language,  income, 
and  lack  of  familiarity  with  regulations  the  users  of  these  cards  have  had  little  re-
course to address this fraud by a billion dollar industry. 

This  is  false  advertising  and  it  is  illegal  under  existing  Federal,  state,  and  local 
laws.  Moreover,  we  believe  that  other  industries  intentionally  prey  on  Hispanics 
when advertising in Spanish as the majority of advertising for prepaid calling cards 
is done. 

THI has been highlighting this issue for well over a year now. While several State 
Attorneys  General,  State  Legislatures,  and  the  Federal  Trade  Commission  have 
begun  to  take  action  against  calling  card  fraud  we  have  not  seen  any  measurable 
improvement  in  this  situation.  We  look  forward  to  the  day  when  consumers  in  the 
United States can be protected against this kind of fraud. Thank you. 

Hispanic Institute 

CALLING CARD VERIFICATION TEST PLAN 

Provided by: Network Analytics Corporation 

Objective 

The  purpose  of  this  testing  is  to  determine  if  calls  to  certain  destinations  using 
commercially  available  prepaid  calling  cards  are  providing  the  amount  of  minutes 
specified by the card providers. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

29 

Methodology 

Call  generators  will  be  used  to  place  the  calls  via  the  calling  card  and  complete 
the  call  to  the  destination  call  generators.  Every  attempt  will  be  made  to  use  all 
the  available  time  in  a  single  call.  If  this  is  not  successful,  most  commonly  due  to 
quality  of  the  line  and  drops,  additional  calls  will  be  made  to  the  same  destination 
until  all  the  remaining  balance  in  the  cards  is  used.  Each  call  is  recorded  by  the 
units  in  order  to  interpret  the  amount  of  minutes  announced  by  the  calling  card 
platform. 
Units 

The  testing  will  be  performed  using  Call  Generators  (CallWave)  in  the  U.S. 
(Washington,  D.C.  and  New  York  lines)  and  terminating  to  Call  Generators 
(CallWave) with Mexico and Guatemala numbers. 
Cards 

The following calling cards will be used: 

Florida ($5)—Telmex Compan˜ ero, STI Florida, Touch-Tel Honduren˜ a, Touch-Tel 
Guatemalteca, Touch-Tel Salvadoren˜ a, Dollar Phone Coffee Time, Dollar Phone 
Rey,  MPTA  Florida  Idol,  MPTA  Nine,  PCI  Pilot,  PCI  Prima  and  TST  Si  Pues. 
New  York  ($2)—Diamond  Bingo,  Diamond  Arenque,  SDI  I  Love  NY,  Lycatel 
Success, Lycatel Call Me, STI World, RTG Martini, RTG Cocktail and IDT Play 
Ball. 
Washington, D.C. ($2)—IDT Boss 
Toll Free ($5)—GEO Florida 

Two cards of each are provided in order to attempt to test to each destination with 

each card. 
Test Deployment 

The following are the numbers for the lines used: 

Washington Originated calls: (202) 609–9875 and (202) 244–1066 
New York Originated calls: (917) 779–8197 
Mexico Termination: +525585256265 
Guatemala Termination: +50222630419 

Test Scope 

The testing will provide the following data for each call: 

Seq. Number 
Date 
Time 
Card Vendor 
Card Name 
Card Denomination 
Card Code 
Originating Number Area 

time 

Post Dial Delay 
Call Disposition 
Call Answer Time 
Call End Time 
Warning Provided 

Code (City) 

Originating Number 
Access Number Dialed 
Destination Country 
Destination Number 
Destination Cell or 

Landline 

From Number shown at 

destination 

Announced Balance $ 
Announced Balance 

(minutes) 

Rate Per Minute 
Minutes Not Provided (If 

call used all balance) 

Recording file name 
End of Dial Time 
Call Progress detection 

Disconnect Reason 
Call Duration Recording (Sec) 
Call Duration Trace 
Call Duration Destination carrier CDR (Sec) 
Call Duration Minutes 
PAMS Score LQ 
PAMS Score LE 
Per call Extra Charge (Using Next Call’s announced balance) 

Next Call Announced Balance 
Card indicated connection fee 
Card indicated Rounding Increments 
Card indicated maintenance fee 
Toll-Free use surcharge 

Calculated p/min charge based on 1st call announcements 

CCR 
AVE PDD 

AVE Extra Charge 
AVE PAMS LQ 

AVE PAMS LE 
Total Minutes provided 
Completed Calls 

Actual p/minute rate experienced 
Total Minutes announced 
Percentage provided vs. announced 
Minutes Not Provided (If call used all balance) 
Percentage provided vs. announced (last call) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

30 

This information is provided from: 
• The originating carrier’s Call Detail Record 
• Terminating Carrier’s Call Detail Record 
• Call Generator (CallWave) Trace files 
• Listening to the Recordings created for each call 
• Terms written on each card 

Results 

• Test calls were placed between November 12 and December 08, 2007. 
• From a total of 45 cards tested, 7 encountered completion rate of 0 percent and 
could never reach the intended destination while another 8 encountered 50 per-
cent or less of CCR. 
• Only  15  cards  achieved  the  goal  of  utilizing  the  entire  time  balance  provided 
in  a  single  call.  Out  of  those,  only  4  (27  percent)  provided  the  entire  balance 
announced to the customer and 6 others (40 percent) provided 50 percent or less 
of the time announced. 

The following chart provides information about the Call Completion Rate provided 

by each of the cards, sorted by highest (better) to lowest (worst). 

Call Completion Rate (CCR%) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e
.

1
T
S
E
W
0
1
9

31 

The  following  chart  provides  information  about  the  Average  Post  Dial  Delay  pro-

vided by each of the cards, sorted by lowest (better) to highest (worst). 

Post Dial Delay (PDD Seconds) 

The  following  chart  provides  information  about  the  Average  Listening  Quality 

provided by each of the cards, sorted by highest (better) to lowest (worst). 

PAMS Listening Quality 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.

3
T
S
E
W
0
1
9

s
p
e
.

2
T
S
E
W
0
1
9

32 

The  following  chart  provides  information  about  the  Percentage  of  minutes  pro-
vided  versus  minutes  announced  by  each  of  the  cards  when  all  minutes  were  used 
in a single call, sorted by highest (better) to lowest (worst). 

Percentage Provided vs. Announced (1 call) 

The  following  chart  provides  information  about  the  Percentage  of  minutes  pro-
vided versus minutes announced by each of the cards when considering only the last 
call placed in which the last remaining announced balance was used, sorted by high-
est (better) to lowest (worst). 

Percentage Provided vs. Announced (last call) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.

5
T
S
E
W
0
1
9

s
p
e
.

4
T
S
E
W
0
1
9

33 

Senator NELSON. Ms. O’Brien, you were nodding your head. 

STATEMENT OF ROSEMARY G. O’BRIEN, PRESIDENT, 

MILITARY MARKETING LLC 

Ms.  O’BRIEN.  Yes,  sir.  I  agree  with  Mr.  West  that  enforcement 
is  key  here.  You  already  have  lots  of  legislation  and  rulemaking 
around this. What is critically important is that the bad actors are 
brought to a competent body to account for their actions. Generally 
speaking,  I  think  the  vast  majority  of  the  prepaid  industry  is  con-
siderably  reputable  and  makes  full  disclosure.  But  I  think  that 
there  are  populations  that  are  disproportionately  affected  by  the 
bad actors. And we know where to find them. Let us find them and 
do what we need to do. Enforcement is key. 

[The prepared statement of Ms. O’Brien follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF ROSEMARY G. O’BRIEN, PRESIDENT, 

MILITARY MARKETING LLC 

Thank  you  for  your  invitation  to  speak  to  the  Committee  about  the  military  and 
the  prepaid  card  industry.  My  name  is  Rosemary  Grace  O’Brien.  I  have  a  Military 
Marketing practice located in New York City. 

I  would  like  to  briefly  summarize  my  background  which  qualifies  me  to  speak 
with  you  today.  My  professional  career  is  deeply  rooted  in  telecommunications.  It 
began  back  in  1981  with  work  performed  for  NY  Telephone.  It  continued  uninter-
rupted with major and on-going assignments from NYNEX, Southern New England 
Telephone, Southwestern Bell, and a handful of telecom start-ups made possible by 
divestiture in 1984. Eventually in 1997 I joined AT&T for a period of 7.5 years. That 
experience is most relevant to your agenda today. 

My work at AT&T was as General Manager of their worldwide Military business. 
To be clear, not mission critical communications, rather my team and I had the re-
sponsibility  of  providing  Personal  Telecommunications  Services—in-room  phone 
service in barracks, dedicated public payphones on military installations in 18 coun-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e
.

6
T
S
E
W
0
1
9

34 

tries,  on  larger  U.S.  Navy  and  Coast  Guard  ships,  and  in  Forward-Deployed  loca-
tions, such as Bosnia and Kuwait, and eventually Iraq and Afghanistan. 

My job was to make sure Soldiers, Sailors, Airmen, Marines, and Coastguardsmen 
were aware of the special plans and programs AT&T built just for the military, how 
they  could  access  them,  and  the  best  methods  to  pay  for  them.  My  mission  was  to 
be  sure  that  servicemembers  always  had  a  way  to  call  home,  to  reach  family  and 
friends no matter where they lived or served our country. At its peak, the business 
comprised  11  ‘‘platforms’’  with  prepaid  cards  representing  just  one  of  them.  AT&T 
secured  the  right  and  obligation  to  provide  these  services  through  contracts  it  won 
in  several  competitive  bidding  processes  conducted  by  the  Military  Exchanges.  It 
spent  millions  of  dollars  of  capital  building  out  infrastructure,  and  millions  more 
educating  the  military  community  through  informative  advertising,  in-person  brief-
ings, and other methods to build awareness of all products and services. 

You probably already know that servicemembers are intense communicators. They 
spend  more  on  communications  than  the  average  American.  Much  more  . . .  The 
ability  to  talk  to  loved  ones  is  a  critically  important  quality  of  life  issue,  to  their 
sense  of  well-being  and  the  peace  of  mind  of  their  families.  Let’s  face  it,  military 
life can be lonely, and dangerous. Separations from family and friends are especially 
difficult.  So  while  it  is  still  possible  to  write  letters,  and  today,  to  send  and  receive 
e-mails, there is just no substitute for the human voice. Communications is essential 
and that fact will never change. That’s the key reason why prepaid cards are so es-
sential in the military. 

The  second  reason,  is  equally  as  important,  but  completely  practical.  First,  think 
back  if  you  can,  to  when  there  were  no  prepaid  cards  or  cell  phones,  how  did  you 
pay  for  a  call  when  you  were  away  from  your  home  or  office?  Either  you  deposited 
change into the payphone, or if you were lucky enough to have home phone service, 
you  could  get  a  special  calling  card—a  subscriber  card—that  allowed  you  to  charge 
payphone  calls  to  your  home  phone  bill.  If  you  were  desperate  or  didn’t  care  what 
it cost, you paid with a credit card. 

Well  cash  is  impractical  for  long  distance  calls,  especially  from  foreign  countries. 
Credit  cards  are  not  an  affordable  option.  Subscriber  calling  cards  are  helpful,  but 
they come with some limitations. 

First,  you  need  to  have  a  home  phone  to  get  one.  Soldiers  who  live  in  tents,  in 

barracks, on ships, or overseas, do not necessarily have a U.S. home phone. 

Second,  the  cost  of  aggregating  the  call  data  related  to  your  card,  so  the  carrier 

can render and collect a bill, needs to be built into the cost of each call. 

Third,  a  calling  card  does  not  have  a  mechanism  that  allows  the  user  to  under-

stand how much he is spending, or has already spent this month. 

Prepaid  cards  became  popular  in  the  military,  and  remain  so  today,  because  pre-
paid  cards  effectively  address  all  of  these  issues.  Anyone  can  buy  a  prepaid  card. 
Prepaid cards makes calls cheaper than calling cards. And prepaid cards enable the 
service member to budget himself. 

In  the  military,  service  members  mostly  buy  cards  at  their  military  exchanges. 
Troops have a fairly sophisticated understanding of how to use the card so that they 
get  the  most  from  it.  For  example,  generally  speaking,  when  a  card  is  used  to  call 
back to the United States from a foreign country, multiple units, or minutes are de-
ducted for each minute of talk time. No surprise, international calls are more expen-
sive.  Multiple  minutes  is  a  way  to  recover  the  true  cost  of  the  call.  Troops  know 
this.  Servicemembers  recognize  that,  whenever  possible,  they  should  use  the  De-
fense  Secure  Network  when  calling  the  U.S.  from  a  foreign  country,  because  this 
enables them to a get a ‘‘free ride’’ back to the U.S., where a domestic operator helps 
them  place  a  call  and  their  minutes  are  deducted  one  for  one,  as  if  the  call  origi-
nated in the U.S. 

The  Military  Exchanges  recognized  the  need  for  prepaid  cards  and  have  done  an 
excellent  job  of  procuring  cards  for  service  members.  That’s  why  the  cards  that  the 
Exchanges  sell  have  the  lowest  rates  from  the  countries  that  military  people  call 
from the most—Iraq, Afghanistan, Germany, Italy, Japan, etc. And their high value 
cards  offer  a  better  rate  to  servicemembers  than  the  big  box  retailers  who  dwarf 
them  in  size.  I  believe  the  cost  of  a  payphone  call  from  Iraq  to  the  U.S.  is  about 
16 cents per minute. I cannot make a call from one side of Manhattan to the other 
for  that  little  money,  using  a  card  I  bought  at  Sam’s  Club  or  Wal-Mart,  or  another 
big box retailer. 

Every retailer, when he buys the prepaid cards that will be sold in his store, con-
siders his customer base; and as prepaid cards are typically custom-built, he builds 
his  prepaid  cards  to  satisfy  his  audience.  And  he  sets  the  retail  price  for  the  cards 
he  sells.  That  is  sometimes  where  the  trouble  comes  in.  If  a  card  that  is  built  to 
be  optimal  (lowest)  for  calls  from  the  U.S.  to  Mexico,  is  used  to  make  a  call  from 
the  U.S.  to  Korea,  chances  are  good  the  call  to  Korea  will  be  unexpectedly  expen-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

35 

sive. Or when a patriotic-minded American goes to his favorite big box retailer, buys 
a card made by a reputable carrier, and sends it to his grandson in Iraq, it is impor-
tant  to  know  that  card,  made  by  a  reputable  company  will  never  offer  as  good  a 
deal  as  the  card  that  the  Military  Exchange  sells  to  that  soldier.  And  that  soldier 
may complain to his wife about how little talk time he received from grandpa’s card 
compared  to  his  Exchange  card.  And  his  wife,  frustrated  at  her  circumstances  and 
missing  her  husband  and  the  father  of  her  children,  may  write  you  a  letter  com-
plaining  about  how  that  reputable  carrier  is  ripping  off  soldiers.  But  it  is  just  not 
true  . . .  because  it  is  likely  that  the  card  that  grandpa  sent  was  never  meant  for 
international  inbound  calls.  But  that  does  not  stop  them  from  writing  their  Con-
gressman,  or  their  local  newspaper,  or  tv  consumer  advocate.  I  handled  many  of 
these  complaints  in  my  tenure  with  AT&T.  Those  kinds  of  stories  should  not  ordi-
narily be a cause for overreaction on your part. 

However,  I  do  encourage  you  to  look  closely  and  carefully  so  you  can  distinguish 
the needs of the reputable carriers who do an excellent job of making full disclosure, 
from  the  bottom  feeders  in  the  prepaid  industry  who  have  the  ability  to  give  the 
product  or  its  maker  a  bad  reputation.  They  prey  on  ignorance  and  inexperience, 
by  deliberately  tricking  out  their  cards  with  inordinately  short  expiration  dates,  or 
come-on rates for one country with very high rates for all others, or very low-adver-
tised  rates  that  come  with  high,  one-time  surcharges.  Their  goal  is  to  produce  a 
product that allows them to enjoy very large, gross profits. I, for one, would support 
your  carefully  constructed  plans  to  reign  in  prepaid  chicanery,  but  would  complain 
strongly about any Band-Aid attempts that do not fully consider the underlying ele-
ments of the prepaid business. 

Thank you. 

Senator  NELSON.  Ms.  Acampora,  the  joint  Federal-State  slam-
ming  enforcement  regime  is  often  mentioned  as  a  good  example  of 
a  Federal-State  partnership.  Do  you  think  that  the  model  of  Fed-
eral rules within the joint Federal-State enforcement regime works 
in this prepaid calling card scam? 

STATEMENT OF HON. PATRICIA L. ACAMPORA, 

COMMISSIONER, PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION, STATE OF 
NEW YORK; MEMBER, COMMITTEE ON CONSUMER AFFAIRS, 

NATIONAL ASSOCIATION OF REGULATORY UTILITY 

COMMISSIONERS 

Ms.  ACAMPORA.  I  think  that,  yes,  it  will  work,  and  your  legisla-
tion we believe is very well put together—we added some thoughts 
in  our  testimony  that  I  have  given  to  the  Committee  on  this—but 
your bill allows your constituents to continue to use and exploit ex-
isting  State  enforcement  mechanisms.  As  we  know,  State  Govern-
ment  is  a  little  bit  more  convenient  to  relate  to  rather  than  the 
Federal  Government  because  of  geography  and  also  time  changes 
between  Washington  and  the  various  states.  As  you  know,  Cali-
fornia  usually  has  a  problem  with  a  lot  of  complaint  litigation  be-
cause of the time differences. 

It  also  helps,  I  believe,  in  times  where  the  economy  is  so 
stretched.  It  enables  the  Federal  Government  and  the  State  gov-
ernment  to  leverage  scarce  resources  and  join  together  to  be  able 
to do that. 

And  of  course,  it  is  always  nice  to  leave  our  State  ‘‘cops’’  on  the 
beat which can only maximize the odds that the bad actors will be 
punished and will be caught expeditiously. And I think that in the 
future,  with  your  bill,  the  bad  actors  will  face  more  enforcement— 
because  of  this  state  cooperation,  and  your  constituents  will  get 
their grievances addressed quite quickly. 

And  I  think  that  the  FCC  has  and  continues  to  coordinate  well 
with our national association of regulators which is called NARUC, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

36 

and  the  members  of  NARUC  on  these  issues.  And  the  FCC—I’m 
talking  about  slamming  enforcement—helped  coordinate  and  it 
works with NARUC. It has conference calls. 

And I think in speaking to the Chairman from the FTC, that the 
FTC  has  set  up  a  similar  task  force  on  these  issues  as  was  set  up 
with  slamming  with  the  states  at  the  FCC.  This  will  work  quite 
well.  And  we  really  do  look  forward  to  working  with  the  FTC  as 
presently right now, there is more of a coordination with the Attor-
neys  General,  and  I  think  it  would  help  and  assist  if  NARUC  was 
also reached out to and could participate as a member of that task 
force. 

Senator  NELSON.  Is  that  organization  something  that  could  help 
us  on  State  registration  requirements  and  bonding  requirements? 
Ms. ACAMPORA. Well, we certainly would have—we have the staff 
and  we  have  the  ability  to  work  with  you  to  let  you  see  what  the 
various states have on the books. Right now, we have a few states 
that  do  have  legislation.  California  has  laws.  New  York  certainly 
does, and some other states still do not. So I think it would be im-
portant  that  NARUC  provide  you  with  a  lot  of  information  that 
would make your job a little bit easier. 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON.  PATRICIA L.  ACAMPORA,  COMMISSIONER,  PUBLIC 
SERVICE COMMISSION,  STATE OF NEW YORK;  MEMBER,  COMMITTEE ON CONSUMER 
AFFAIRS, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION OF REGULATORY UTILITY COMMISSIONERS 

Introduction 

Chairman Inouye, Vice Chair Hutchison and Members of the Committee, I appre-
ciate  the  opportunity  to  testify  today  on  consumer  protection  in  the  prepaid  calling 
card market. This is an important piece of legislation for your constituents. I thank 
you  for  calling  this  hearing  and  commend  Senator  Nelson,  the  sponsors  of  the  bill, 
and the Members of this Committee for your leadership on this important consumer 
issue. 

My name is Patricia Acampora. I am a Commissioner of the New York State Pub-
lic  Service  Commission  and  a  member  of  the  National  Association  of  Regulatory 
Utility  Commissioners’  (NARUC)  Committee  on  Consumer  Affairs.  NARUC  rep-
resents  the  State  utility  commissioners  in  each  of  your  states  and  the  U.S.  terri-
tories  that  have  oversight  responsibilities  over  all  the  critical  utility  infrastruc-
tures—telecommunications,  energy,  and  water.  NARUC  has  not  yet  established  a 
specific  position  on  national  standards  for  prepaid  calling  card  services,  but  we  do 
have well-established positions on specific issues raised by the Prepaid Calling Card 
Consumer Protection Act of 2008 (S. 2998). 

As  early  as  July  31,  2002,  the  NARUC  Board  of  Directors  adopted  a  resolution 
indicating that ‘‘consumers of all telecommunications services’’ should ‘‘receive clear 
and  complete  information  regarding  rates,  terms  and  conditions  for  services.’’  In 
July, NARUC’s Committee on Consumer Affairs convened a panel on prepaid cards 
at our Summer Meetings in Portland, Oregon, which I moderated. The panel, which 
focused  on  existing  State  initiatives,  was  widely  attended.  You  can  expect  that 
NARUC  and  its  members  will  continue  to  be  active  on  these  issues.  Shortly  before 
that  panel  discussion,  NARUC  did  an  expedited  informal  survey  finding  that  18  of 
30  responding  NARUC  member  commissions  handle  complaints  about  calling  card 
services.  State  oversight  and  interest  in  this  industry  segment  comes  at  multiple 
levels. 

Several entities are involved in providing these services. Telephone companies are 
responsible for the telephone lines that carry calls. Resellers buy telephone minutes 
from  the  telephone  companies  and  ‘‘resell’’  them  to  end-users.  Issuers  set  the  card 
rates  and  provide  toll-free  customer  service  and  access  numbers.  Finally,  there  are 
the distributors and retailers. Companies that fall into one or more of the first three 
categories  frequently  require  certification  from  many  of  NARUC’s  member  commis-
sions.  But  even  where  a  State  commission  lacks  authority,  they  frequently  attempt 
to  resolve  complaints  informally  or  cooperate  with  other  State  agencies,  e.g.,  the 
State Attorneys General, on enforcement efforts. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

Fraud and Abuse in the Prepaid Calling Card Market 

37 

Many  Americans  rely  on  prepaid  calling  cards  to  complete  intrastate,  interstate, 
and  international  calls.  Analysts  believe  the  main  victims  of  abuse  in  this  market 
are  minorities,  immigrants,  the  elderly,  low-income  consumers,  members  of  our 
Armed  Services,  and  others  either  not  inclined  or  not  able  to  adopt  other  commu-
nications  options.  It  is  widely  acknowledged  that  fraud  and  abuse  in  this  market 
is more prevalent than complaint data indicates. 

My  colleagues  on  the  NARUC  Consumer  Affairs  Committee  report  several  issues 
with calling card providers, including: (1) the provider is either not required to seek 
Commission registration or certification or they have chosen to ignore that require-
ment;  (2)  the  calling  time  provided  is  substantially  lower  than  advertised;  (3)  the 
provider engages in misleading and false advertising by overstating achievable call-
ing  time  or  understating  unit  cost/rate;  (4)  the  advertised  rates  expire  after  short 
‘‘promotional  period’’;  (5)  the  provider  charges  substantial  undisclosed  surcharges 
and  fees;  and  (6)  the  card  expires  within  a  short  period  following  the  completion  of 
the initial call. 

Prepaid calling cards present the usual enforcement challenges for State authori-
ties. As mentioned earlier, frequently providers are headquartered in another juris-
diction  and  fail  to  register  or  seek  certification  from  a  State  commission  (in  states 
that require such certification) or even register an agent for service of process under 
so-called State long-arm statutes. Moreover, most often, even in states where certifi-
cation is required, the most easily located entity in the marketing chain—the retail 
store—is not subject to State Commission oversight. 

New York’s Public Service law provides consumer protections which have allowed 
my Commission to help assist customers with calling card complaints. Some of those 
complaints are related to completion fees that deplete the card faster than the con-
sumer could have realized. Another common complaint we receive is from consumers 
who have a defective card that does not allow him or her to complete any calls, and 
want reimbursement from the card provider, or who are trying to contact the service 
provider for general customer service issues. Consumers also frequently complain of 
call completion fees they did not discover until using the card. Both New York’s law 
and S. 2998 require some information to be printed on the calling card, information 
on the rates and fees. This is a logical step; if this information is more readily avail-
able,  it  can  stem  the  tide  of  customer  dissatisfactions  caused  by  inadequate  disclo-
sures.  But  there  is  a  problem.  Some  disclosures  now  are  often  printed  on  the  pack-
aging  material—material  which  is  discarded  almost  immediately  by  the  consumer. 
Although NARUC has no specific position on this problem, I do have some sugges-
tions. In lieu of printing information related to rates and fees on the card packaging, 
I would like to suggest two options. Under the first, the service provider is required 
to  include  all  rates  and  fees  on  a  piece  of  card  stock  included  with  the  calling  card 
when  sold.  This  card  would  the  same  size  as  the  calling  card  and  would  have  the 
phrase ‘‘CONSUMER: DO NOT DISCARD’’ printed on both sides in 14pt, boldface 
type.  Another  option,  less  useful  to  those  without  Internet  access  and  is  referenced 
in  Section  3(a)  of  the  bill,  is  to  require  the  service  provider  to  print  a  web  address 
on the calling card which the consumer could access to confirm the rates and terms 
preprinted  on  the  typically  discarded  packaging.  Even  if  a  consumer  does  not  have 
access to the Internet or is not Internet savvy, the consumer could provide the con-
sumer complaint call center with the website which would aid the investigation and 
resolution of a complaint by relevant authorities. 
State Enforcement of Federal Rules Proposed in S. 2998 

The  Prepaid  Calling  Card  Consumer  Protection  Act  of  2008  protects  consumers 
by  requiring  the  accurate  and  reasonable  disclosure  of  the  terms  and  conditions  of 
prepaid  telephone  calling  cards  and  services.  As  previously  stated,  NARUC  has  not 
formally  taken  a  position  on  what  Federal  standards  should  be,  but  we  have 
urged—albeit  in  other  contexts—that  consumers  should  receive  meaningful  disclo-
sures  about  such  services,  and  that  states  must  be  able  to  enforce  any  Federal 
standards using existing procedures and penalties. 

There  are  many  circumstances  that  explain  why  a  consumer  may  not  report  a 
complaint.  They  may  not  know  who  to  call  or  where  to  file  a  complaint.  The  value 
of  the  card  may  not  justify  the  hassle  of  trying  to  get  a  refund  or  assistance.  Also 
language  skills  and  cultural  barriers,  particularly  for  recent  immigrants,  can  make 
it difficult for some consumers to file complaints. There needs to be a proactive out-
reach  effort  to  ensure  consumers  know  that  there  are  rules  that  protect  them  and 
how to seek assistance. 

Many NARUC member commissions actively address calling card abuses. Several 
States,  including  Texas,  California,  and  my  home  State  of  New  York  have  laws 
specifying  required  disclosures,  including  notice  requirements  at  the  point  of  sale, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

38 

verbal disclosures at the beginning of calls, and a required warning 1 minute before 
a card is depleted. As in most consumer service matters, a small number of bad ac-
tors  create  the  bulk  of  the  consumer  complaints.  What  troubles  me  is  the  negative 
impact  those  bad  actors  can  have  on  the  industry  which  is  also  comprised  of  many 
service  providers  that  deliver  quality  service  at  reasonable  prices.  The  reputable 
providers make up the heart of the industry and should embrace the rules proposed 
in S. 2998. 

The fraud and inadequate disclosure problems which are the focus of this bill can-
not  be  handled  by  market  forces.  The  partnership  established  in  Sections  Six  and 
Eight of S. 2998 recognizes that, under State procedures, consumer concerns can be 
addressed promptly, often through informal processes. Also, Section Eight effectively 
incorporates  NARUC’s  general  positions  that  (a)  Federal  rules  should  be  ‘‘[a]  floor, 
not  a  ceiling,’’  as  ‘‘. . .  blanket  preemption  on  consumer  affairs  will  restrict  con-
sumer  redress  in  the  future,’’  and  (b)  that  ‘‘. . .  consumers  should  not  have  to  wait 
for Federal rulemaking every time a new issue arises.’’ 

S. 2998 recognizes that, even in those instances when minimum Federal consumer 
protection standards are appropriate, states must be allowed to enforce those stand-
ards  and  to  adopt  more  specific  standards  where  needed.  This  bill  also  provides 
states with flexibility in the method of enforcement. Section Six of the bill empowers 
a State AG, PUC or other authorized State consumer protection agency to bring civil 
action against a carrier that violates its provisions. This is wholly appropriate. 

States  vary  on  their  method  of  enforcement.  In  some  states  consumer  complaints 
may  go  to  the  Attorney  General,  in  others  complaints  go  to  the  PUC  or  another 
agency.  The  Federal  Government  should  not  dictate  the  agency  or  procedure  for 
State  enforcement.  Such  Federal  dictates  would  require  states  to  waste  taxpayer 
dollars to shift resources to different agencies. In addition, such a change could only 
cause consumer confusion by changing the current contact State agency. 

From  an  enforcement  standpoint  S.  2998  is  a  clear  win  for  consumers  because  it 
not  only  establishes  clear  national  standards,  but  it  also  couples  those  standards 
with  coextensive  Federal  and  State  enforcement.  NARUC  does  suggest  one  minor 
addition to Section 6(c)(5) to make clear that states can use existing administrative 
penalties as well as procedures to ‘‘enforce the provisions of the law of such state.’’ 1 
With  this  very  minor  change,  the  bill  clearly  ensures  multiple  ‘‘cops  on  the  beat’’ 
protecting consumers from bad actors. 
Conclusion 

NARUC  supports  the  jurisdictional  balance  struck  in  The  Prepaid  Calling  Card 
Consumer  Protection  Act  of  2008.  As  drafted,  the  bill  provides  consumers  with  in-
creased  national  disclosure  requirements  and  ensures  strong  enforcement  of  na-
tional standards by allowing states to enforce those standards. It also efficiently pre-
serves existing State options for consumer relief. 

Thanks again for the opportunity to testify. I look forward to your questions. 

APPENDIX A 

STATEMENT BY CHAIRMAN BARRY SMITHERMAN 

PUBLIC UTILITY COMMISSION OF TEXAS 

July 30, 2008 

Executive Summary 

On  May  23,  2008,  the  Texas  Attorney  General  filed  the  state’s  first  enforcement 
action against a prepaid calling card company, Next-G Communications, Inc. The in-
vestigation  which  led  to  the  enforcement  action  was  done  in  conjunction  with  the 
Public Utility Commission of Texas, and determined that Next-G’s calling cards con-
sistently  delivered  only  40  percent  of  the  minutes  on  international  calls  claimed  in 
the advertising for the cards. 

The results of the investigation show that Next-G inadequately disclosed the fees 
and charges associated with each call, reducing the number of minutes available for 
calling.  The  Texas  Attorney  General  filed  the  enforcement  action  under  the  Texas 
Deceptive Trade Practices-Consumer Protection Act. 
History 

Beginning in 2004, staff from the Consumer Protection Division of the Public Util-
ity Commission of Texas investigated whether calling card companies were following 
the  advertising  and  disclosure  requirements  under  the  Public  Utility  Commission 

1 Specifically, Section 6(c)(5) should be revised to read: ‘‘to establish or utilize existing admin-

istrative procedures or penalties to enforce the provisions of the law of such state.’’ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

39 

Substantive  Rule  26.34.  The  initial  investigation  revealed  that  calling  card  compa-
nies  were  not  following  the  Commission  rule  related  to  accurate  disclosure  of  rates 
and  charges  on  the  card  or  at  the  point  of  sale.  The  Commission  rule  also  requires 
that  enforcement  actions  for  fraudulent,  unfair,  misleading,  deceptive,  or  anti-
competitive  business  practices  will  be  coordinated  with  the  Texas  Attorney  General 
in order to ensure consistent treatment of specific alleged violations. Customer Pro-
tection  notified  the  Texas  AG’s  Office  of  the  issues  relating  to  the  accurate  disclo-
sure  of  information  to  customers,  and  during  the  summer  and  fall  of  2007,  worked 
with the Texas Attorney General’s Office to test the calling cards from Next-G Com-
munications to determine the number of minutes that the cards provided. 

During  the  investigation  on  the  Next-G  calling  cards,  Customer  Protection  staff 
made calls to numbers in Honduras and El Salvador using $5 and $10 calling cards 
purchased  in  San  Antonio,  which  are  typical  of  the  calling  cards  purchased  at  con-
venience and grocery stores. Consumer Protection Staff made several different types 
of  calls  using  different  calling  cards:  ‘‘straight  line’’  calls  to  the  target  phone  num-
bers,  where  a  call  is  made  until  it  is  terminated  by  the  provider,  five-minute  calls, 
and  10-minute  calls.  When  calls  were  made  using  the  calling  cards,  a  voice  prompt 
is  given  at  the  beginning  of  each  call  stating  the  number  of  minutes  available  for 
each  call.  The  minutes  stated  in  the  voice  prompt  were  compared  to  that  actual 
number of minutes received or to the minutes stated in a subsequent call using the 
same card. 

The  results  of  the  investigation  showed  that  callers  often  received  less  than  half 
of  the  minutes  advertised.  For  example,  when  calls  were  made  to  Honduras  using 
the $5 calling cards, the voice prompt indicated that there was 35 minutes of calling 
time.  Callers  received  only  12  minutes  for  these  calls.  With  calls  to  El  Salvador 
using  the  $5  cards,  the  first  five-minute  call  would  use  up  18  minutes  of  calling 
time, and the first 10-minute call would use 25 minutes of calling time, as indicated 
by comparing the minutes stated on the voice prompt in subsequent calls. 

Based on the results of the investigation, the Texas Attorney General filed a law-
suit asserting that Next-G engaged in false, deceptive and misleading acts and prac-
tices,  specifically,  not  providing  the  minutes  offered  in  the  advertisements  or  voice 
prompt  at  the  beginning  of  phone  calls,  and  using  advertising  with  vague,  mis-
leading, and confusing disclosures about fees and charges. The Attorney General re-
quested  that  the  defendant  disgorge  all  money  fraudulently  taken  from  individuals 
and businesses, and requested a temporary and permanent injunction against Next- 
G selling cards that do not give all the minutes advertised or indicated in the voice 
prompt. The lawsuit is currently proceeding in State District Court in San Antonio. 
Conclusion 

Based  on  the  investigation  of  the  Next-G  calling  cards,  it  is  obvious  that  some 
calling  card  companies  mislead  and  confuse  customers  by  including  vague  disclo-
sures on charges and rates that dramatically alter the number of minutes available 
to  a  customer.  Customers  that  use  calling  cards,  especially  for  international  calls, 
are generally immigrant or low income individuals attempting to contact families or 
friends.  Calling  card  companies  should  be  required  to  accurately  disclose  the  fees 
and charges, rather than use incomplete and misleading language. By putting these 
precise  terms  up  front,  customers  will  be  aware  of  what  they  are  paying  for,  and 
can make better decisions in choosing their telecommunications needs. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

40 

APPENDIX B 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.

2
P
M
A
C
A
0
1
9

.

s
p
e
1
P
M
A
C
A
0
1
9

41 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.

4
P
M
A
C
A
0
1
9

.

s
p
e
3
P
M
A
C
A
0
1
9

42 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.

6
P
M
A
C
A
0
1
9

.

s
p
e
5
P
M
A
C
A
0
1
9

43 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.

8
P
M
A
C
A
0
1
9

.

s
p
e
7
P
M
A
C
A
0
1
9

44 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.

0
1
P
M
A
C
A
0
1
9

.

s
p
e
9
P
M
A
C
A
0
1
9

45 

Senator NELSON. Senator Pryor? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.

2
1
P
M
A
C
A
0
1
9

.

s
p
e
1
1
P
M
A
C
A
0
1
9

46 

STATEMENT OF HON. MARK PRYOR, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ARKANSAS 

Senator  PRYOR.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  and  thank  you  for 

doing this. 

If  I  may,  I  would  like  to  direct  my  first  question  to  Ms.  Green-
berg,  and  that  is,  out  there  in  the  marketplace,  out  in  the  field 
right  now,  if  someone  has  a  problem  with  a  calling  card,  what  do 
they do right now? 

Ms.  GREENBERG.  Well,  as  has  been  mentioned,  there  are  State 
regulators. I think I would probably call my state. I would tell con-
sumers,  as  we  do,  to  call  their  state  Attorney  General’s  Office  or 
whoever  runs  their  consumer  protection  division  in  the  State.  I 
would  recommend  they  report  a  loss  of  minutes  and  money  spent 
on these cards to the FTC as well. We know the FTC has been in-
volved. And people do call us about the cards and complain. 

I  myself  use  the  cards  because  I  have  friends.  You  know,  I  lived 
abroad for a period of time and I have friends who are abroad. And 
what I noticed is, when I lived abroad, the calling cards there actu-
ally deliver the minutes that are promised. Here the series of cards 
you buy at the five-and-dime typically are shockingly quick to sub-
tract your minutes. 

So I think that there are places that you can call. 
I  think  there  are  very  good  possibilities  for  enforcement.  I  do 
think that the low barriers to entry do militate for a kind of bond-
ing  system  that  we  need  to  have  and  some  State  legislation  calls 
for that kind of thing. 

Senator  PRYOR.  If  someone  does  complain,  say,  for  example,  to 
their  state  Attorney  General,  or  whoever  does  their  consumer 
work—I  think  in  Florida  it  is  actually  the  Department  of  Agri-
culture—what remedy is available? Does he get his money back, or 
what does he get usually? 

Ms.  GREENBERG.  Well,  I  think  the  satisfaction  comes  in  com-
plaining  because  the  likelihood  that  you  are  going  to  get  your 
money  back  on  a  $2  card  from  state  regulators  at  this  point  really 
has not proven very fruitful. 

There  are  also  class  action  lawsuits  brought  by  attorneys.  That 
is one way to try to distribute some money. But the money is going 
to  be  pretty  negligible.  So  consumers  are  really  left  holding  the 
bag. 

Senator  PRYOR.  Have  there  been  class  action  lawsuits  on  these 

cards? 

Ms.  GREENBERG.  Yes.  My  understanding  is  there  have  been  a 

couple of class action lawsuits on prepaid calling cards. 

Senator PRYOR. Commissioner Acampora? 
Ms. ACAMPORA. Yes. 
Senator PRYOR. How many complaints do you all receive in New 

York? Do you track those? I mean, how is that working there? 

Ms. ACAMPORA. Well, the complaints that do come in to our office 
we can track. We have an Office Of Consumer Services. But in the 
State of New York, they could be calling the Attorney General’s Of-
fice  on  their  own  also.  They  could  be  calling  the  Consumer  Protec-
tion  Board.  If  they  are  in  New  York  City,  they  could  be  using  the 
consumer  services  in  New  York  City.  So  it  would  be  kind  of  hard 
to track all the various entities that consumers could use. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

47 

However, when you are dealing with a population that are immi-
grants  and  some  do  not  speak  English,  I  think  most  of  the  time 
people do not complain. They just suck it up and they lose the cost 
of the card. So it would be hard to estimate how many do not even 
call. 

Senator PRYOR. Right. I am sure that is the case. Given the dol-
lar  amounts  involved  here,  I  think  a  lot  of  people  probably  simply 
do not call. 

And  let  me  ask  all  the  panelists,  if  I  may,  your  thoughts  on 
whether  you  believe  the  Federal  Trade  Commission  is  doing 
enough  and  if  you  think  Congressional  action  is  necessary.  Do  you 
want to go ahead, Ms. Greenberg? 

Ms.  GREENBERG.  Yes.  We  are  certainly  supportive  of  your  bill, 
Senator Nelson, and Congressman Engel’s bill as well. I think dis-
closure  is  critical,  and  it  will  be  certainly  helpful  in  at  least,  I 
think, diminishing somewhat the bad actors. 

You know, I would go a few steps further in terms of—I have al-
ready  talked  about  I  think  a  bond  should  be  put  up.  I  also  think 
there  is  an  unconscionability  factor  here  in  the  rates  because,  as 
we saw with your fantastic posters here, there is disclosure. It may 
be  fine  print,  but  there  is  disclosure.  It  is  not  always  honest  in 
terms  of  what  you  get.  But  Black’s  Law  Dictionary  defines 
unconscionability as, ‘‘unconscionability is generally regarded to in-
clude an absence of meaningful choice on the part of one of the par-
ties to a contract, together with contract terms which are unreason-
ably  favorable  to  the  other  party.’’  Boy,  is  this  an  example  of  that. 
So  I  guess  I  would  push  for  something  a  little  stronger.  I  have 

talked about that in my written testimony. 

And  also,  you  know,  the  ability  to  compare  rates.  That  is  a  crit-
ical  tool  that  consumers  use.  But  these  card  sellers,  the  vendors, 
come in and out of the market. It is very hard. You know, you can 
go  1  week  to  your  local  store  and  buy  one  of  these,  and  then  the 
next week, this card is not there anymore. So we do not know who 
is  behind  these  cards.  I  do  not  have  a  good  feeling  about  the  rep-
utation  of  many  of  these  companies.  But  I  think  we  really  have  to 
get tough with them and start to learn who they are and allow con-
sumers  to  compare  rates  between  cards  so  then  they  can  pick  and 
choose and use the marketplace to make their choices. 

Senator  PRYOR.  Mr.  West,  do  you  feel  like  we  need  legislation? 
Mr.  WEST.  Yes,  sir.  We  at  The  Hispanic  Institute  probably  be-
lieve  that  the  FTC  has  not  done  enough,  and  we  do  need  legisla-
tion, sir. 

Senator PRYOR. Commissioner? 
Ms.  ACAMPORA.  Yes,  I  definitely  think  so.  Your  legislation  is 
great. In fact, it has made us in New York look at what we already 
have, and I think we need to strengthen that. 

But  the  legislation  is—definitely  you  need  the  legislation.  As  a 

former legislator, I can tell you that. 

Senator PRYOR. Ms. O’Brien? 
Ms.  O’BRIEN.  Yes,  sir.  With  regard  to  the  portion  of  the  market 
that  I  will  call  the  bottom-feeding  portion  of  the  market,  I  think 
that  you  do  need  legislation.  I  would  suggest  strongly  to  you  that 
you  make  clear  who  has  the  responsibilities  for  enforcement.  Do 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

48 

not put a little piece over here and a little piece over there because 
I think ultimately that will water everything down. 

My own experience, particularly in military, is that frequently, to 
sort of harken back to your previous question a little bit, when peo-
ple had an issue and they called the customer service line, the com-
pany  was  always  very  good  about  trying  to  resolve  it.  And  fre-
quently we found that a lot of their complaints were, frankly, pure 
misunderstanding  on  their  part,  with  regard  to  how  the  system 
worked  or  what  they  were  actually  getting.  They  were  very  quick 
to jump the gun and believe that there was an issue with our com-
pany  ripping  off  service  members;  but  that  was  clearly  not  the 
case,  once  we  were  able  to  explain  it  to  them.  If  there  was  at  any 
point  an  irreconciliable  beef,  and  they  felt  uncomfortable  about  it, 
we  would  either  refund  their  money  or  give  them  an  additional 
card if that satisfied them. 

I think those kinds of issues are always going to be around. I do 
not  think  that  legislation  should  in  some  way,  shape,  or  form 
hinder the companies that are doing a good job, but for the bottom 
feeders, yes, I think legislation is necessary. But again, clear over-
sight as to who is responsible for enforcement. 

Senator PRYOR. Thank you. 
Mr. Chairman, thank you again for holding the hearing but also 
for your work on this issue because there really is some bad activ-
ity going on out there that we need to address. Thank you for your 
leadership on this issue. 

Senator NELSON. Thank you. 
Senator Thune? 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN THUNE, 
U.S. SENATOR FROM SOUTH DAKOTA 

Senator  THUNE.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  and  I  too  want  to 
thank  you  for  holding  the  hearing  today.  And  I  appreciate  all  the 
witnesses  making  time  to  come  up  and  testify.  Although  I  missed 
the  earlier  panel,  I  know  that  Representative  Engel  in  the  House 
has a bill, has a great interest in this issue. 

Calling  cards  are  particularly  important,  I  think,  for  recent  im-
migrants  and  low  income  consumers  who  may  not  have  access  to 
other  telecommunication  services  and,  at  the  same  time,  may  not 
have  a  lot  of  knowledge  of  the  consumer  protection  laws,  our  lan-
guage  in  some  cases,  how  to  register  complaints  against  providers 
when  those  laws  are  violated.  And  because  of  this,  I  believe  that 
violations  of  consumer  protection  laws  in  the  prepaid  calling  card 
market are particularly egregious, and I am pleased to see that the 
FTC has recently undertaken actions to enforce those laws. 

And I look forward to supporting proposals that ensure that con-
sumers have the opportunity to acquire the necessary, relevant in-
formation when purchasing prepaid calling cards. 

And  I  want  to  thank  the  witnesses  for  their  testimony  and  their 

effort to protect our Nation’s consumers. 

And  I  want  to  just  follow  up  and  maybe  drill  down  a  little  bit 

from what Senator Pryor asked with regard to legislation. 

First  off,  I  guess  I  am  interested  in  whether  you  have  seen  any 
improvements  in  the  prepaid  calling  card  market  after  the  FTC’s 
recent actions. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

49 

Mr. WEST. We have done testing over the last couple months and 
we  really  have  not  seen  any  improvement  in  what  is  being  prom-
ised  and  what  is  being  delivered  at  this  point.  So  we  have  no  evi-
dence of any improvement even though there is stuff going on with 
Attorneys  General  around  the  country,  State  legislatures,  and  this 
legislation  being  introduced.  We  have  no  scientific  data  to  support 
that. 

Senator  THUNE.  You  talked  about  perhaps  Congress  acting  in 
this  regard.  Is  that  a  preferred  approach  to  having  states  enact 
some  sort  of  legislative  framework  and  accountability  at  that  level 
as  opposed  to  having  Federal  legislation  and  oversight  and  a 
framework for addressing this? I mean, you said many of the states 
are acting—— 

Mr.  WEST.  Well,  like  what  has  happened  in  Florida  where  they 
have  settled  with  some  companies,  the  problem  is  they  have  only 
settled  with  10  companies  there.  There  are  many  other  companies 
doing  business  there.  And  then  that  legislation  and  those  efforts 
are restricted to Florida only. So you have the other 49 states still 
going about their business. So I think that while we welcome what 
is  happening  in  the  individual  states,  it  would  be  a  piecemeal  ef-
fort. 

Senator  THUNE.  How  many  states  have  taken  steps  in  the  form 

Mr. WEST. Somebody here on the panel may have more informa-

of a legislative solution? 

tion on it than I do. 

We  know  that  New  Jersey  has  taken  action  in  the  legislature. 
We think the Attorney General Brown in California, Attorney Gen-
eral  Cuomo  are  looking  at  this  now.  I  know  the  District  of  Colum-
bia  is  looking  at  legislation  now.  So  we  have  been  in  contact  with 
the  Attorney  General  in  Illinois  also.  So  there  is  a  lot  of  activity. 
We  have  recently  been  contacted  by  the  City  of  San  Francisco.  So 
now it seems like some cities are getting involved also. 

Ms.  GREENBERG.  If  I  can  jump  in.  I  think  our  preference  from  a 
consumer standpoint, consumer advocacy standpoint, is to have the 
Federal  legislation  require  some  sort  of  baseline  disclosure,  as  S. 
2998  does,  and  then  allow  the  states  to  focus  on  companies  that 
may actually be located there. 

One  other  suggestion  I  had  is  that  perhaps  the  industry  needs 
to  set  some  voluntary  standards,  which  members  of  the  industry 
can  agree  to.  We  talk  about  bottom  feeders  and  we  could  maybe 
cast away some of the worst actors and get the industry to—— 

Senator  THUNE.  Is  there  any  of  that  kind  of  self-policing  going 
on  today?  I  mean,  does  the  industry  have  any  sort  of  baseline  vol-
untary requirements—— 

Ms. GREENBERG. I have not seen any evidence of that, but maybe 

others on the panel know. 

Mr. WEST. I think, Senator, there was one company that ran into 
some  trouble,  and  now  they  are  trying  to  get  everybody  else  on-
board  to  deliver  what  they  are  promising.  But  I  do  not  think  that 
they  did  it  out  of  altruistic  reasons  or  anything  like  that.  So  I  do 
not see it happening. 

Ms. ACAMPORA. Senator, to your question about how many states 
are  active.  NARUC  undertook  a  quick  survey  of  its  members  on 
this issue; and of 30 respondents, the PUCs in 18 states had rules 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

50 

and  handled  consumer  complaints  regarding  prepaid  calling  cards. 
Eighteen states have legislation. 

Senator THUNE. OK. And do the states who have enacted legisla-
tion—are  they  similar  in  terms  of—is  everybody  taking  a  different 
approach to this? Is there any agreement, I guess, on kind of what 
a formula would be to—— 

Ms. ACAMPORA. I think that is really why the Federal legislation 
would  be  very  helpful,  and  just  going  through  the  legislation,  as  I 
said previously, what we have set up in New York definitely could 
be  strengthened  by  some  of  the  ideas  and  some  of  the  mechanics 
set forth in this legislation. 

Senator THUNE. Is it the consensus pretty much of everybody on 
the  panel  that  we  do  need  some  sort  of  Federal  legislative  action 
on this? Is that fair to say? 

Ms. ACAMPORA. I think so. 
Ms. GREENBERG. From our perspective, yes. Like a baseline, a set 
of  sort  of  minimum  standards  for  disclosure  and  other  issues  the 
bill addresses I think would be very helpful. 

Ms. O’BRIEN. If I may, I would also like to add I think some con-
sumer education would be extremely helpful to many people. If we 
make  them  smarter,  they  will  not  make  the  mistake  of  buying  a 
bottom feeder’s card is what it comes down to. And I am sure there 
has been a lot of that, but speaking for someone who had responsi-
bility for the military for 8 years, we spent millions of dollars edu-
cating military consumers. 

And  to  your  question  regarding  self-policing,  we  had  a  standard 
within  the  company  not  to  produce  any  form  of  card  for  the  mili-
tary  consumer  that  could  in  any  way,  shape,  or  form  be  conceived 
or  construed  as  deceptive.  But  nonetheless,  when  the  Iraq  War 
broke  out,  I  had  literally  thousands  of  complaints  that  were  borne 
out  of,  frankly,  just  plain  ignorance  of  how  prepaid  cards  work, 
why  the  rates  are  different  from  card  to  card,  why  a  card  pur-
chased at the U.S. Post Office was different than a card purchased 
at Sam’s Club or Wal-Mart or anywhere else. 

So  while  enforcement  is  important,  I  think  that  we  just  cannot 
dismiss  this  as  a  bowl  of  Jello  that  is  easily  understood.  It  takes 
a  little  understanding.  And  for  that  reason,  I  would  strongly  rec-
ommend consumer education wherever we can. 

Ms.  ACAMPORA.  Could  I  just  piggyback  on  that?  We  rec-
ommended in our testimony that the packaging be changed because 
most  people  take  the  packaging,  rip  it  up.  I  am  not  an  expert  on 
how  you  manufacture,  but  maybe  providers  could  double  the  size 
of  the  card  but  allow  it  to  be  folded  in  half  which  would  make  it 
a  little  bit  thicker.  But  currently  holding  onto  that  packaging  is 
really  key  because  that  is  what  gives  a  lot  of  the  information  we 
in  N.Y.  need  for  enforcement  to  investigate.  And  certainly  if  they 
were  buying  it  also  through  a  website,  there  needs  to  be  informa-
tion on that website too, which would be helpful. 

Senator THUNE. Very good. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Thank you all. 
Senator NELSON. I want to go back to something that one of you 
said  about  the  distribution  of  the  cards  through  merchants.  What 
do  we  do  there?  And  as  distribution  technology  changes  and  then 
eventually  you  are  going  to  have  virtual  cards  available  on  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

51 

Internet,  it  is  going  to  make  enforcement  harder.  Ms.  O’Brien, 
what do you think about all this? 

Ms. O’BRIEN. You have virtual cards now. AT&T makes a virtual 
card  available,  prepaid  cards  available,  to  the  military  community 
through  the  military  exchanges.  You  need  only  go  to  their  website 
and  plunk  down  your  form  of  payment,  whatever  that  might  be,  a 
credit  card,  military  STAR  card,  and  as  a  result,  you  will  get  e- 
mailed back to you the virtual PIN number that you need to make 
a  call,  along  with  all  the  terms  and  conditions  that  apply  to  that 
particular card. 

Yes,  it  will  complicate  enforcement,  to  be  sure.  Again,  I  would 
come  back  to  the  notion  of  education  as  being  something  to  help 
overcome some of the issues. 

Senator  NELSON.  Does  anybody  else  want  to  comment  on  that? 
Ms. ACAMPORA. Thank you. I think again that you should include 
in the e-mail the terms and conditions to the customers if they pur-
chased  it  online.  But  I  think  your  bill  does  strike  a  very  good  bal-
ance,  and  you  have  specified  disclosures  for  online  services.  And 
giving  the  FTC  rulemaking  authority  with  sufficient  flexibility  to 
address  some  new  attempts  to  bypass  some  of  those  protections— 
I think you have to kind of work on that. 

Senator NELSON. As we were talking and we had those examples 
up  here  of  fine  print  and  information  that  you  really  cannot  read, 
we  need  to  provide  more  information  for  the  consumer  to  beware. 
But what is the practical way to obtain this? 

Now,  the  language  barrier  is  clearly  a  problem  that  we  have  al-
ready  unveiled  here.  But  rates  and  conditions  are  not  printed  on 
the  card  packaging.  So  some  of  you  have  suggested  in  your  testi-
mony  either  attaching  a  rate  card  to  the  calling  card  or  listing  a 
website address or a toll-free number. Talk about this. 

Ms.  O’BRIEN.  Sir,  I  could  tell  you  that  AT&T  cards  frequently 
had,  depending  on  the  nature  of  the  card  and  the  size  of  the  card 
and  how  it  was  going  to  be  sold,  and  in  order  to  make  full  disclo-
sure,  a  separate  leaflet  inserted  that  had  virtually  all  the  terms 
and conditions on it. And I can tell you if you walked onto any mili-
tary  base,  after  service  members  bought  those  cards,  what  you 
would  see  are  those  leaflets  all  over  the  bottom  of  the  phone 
booths. People just would not read them. And so that was when we 
really  determined  that  we  needed  to  educate  people  as  to  how  to 
use them and how to be smart consumers when buying them. 

I  don’t  know  how  you  get  around  that  need  for  education  issue 
with  the  vast  majority  of  Americans.  Still  today  grandpa  buys  a 
card  for  his  grandson  in  Iraq,  and  it  does  not  go  the  way  he  ex-
pected. And he bought it from the U.S. Post Office when he picked 
up  his  stamps,  and  he  is  angry  about  it.  It  is  an  issue.  It  is  an 
issue honestly I am not quite sure you could address. 

More information, of course, is always better, but it has to be in-
formation  that  is  willing  to  be  consumed.  It  cannot  just  be  a  5- 
pound  pile  of  something;  it  needs  to  be  better  than  mice  type  that 
people are just going to throw on the floor. 

Mr. WEST. Senator? 
Senator NELSON. Mr. West? 
Mr.  WEST.  One  of  the  things  when  you  buy  one  of  these—we 
were  talking  earlier  about  the  class  action  suit,  and  the  thing  is 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

52 

you  throw  the  card  away.  So  there  is  no  way  of  really  reclaiming 
the  money  that  you  have  lost.  And  I  think  that  the  Internet  activ-
ity  will—you  know,  if  there  are  virtual  cards  and  so  forth,  it  will 
be  easier  to  track  your  loss  of  money  and  compensate  people  who 
have been fraudulently dealt with. 

But  one  of  the  issues  is  that  these  companies  will—you  know,  if 
a  consumer  is  educated,  he  will  spend  3  months  using  a  card  and 
getting all the minutes that they want. And what the company will 
do is suddenly pull the rug out from under them and in the fourth 
month  try  to  recoup  a  lot  of  the  profits—you  know,  increase  that 
profit  margin.  So  if  he  thought  he  was  buying  a  good  card  for  2 
months,  in  the  third,  fourth  month,  he  is  not  buying  a  good  card. 
Senator NELSON. Ms. Greenberg, in your testimony you say that 
the  FTC  ought  to  appoint  a  monitor  to  oversee  the  industry.  How 
should that work? 

Ms.  GREENBERG.  What  we  suggested  is  let  us  look  at  how  well 
disclosure  works.  Your  bill  sets  out  some  very  good  and  strong  re-
quirements  for  disclosure.  Give  it  a  year.  Let  us  have  the  FTC 
oversee how the industry is, if it is improving. 

You  know,  I  am  concerned  about  the  cards  that  you  go  in  and 
get at the—I get them at the gas station. This is a $6 billion indus-
try. These cards do not deliver what they say they are going to de-
liver.  The  fine  print  tells  you  that  you  are  being  ripped  off.  You 
read  it.  You  read  it  out  loud.  It  is  a  $2  card  and  99  cents  comes 
off the card each time you make a call. You do not have any money 
on  this  card.  So  we  have  really  got  to  get  a  handle  on  how  we  are 
going to rein in what I think is really a colossal rip-off for so many 
consumers. 

So  what  we  are  recommending  is  that  the  FTC  come  back,  take 
a  look  and  see  how  the  disclosure  has  worked.  I  think  disclosure 
will  have  a  positive  impact.  Whether  it  will  rein  in  sort  of  a  level 
of  fraud  and  scamming  that  is  going  on,  particularly  of  folks  who 
do  not  speak  English,  who  have  relatives  overseas,  who  are  not 
going  to  take  any  action,  not  going  to  take  any  corrective  action— 
they  are  generally  not  going  to  be  part  of  a  class  action  lawsuit. 
They  are  probably  not  going  to  report  this  to  the  FTC.  These  are 
the  people  that  I  am  most  concerned  about  protecting,  and  I  think 
the FTC could come back in, take a look at where we are in a year, 
and see whether these practices have been reined in. 

Senator  NELSON.  A  couple  years  ago  when  I  got  involved  in  pre-
venting  the  fleecing  of  military  members  on  payday  loans  with  ex-
orbitant  interest  that  was  being  charged  to  service  members—and 
we were able to pass that legislation—I heard all the way up to the 
Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff about how military members 
were being hurt. 

Now,  I  have  not  heard  that  commentary,  which  does  not  mean 
that  it  is  not  there.  And  I  am  curious,  Ms.  O’Brien.  Do  you  think 
the  Pentagon  is  aware  of  this  particular  fleecing  that  is  going  on 
of the military community? 

Ms. O’BRIEN. Yes, sir. I think that they are. I think the order of 
magnitude  of  the  problem  in  the  military  specifically  may  not  be 
as  large  as  you  might  think  it  is.  Generally  speaking,  most  cards 
that military people buy and use personally are purchased at their 
exchanges.  The  exchanges  do  a  very  good  job  of  educating  their 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

53 

own consumers about the cards that they buy, why they are better 
than the cards they would buy on the outside, and in point of fact, 
why  in  the  countries  where  military  people  use  cards  the  most, 
they are the best cards you can get, bar none. 

I  would  also  add  to  that,  though,  that  cards  that  come  as  gifts, 
of course, there will be some complaints about those cards because 
frequently  those  cards  were  never  designed  to  be  used  in  the  mili-
tary. 

Third,  I  would  add  that  the  military  is  a  very  tight  fraternity, 
and  so  1st  Sergeants  are  very,  very  scrupulous  about  making  sure 
that their charges know exactly how to use cards, exactly what re-
tailers to stay away from, exactly where they should be doing their 
purchasing of cards. But that is not to say that family members of 
military  people  are  not  affected  by  this  problem  because  clearly 
they are. But generally speaking, the military itself—— 

Senator NELSON. You gave the example of a grandpa who wants 
to buy a card for his grandson who is deployed to Iraq or Afghani-
stan. 

Ms. O’BRIEN. Yes. That was based on an actual experience where 
a veteran himself, a retired marine, had bought a card at his local 
post  office  for  a  grandson  who  was  in  Iraq,  and  he  assumed  that 
a  card  purchased  at  the  post  office  would  be  a  good  card  for  that 
purpose.  Of  course,  he  was  retired  many  years  out  of  the  service, 
not  familiar  with  the  current  state-of-the-art.  And  actually  in  his 
time,  he  was  lucky  if  there  were  pay  phones,  much  less  cards.  So 
even  though  he  himself  was  former  military,  he  did  not  have  the 
level  of  education  that  most  military  people  have  today.  And  for 
that reason, he purchased a card that was not well suited for a call 
back to the United States from Iraq. 

Senator  NELSON.  Does  anybody  on  the  staff  want  to  ask  any 

more questions? 

OK.  Well,  this  has  been  most  enlightening.  Thank  you.  We  are 

going to proceed with this legislation. Thank you. 

And the meeting is adjourned. 
[Whereupon, at 11:19 a.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

Loyola Consumer Law Review, Vol. 19:1—2006 

DECEPTIVE CLAIMS FOR PREPAID TELEPHONE CARDS AND THE NEED FOR REGULATION 

I. Introduction 

Mark E. Budnitz *, Martina Rojo †1, Julia Marlowe ‡ 

The  United  States  prepaid  phone  card  industry  is  a  multi-billion  dollar  industry. 
In  2002,  prepaid  long  distance  cards  alone  generated  $3.6  billion  and  the  industry 
is  estimated  to  grow  significantly.1 Growth  in  the  market  for  prepaid  phone  cards 
is expected to continue, in part because sales are linked to the increasing use of cel-
lular phones.2 Already the bulk of convenience stores’ general merchandise sales are 
for  prepaid  phone  cards.3 In  fact,  one  industry  source  reports  that  phone  cards  are 
the highest profit center in Walgreens stores after prescriptions.4 

The cards are often promoted to niche markets consisting of college students, im-
migrants and certain businesses.5 According to Barry Catmar, Vice President of Op-
erations for Digitac, ‘‘the large number of immigrants who call friends and relatives 
abroad  is  a  perfect  market  for  phone  cards.’’ 6 The  increase  in  the  immigrant  popu-
lation  in  the  United  States,  especially  Latino  consumers,  has  led  to  the  marketing 
of some cards specifically to the Spanish-speaking consumer.7 As a result, the mar-
ket for prepaid telephone cards is segmented and some groups of consumers are par-
ticularly  vulnerable.8 There  is  evidence  that  consumers  in  the  United  States  who 
use cards to call Spanish-speaking countries face much higher prices than expected 
due to hidden fees and confusing, contradictory and inaccurate information.9 

In  most  states,  there  is  little  or  no  regulation  of  prepaid  telephone  cards.  Thus 
most  states  do  not  require  phone  card  companies  to  disclose  essential  information 
and  substantive  rights  that  ensure  consumers  receive  satisfactory  service.  Con-
sequently,  information  provided  on  the  cards  and  by  customer  service  representa-
tives is often misleading or unavailable.10 

Consumers  have  few  rights,  and  even  where  consumers  do  have  rights  that  are 
violated, it is often difficult for them to obtain a remedy. Additionally, because each 
card has a small monetary value, litigation is not always a viable option, especially 
if  contracts  include  arbitration  clauses  and  prohibit  class  actions.11 For  example, 
low-income  consumers  are  likely  to  purchase  cards  that  sell  for  less  than  $10,  ren-
dering the apparent cost of using prepaid phone cards insignificant. Because of their 
low  income,  however,  the  cumulative  cost  may  be  significant.12 Furthermore,  many 
immigrants  have  no  alternative  if  they  need  the  cards  in  order  to  communicate  by 
phone with their families in another country. 

Given  these  conditions,  the  Federal  and  the  state  governments  should  consider 
passing  legislation  to  regulate  phone  cards.  On  the  Federal  level,  both  the  Federal 
Trade Commission (FTC) and the Federal Communications Commission (FCC) have 
done little to address the problems other than minimal enforcement of current inad-
equate regulations. The FTC has addressed few instances of deceptive advertising,13 
and  the  FCC  currently  enforces  the  limited  area  of  federally  required  fees  on  pre-
paid  phone  cards.14 On  the  state  level,  consumer  protection  varies  greatly.  Legisla-
tion is warranted unless (1) the market works and consumers acting reasonably are 
able  to  make  efficient  choices  and  protect  themselves,  (2)  the  loss  to  consumers  is 
small and there are few reported consumer problems, and (3) market conditions are 
such  that  the  industry  can  be  counted  upon  to  engage  in  effective  self-regulation. 
This  article  explores  the  need  for  legislation  by  reviewing  a  combination  of  ap-
proaches,  including  an  economic  analysis  of  the  market  for  prepaid  phone  cards, 
findings  from  an  empirical  study  of  Hispanic  phone  card  usage  in  calling  Spanish- 
speaking countries, and the current law on this issue. The results of this investiga-
tion demonstrate a need for national regulation. We recommend that Congress enact 
a  statute  which  mandates  a  minimum  standard  of  protection  and  authorizes  the 
FTC  to  issue  regulations.  Such  a  Federal  statute  would  also  contain  disclosures, 
substantive protections, and consumer remedies. Additionally, states should be per-

(55) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

56 

mitted  to  enact  requirements  that  provide  more  protection  as  long  as  they  are  not 
inconsistent with the Federal law. If Congress decides not to pass a Federal statute, 
state  legislatures  can  easily  adopt  the  features  of  our  Model  Prepaid  Telephone 
Card Act. 
II. Is Regulation Necessary? The Lessons from Economic Theory 

Regulation  is  not  necessary  if  consumers  act  reasonably  and  make  efficient 
choices  in  the  marketplace.  Consumers  can  only  make  efficient  choices  if  they  are 
able to obtain the complete and accurate information needed prior to purchase with-
out incurring excessive transaction costs. Such information may be contained in ad-
vertisements,  in  brochures  accompanying  the  sale  of  the  cards,  on  the  packaging, 
or on the cards themselves. Another source of information is experience. Experience 
may come from the consumer’s prior use of cards or from others, such as family and 
friends,  who  have  used  the  cards.  For  the  consumer  to  obtain  enough  information 
through  experience,  significant  information  search  costs  may  arise,  thereby  raising 
the price of the product much like transaction costs. A consumer would incur signifi-
cant search costs if he repeatedly paid for transportation to a store and spent money 
on  a  card  that  did  not  provide  many  minutes  (though  the  advertising  might  state 
otherwise).  Each  time  he  must  try  a  different  card  brand  in  order  to  find  one  that 
is  cost-effective.  However,  he  may  be  forced  to  try  several  cards  before  discovering 
a  good  card.  Even  then  significant  search  costs  continue  if  rates  on  the  good  card 
have changed.15 

Theoretically, prepaid telephone cards come close to fitting the perfect competition 
model. Prepaid telephone cards are a homogenous product (consumers buy minutes), 
and  there  are  many  buyers  and  sellers  due  to  the  ease  of  entry  into  and  exit  from 
the market.16 However, in the perfect competition model, consumers have perfect in-
formation. Perfect information is rarely present, but consumers can typically search 
for information and make informed purchase decisions for many products. 

The prepaid telephone card market is one where information could be made avail-
able to allow consumers to make better informed purchase decisions. Yet, investiga-
tions of the market indicate that either consumers cannot obtain information, or the 
information  is  inaccurate,  contradictory  or  deceptive.17 Moreover,  information  is 
often  not  available  from  customer  service,  and  consumers  also  may  be  misled  by 
seller misconduct such as card issuers who sell defective cards.18 Consumers retain 
information  from  past  purchase  experience,  but  information  from  previous  experi-
ence  is  likely  to  become  outdated  over  time  as  terms  and  conditions  of  the  cards 
change. 
III.  Problems  Encountered  by  Consumers  and  Information  Needed: 

Findings from an Empirical Study 

Even  if  information  is  not  available  prior  to  purchase  and  customer  service  is  in-
adequate,  regulation  may  be  unnecessary  if  prepaid  telephone  cards  are  inexpen-
sive. In that situation consumers are able to learn what they need to know in order 
to  avoid  problems  without  incurring  high  costs.  However,  while  each  card  is  inex-
pensive,  the  unit  price,  or  cost  per  minute,  may  be  significant  and  consumers  who 
rely  on  prepaid  phone  cards  for  many  of  their  calls  end  up  paying  an  excessive 
amount  for  telephone  service.  The  prepaid  phone  card  market  has  grown  into  a 
multi-billion  dollar  industry,  and  the  cost  to  consumers  as  a  group  is  tremendous, 
especially for certain segments of the population. 

A qualitative study of forty-five Latino immigrants’ experiences in an urban mar-
ket in Georgia found that 78.7 percent of the immigrants complained about prepaid 
telephone cards.19 More specifically, consumers complained that they did not receive 
the number of minutes they expected and that customer service personnel could not 
be reached during available hours and often could not answer consumers’ questions 
even when reached.20 A follow-up study was conducted to verify these complaints.21 
The  follow-up  study  investigated  the  true  costs  of  the  cards  and  the  information 
available  from  customer  service.22 Minutes  are  often  deducted  for  hidden  fees,  and 
consequently,  consumers  do  not  receive  the  number  of  minutes  they  are  told  are 
available. True cost is calculated by determining cost per minute using an accurate 
amount  of  minutes  received.23 In  the  study,  over  250  prepaid  telephone  cards  cost-
ing  under  eleven  dollars  were  purchased  and  then  used  by  bilingual  data  collectors 
to call Spanish-speaking countries from January until May 2004.24 

Before  placing  the  calls,  each  data  collector  called  the  customer  service  number 
and  asked  a  series  of  questions  from  a  survey  designed  by  the  researchers.25 Cus-
tomer  service  personnel  were  asked  about  (1)  the  number  of  minutes  the  customer 
would  have  to  call  a  specific  city,  (2)  various  kinds  of  fees  that  might  be  charged, 
(3) minute rounding, and (4) hours of customer service availability.26 Data collectors 
then  placed  a  call,  using  only  one-half  of  the  number  of  minutes  that  the  recorded 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

57 

message  indicated  was  on  each  card.27 This  was  done  to  ascertain  if  maintenance 
fees,  hidden  charges,  or  both  were  present.28 After  at  least  1  week,  a  second  call 
was  placed  to  the  same  city.29 The  date  and  time  were  noted  at  the  beginning  and 
end of each call.30 The number of minutes available was also noted.31 Each card was 
used until all minutes had expired.32 Calls were made to cities in Mexico, Colombia, 
Argentina, Peru, Spain, Uruguay, Guatemala, and Nicaragua.33 

The  researchers  computed  expected  cost  by  dividing  the  cost  of  the  card  by  the 
initial  number  of  minutes  the  consumer  was  told  he  or  she  had.34 The  actual  cost 
of  the  card  was  computed  by  dividing  the  cost  of  the  card  by  the  actual  number  of 
minutes  that  a  consumer  obtained  when  using  the  card.35 Cost  was  therefore  com-
puted  as  a  unit  price:  cost  per  minute.36 Findings  from  this  research  indicate  that 
there  is  wide  price  dispersion  with  prepaid  telephone  cards.37 The  average  actual 
cost of the cards was 87 percent higher than the average expected cost.38 

Data  collectors  also  made  three  attempts  to  reach  a  customer  service  representa-
tive.39 For two-thirds of the cards, it was possible to talk to a customer service rep-
resentative.40 The customer service representative answered on the first attempt for 
about one-half of the cards. For one-third of the cards, the consumers were not able 
to  talk  to  a  customer  service  representative,  either  because  they  were  on  hold  for 
more  than  5  minutes,  no  one  answered,  or  there  was  only  a  recording.41 Further-
more,  talking  with  a  customer  service  representative  was  often  not  helpful.42 Al-
though  some  customer  service  representatives  were  helpful,  many  times  the  cus-
tomer  service  representative  was  not  able  to  answer  questions  such  as  whether 
minute usage was rounded up or what fees were charged.43 

Subsequently,  the  researchers  conducted  an  additional  investigation  of  the  infor-
mation  available  on  the  cards.44 One  problem  was  that  for  some  cards  there  was 
very  little  if  any  information  about  fees.45 Another  problem  was  that  no  standard-
ized  wording  existed.46 For  example,  in  some  instances  a  ‘‘service’’  fee  appeared  to 
be  assessed  per  call  much  like  a  connection  fee  and  in  other  instances  what  was 
called  a  ‘‘service’’  fee  was  assessed  periodically  in  the  same  manner  as  a  mainte-
nance  fee.47 Additionally,  the  wording  of  some  information  was  vague,  such  as  the 
use of the terms ‘‘as may apply.’’ 48 Stating that a maintenance fee ‘‘may apply’’ pro-
vides a warning for the consumer but does not tell the consumer if there is a main-
tenance fee or not.49 Some maintenance periods are assessed after 2 days and others 
after  30  or  60  days.50 A  more  serious  offense  was  the  use  of  contradictory  or  mis-
leading  wording.51 Many  cards  state  that  there  is  no  connection  fee  but  the  fine 
print states that ‘‘connection fees may apply.’’ 52 Some brands of cards have no con-
nection fee but they have a fee at the end of each call, called a ‘‘post-call’’ or ‘‘hang- 
up’’ fee.53 Other information is also unclear and perhaps deceptive, such as informa-
tion about taxes, pay phone surcharges and warranties.54 

More  accurate  information  should  be  given  on  the  number  of  minutes  available 
when one places a call. When a consumer places a call, he or she is told how many 
minutes  are  available.  However,  a  consumer  typically  does  not  receive  all  of  those 
minutes.55 Minutes  are  deducted  for  a  variety  of  reasons  such  as  connection  costs 
and minute rounding penalties.56 Determining the true cost per minute is unneces-
sarily  complex  because  the  consumer  does  not  know  how  many  minutes  are  de-
ducted,  and  for  which  fees  they  are  deducted.57 The  costs  include  activation  fees, 
connection  fees,  minute  rounding,  extra  pay  phone  fees,  additional  cell  phone  fees, 
charges  even  if  no  connection  is  made,  maintenance  fees,  and  service  fees.58 It 
would  be  helpful  if  companies  provided  information  on  which  fees  were  applicable, 
even if the consumer would not know precise amounts. 

Because of the great variation in the kinds of fees assessed, the difficulty in deter-
mining how the fees are assessed, and the lack of standardized wording, meaningful 
comparison shopping is impossible. Uniformity of information, disclosure and stand-
ardized  names  for  fees  would  help  consumers,  much  in  the  same  way  that  nutri-
tional  labeling  has  provided  a  mechanism  for  uniform  comparison.  In  some  cases, 
outright consumer fraud may be present. Customer service representatives indicated 
that for some prepaid phone cards there were charges even if there was no connec-
tion.  This  is  illegal  in  some  states.59 However,  it  was  not  possible  to  know  if  the 
consumer was charged for a call that was not connected. 
IV.  The  Likeliness  of  Self-Regulation:  The  Nature  of  the  Prepaid  Phone 

Card Market 

The  third  question  addressed  is  whether  the  prepaid  phone  card  industry  can  be 
expected to regulate itself. Self-regulation is probable when there are industry-wide 
standards  available,  the  industry  standards  adequately  protect  consumers,  and  the 
industry  is  dominated  by  strong  stable  companies  that  are  committed  to  those 
standards and can pressure other companies to comply. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

58 

Self-regulation  is  likely  to  occur  if  there  are  strict  industry-wide  standards.  The 
industry’s  trade  association,  the  International  Prepaid  Communication  Association 
(IPCA)  has  adopted  standards  for  its  members.60 One  such  standard  requires  that 
minute rounding be in 1 minute intervals.61 The problem is that there is no enforce-
ment  of  the  industry  guidelines  and  no  reason  to  believe  that  they  are  being  fol-
lowed  by  the  majority  of  prepaid  telephone  card  providers.  According  to  Howard 
Segermark,  Executive  Director  of  the  IPCA,  only  about  80  providers  of  the  esti-
mated 500 plus providers are members of the IPCA.62 

The IPCA standards are too limited to provide consumers with the protection that 
they need.63 Even if the standards were satisfactory they could not serve as an ade-
quate  substitute  for  legal  protections.  For  example,  it  is  doubtful  that  the  IPCA 
could  pressure  non-members  of  the  association  into  complying  with  the  standards 
unless  the  industry  was  dominated  by  stable  companies  who  supported  the  IPCA 
standards.  The  prepaid  phone  card  industry  involves  many  different  types  of  busi-
nesses  such  as:  carriers,  resellers,  distributors,  card  issuers,  and  retailers.  Absent 
rules having the force of law, compliance with voluntary standards is highly doubt-
ful. Even if current businesses agreed to comply, someone would have to assume the 
responsibility  to  persuade  the  constant  stream  of  new  entrants  who  are  enticed  to 
enter the industry because of low start-up costs, and the general lack of compulsory 
registration  or  bonding,  to  comply  with  the  standards.  Additionally,  even  if  the 
standards  were  satisfactory,  there  is  no  guarantee  that  they  would  not  be  changed 
without  any  prior  notice  to  or  input  from  consumer  representatives.  At  the  very 
least, contracts between issuers and consumers should incorporate the IPCA stand-
ards so consumers can sue in court for breach of contract if the issuers do not follow 
the standards. 

Whether  the  industry  can  regulate  itself  hinges  upon  three  factors:  whether 
standards are available, whether they protect consumers, and whether the industry 
is  dominated  by  strong  stable  companies.  Although  there  are  industry  standards, 
they  do  not  provide  adequate  protection  for  consumers  because,  as  the  empirical 
study  indicates,  the  standards  are  not  followed.64 For  example,  information  on 
minute  rounding  was  available  for  less  than  half  of  the  cards.65 Of  those  for  which 
information  was  available,  slightly  over  half  of  the  cards  used  more  than  1  minute 
rounding.66 Furthermore,  the  industry  is  not  dominated  by  strong  stable  compa-
nies.67 The fact that one can enter the market without incurring great costs means 
there are many providers. There is also evidence that the companies more likely to 
be considered stable, such as AT&T, MCI and Sprint actually cost more per minute 
than the other companies, and they do not give the consumer any better information 
than the lesser-known providers.68 Our conclusion is that the industry cannot be ex-
pected to regulate itself. 

Because of the problems consumers face in the marketplace and the dim prospects 
for  adequate  self-regulation,  consumers  need  legal  protection.  The  laws  now  on  the 
books,  however,  fail  to  ensure  that  consumers  receive  the  information,  safeguards 
and remedies they require. 
V. Adequacy of the Current Law 

A review of current law demonstrates it is not adequate. No Federal law governs 
prepaid  phone  cards  except  the  Federal  Trade  Commission  Act  (FTC  Act).69 It  ap-
plies  generally  to  all  industries  subject  to  FTC  jurisdiction.70 The  FTC  Act  simply 
prohibits deceptive and unfair acts or practices.71 It does not require any disclosures 
and  is  not  tailored  to  the  needs  of  consumers  who  purchase  prepaid  phone  cards.72 
Rather, the Act only protects consumers from the most egregious conduct.73 Because 
there is no private right of action, it protects only the customers of those companies 
against whom the FTC brings an action. 

Most states have no statutes or regulations covering prepaid phone cards. Among 
the  states  that  do  regulate  the  cards,  there  is  a  great  deal  of  variation  in  coverage 
and  regulation  ranges  from  minimal  to  comprehensive.  However,  no  state  ade-
quately  protects  consumers.74 Most  states  have  laws  prohibiting  unfair  and  decep-
tive  acts  and  practices  in  general.75 While  the  laws  provide  for  a  private  right  of 
action,76 many  do  not  allow  class  actions,77 which  are  crucial  for  cases  involving 
purchases  of  inexpensive  items.  Also,  the  state  laws  suffer  from  the  same  defi-
ciencies as the FTC Act. 

Consumers  may  be  able  to  attack  the  agreement  between  the  seller  and  the  con-
sumer  through  general  contract  law  avenues.  For  example,  if  the  card  does  not 
work, or if there is no access number or authorization code, the consumer can claim 
failure of consideration. If the contract is too one-sided, a court may find it is uncon-
scionable,  but  the  doctrine  of  unconscionability  has  limited  usefulness.78 Contract 
law  is  totally  inadequate  to  protect  consumers  because  it  only  provides  a  remedy 
for  rights  that  the  contract  grants  to  consumers.79 Such  contracts,  one-sided  agree-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

59 

ments  presented  by  the  card  seller  on  a  take-it-or-leave-it  basis,  impose  few  obliga-
tions on card sellers.80 
VI. Should Phone Cards Be Regulated at the State or Federal Level? 

Strong  arguments  can  be  made  to  support  both  the  position  that  regulation  of 
phone cards should be through Federal law and the contrary position that it should 
be through state law. We recommend a combination of both state and Federal legis-
lation.  A  consideration  of  the  merits  of  legislation  if  it  were  administered  either  by 
the states or by Congress illustrates the issues that inform our proposal. 

Despite  the  fact  that  most  states  are  not  eager  to  tackle  this  problem,81 several 
factors indicate that state regulation might be superior to Federal regulation. State 
regulation can be tailored to the needs of that state’s residents. For example, a state 
with  a  large  immigrant  population  may  want  to  enact  more  protective  rules  than 
others.  This  would  be  justified  because  many  card  sellers  specifically  target  low-in-
come, non-English speaking groups that may be especially vulnerable to unfair prac-
tices.82 Such a state may want to enact bilingual disclosure requirements, with spe-
cial attention given to international calls. That state may also feel a need for strong 
substantive protections, such as rules guaranteeing a right to redeem unused value 
and setting a minimum time to use a card before it expires. Because of the tenuous 
or non-existent legal status of many consumers targeted by those who market phone 
cards, they often refuse to sue companies that engage in illegal practices or to com-
plain  to  government  agencies.83 Special  rules  tailored  to  meet  the  needs  of  par-
ticular immigrant populations would have a better chance of being included in state 
law  than  in  Federal  legislation  since  lawmakers  from  states  without  large  immi-
grant  groups  may  not  recognize  or  understand  the  importance  of  protecting  them. 
In addition, states have administrative agencies with expertise in drafting regula-
tions  and  enforcing  rules  related  to  telecommunications.84 Some  states  give  the 
agencies crucial regulatory roles apart from issuing regulations. For example, in Illi-
nois and Florida, providers of prepaid card services and resellers must receive a cer-
tificate  of  authority  from  a  state  agency.85 Retailers  selling  the  cards  must  have 
proof  that  the  provider  or  reseller  has  obtained  the  certificate.86 It  is  unlawful  for 
companies to fail to comply with these requirements.87 

On  the  other  hand,  Federal  legislation  has  several  advantages  over  state  regula-
tion.  The  most  obvious  benefit  is  complete  national  coverage.88 Another  benefit  is 
uniformity.89 Complete  and  uniform  national  coverage  helps  both  the  industry  and 
consumers.  Many  phone  card  companies  sell  cards  in  many  states.  Having  one  set 
of  rules  greatly  lessens  their  regulatory  burden.  Furthermore,  many  companies  sell 
cards  on  the  Internet.  A  uniform  set  of  rules  greatly  eases  their  regulatory  burden 
since they are selling to consumers nationwide. The phone card industry may mount 
less opposition to a Federal law than to state laws because of the advantages of hav-
ing  to  comply  with  only  one  law.  They  may  actually  support  a  Federal  law  in  the 
belief  it  would  discourage  the  majority  of  states  that  have  not  yet  regulated  phone 
cards from enacting their own laws.90 

In  addition,  uniform  disclosures,  standardized  terms,  and  the  same  rights  help 
produce  educated  consumers.  This  is  especially  important  given  the  high  mobility 
rates of people who live in the United States.91 Most will live in several states dur-
ing their lifetimes. With a Federal law, they do not have to learn a new set of rules 
and definitions every time they move to a new state. 

A  Federal  rule  may  also  lead  to  more  effective  enforcement  than  state  law.  An 
individual state may have great difficulty enforcing its laws against companies oper-
ating  from  different  states,  especially  those  selling  on  the  Internet.  Jurisdictional 
issues may frustrate enforcement.92 Enforcement by a Federal agency would obviate 
many of these difficulties. 

Lacking  a  Congressional  mandate,  no  agency  of  the  Federal  Government  has 
stepped  forward  to  regulate  this  industry.  Prepaid  phone  cards  are  payment  de-
vices.93 The  Federal  Reserve  Board  (FRB)  has  substantial  experience  regulating 
payment  devices,  but  lacks  experience  regulating  the  telecommunications  indus-
try.94 Drafting  regulations  and  enforcing  them  is  better  suited  for  an  agency  famil-
iar with that industry. Prepaid phone cards provide access to telephone service. The 
agency  with  the  most  expertise  in  telecommunications,  the  FCC,  has  no  experience 
dealing  with  payment  devices.  The  FCC  simply  refers  consumer  complaints  to  the 
FTC,  the  Better  Business  Bureau,  and  state  agencies.95 Moreover,  any  Federal 
agency  to  which  Congress  delegates  the  responsibility  for  regulation  would  not  be 
as attuned to local problems as are state agencies. 

Although  the  FTC  does  not  have  a  great  deal  of  technical  expertise  in  tele-
communications,  its  Telemarketing  Sales  Rule  indicates  it  is  able  to  draft  effective 
regulations  related  to  telephone  use.96 It  has  brought  enforcement  actions  against 
companies  offering  prepaid  cards.97 If  Congress  enacts  Federal  legislation  to  regu-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

60 

late  prepaid  phone  cards,  we  believe  the  FTC  is  the  most  appropriate  agency  to 
issue regulations and enforce the Act.98 

As  the  above  discussion  demonstrates,  there  are  substantial  benefits  to  enacting 
legislation,  either  at  the  state  or  the  Federal  level.  As  we  discuss  in  Part  XI,  we 
recommend  that  Congress  enact  Federal  legislation.  The  Federal  law,  however, 
should  not  completely  preempt  state  law.  States  would  still  be  permitted  to  enact 
legislation tailored to the special needs of their consumers as long as that state law 
did not conflict with the Federal statute.99 
VII.  Analysis  of  the  Nature  of  Phone  Cards  and  Implications  for  Drafting 

Applicable Law 

In  order  to  understand  current  laws  regulating  phone  cards  and  draft  a  Model 
Act,  it  is  necessary  to  determine  the  nature  of  phone  cards.  In  part,  the  card  is  a 
payment  device.  It  is  a  type  of  stored  value  card  like  a  prepaid  gift  card.100 But  it 
is  also  a  device  that  accesses  a  service.  In  this  respect  it  is  analogous  to  an  ATM 
card that is used to access the financial services provided by ATMs.101 The prepaid 
phone  card,  however,  is  an  integral  part  of  a  transaction  for  the  provision  of  tele-
communications services, a very specific type of service.102 

The fact that phone cards can be characterized in a variety of ways poses difficul-
ties for evaluating current laws and choosing a body of law that may be appropriate 
for  a  Model  Act.  There  is  no  general  body  of  law  governing  stored  value  cards.  In-
stead  states  have  enacted  laws  that  are  very  specific  to  the  type  of  card  regulated 
(gift card, phone card, payroll card), and there is great variation among the statutes 
governing  each  type  of  card.  The  phone  card  is  used  to  access  a  service  and  there 
is  no  general  law  governing  the  sale  of  services.  Those  transactions  are  subject  to 
the common law of contracts.103 Therefore, the ‘‘law’’ is determined by what the par-
ticular contract provides. Like an ATM card, the phone card accesses a service that 
can  result  in  using  the  consumer’s  funds.  Because  of  that  similarity,  it  may  be  ap-
propriate  to  use  the  Electronic  Fund  Transfers  Act,  which  governs  ATM  cards,  as 
a  model.104 Indeed,  the  FRB  recently  has  subjected  another  type  of  stored  value 
card,  the  payroll  card,  to  the  same  laws  as  ATM  cards.105 Because  phone  cards  ac-
cess  telecommunications  services,  some  states  incorporate  selected  aspects  of  their 
rules for those services.106 
VIII. Analysis of Current Regulation 

This  section  analyzes  the  current  regulation  of  phone  cards.  The  analysis  illus-
trates  the  wide  variety  of  problems  some  states  have  chosen  to  regulate.  It  also 
demonstrates  that  states  have  not  selected  any  uniform  approach  to  regulating  the 
cards.  Finally,  it  shows  that  they  have  not  used  regulation  of  other  devices,  such 
as gift cards or ATM cards, as models for their phone card laws. 

There is no uniformity in the state law regulating phone cards. States have taken 
a  wide  variety  of  approaches.  Some  have  imposed  minimal  regulation,  while  others 
subject  the  industry  to  many  specific  requirements.107 Some  have  enacted  statutes, 
while others have issued agency regulations.108 However, as Part IX discusses, even 
the most comprehensive state laws completely ignore major issues. 

Recent  studies 109 demonstrate  the  need  for  adequate  disclosure  and  for  clearer 
explanations  of  the  costs  involved  in  making  calls.  Consumers  need  disclosures  be-
fore  they  purchase  cards  in  order  to  decide  whether  to  buy  a  card  and  to  compare 
prices among cards. The studies show, however, that cost of the card is a very com-
plex  matter.  Consequently,  consumers  need  standard  terms  that  have  a  universal 
meaning  and  a  standard  format  for  presenting  information,  much  like  Truth  in 
Lending.  In  addition,  these  studies  show  that  consumers  need  access  to  customer 
service representatives who can answer specific questions and explain costs.110 

The first point of consumer contact and often principal marketing effort is adver-
tising.  Generally,  advertisements  do  not  provide  as  much  information  as  is  already 
available  on  the  cards.  Advertisements  typically  state  the  number  of  minutes  one 
obtains  when  calling  a  specific  city,  such  as  Mexico  City.  However,  advertisements 
may  also  be  misleading.  For  example,  they  may  state  that  no  connection  fees  are 
charged,111 when in fact, there are many other hidden fees. Despite its importance, 
the Federal Government has not enacted rules regulating advertisements of prepaid 
phone  card  services.112 Additionally,  the  FTC  has  not  aggressively  enforced  viola-
tions of the FTC Act in this area.113 

Consumer  economic  literature  indicates  that  information  from  advertisements  is 
often  used  by  consumers  in  establishing  reference  prices.114 These  reference  prices 
are then used at the time of purchase.115 Misleading advertisements may negatively 
affect  the  consumer’s  purchase  decisions.  The  FTC  Act  and  state  laws  require  ads 
to  be  truthful  and  not  misleading,  but  consumers  need  more  legal  protection  than 
merely a law that provides that an advertisement not be misleading. Consequently, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

61 

consumers need advertising provisions similar to those enacted in California, which 
is  currently  the  only  state  with  a  statute  specifically  regulating  the  advertisement 
of  phone  cards.116 California  law  requires  that  any  such  advertisement  ‘‘include  a 
disclosure  of  any  geographic  limitation  to  the  advertised  price,  rate,  or  unit  value, 
as  well  as  a  disclosure  of  any  additional  surcharges,  call  setup  charges,  or  fees  or 
surcharges applicable to the advertised price, rate, or unit value.’’ 117 

On the other hand, a law requiring advertisements to include certain information 
is not sufficient either. Some consumers purchase cards without seeing an advertise-
ment. Others who see ads also need information at the point of purchase. Such con-
sumers  may  not  remember  the  information  in  the  advertisement,  or  they  may  re-
member  it  incorrectly.  Furthermore,  consumers  need  much  more  information  than 
any  advertisement  could  adequately  convey.  As  a  result,  many  of  the  states  that 
regulate phone cards require disclosures at the point of purchase.118 

Most states that regulate phone cards require very specific information to be dis-
closed  on  the  card  itself.  One  could  argue  that  these  laws  are  much  too  detailed, 
and  that  consumer  choice  in  this  competitive  market  should  determine  what  infor-
mation  should  be  disclosed.  However,  the  information  that  states  require  to  be  dis-
closed  at  the  point  of  purchase  reflects  the  problems  consumers  have  encountered 
using  the  cards.  The  seller  must  print  the  name  of  the  company  on  the  phone 
card.119 Consumers  need  this  information  in  order  to  contact  the  company  when 
necessary,  to  complain  about  the  company  to  law  enforcement  and  to  sue  if  a  dis-
pute  cannot  be  resolved.  State  laws  require  the  seller  to  print  a  toll-free  customer 
service  number  on  the  card  as  well.120 As  studies  show,  consumers  of  this  product 
need access to customer service.121 They often have reasonable questions, given the 
nature  of  the  services  provided.  Because  of  the  low  cost  of  each  card,  requiring  the 
seller  to  provide  a  customer  service  number  that  is  not  toll-free  would  discourage 
consumers from contacting customer service. 

Some  state  laws  also  require  the  card  seller  to  disclose  a  toll-free  network  access 
number if such a number is required in order to access service.122 Fundamental fair-
ness  requires  the  seller  to  inform  the  consumer  of  that  number.  For  the  seller  not 
to disclose it would amount to fraud as the seller would have the consumer’s money, 
but  the  consumer  would  not  have  any  service.  Requiring  the  number  to  be  toll-free 
is  justified  because  the  access  number  merely  permits  the  consumer  to  gain  access 
to  the  system.  Charges  should  not  be  imposed  unless  and  until  the  consumer  actu-
ally makes a call. The card also must disclose the authorization code if it is required 
to access service.123 As with the requirement that the card contain the access num-
ber,  failure  to  disclose  the  authorization  code  would  be  fraudulent  since  the  con-
sumer  would  have  paid  but  would  then  be  unable  to  make  any  calls.124 Finally, 
states  require  the  card  to  include  the  expiration  date  or  policy,  if  any.125 In  Cali-
fornia, Florida, Missouri, and New York, cards that do not include this information 
are considered to be active for at least 1 year from the date of purchase or the date 
of the last recharge.126 In the State of Washington, if an expiration date is not dis-
closed on the card, it is considered ‘‘unexpired indefinitely.’’ 127 

Other  disclosures  must  be  made  either  on  the  card  or  the  packaging  that  comes 
with  the  card.  It  is  necessary  to  give  card  sellers  this  choice  because  phone  cards 
are small and all the required information may not fit. The manner of presentation 
is  also  important  for  disclosure  to  be  meaningful.  California,  for  example,  requires 
the  disclosure  to  be  legible.128 In  addition,  the  required  information  must  be  made 
‘‘available  clearly  and  conspicuously  in  a  prominent  area  immediately  proximate  to 
the  point  of  sale  of  the  . . .  calling  services.’’ 129 In  Florida,  if  disclosures  are  not 
on  the  card  or  packaging,  they  must  be  displayed  ‘‘visibly  in  a  prominent  area  at 
the  point  of  sale  . . .  in  such  a  manner  that  the  consumer  may  make  an  informed 
decision prior to purchase.’’ 130 

In California, the required disclosures on the card or packaging include the ‘‘value 
of  the  card’’  as  well  as  any  surcharges,  taxes  or  fees.131 The  California  statute  pro-
vides a list of fees, illustrating the complexity of the product’s pricing, and how sell-
ers  use  a  variety  of  different  terms,  all  of  which  amount  to  additional  cost  to  the 
consumer.132 Further, there are different requirements for disclosing surcharges for 
international  calls.133 The  seller  also  must  disclose  the  minimum  charge  per  call, 
the  billing  decrement,  the  recharge  policy,  if  any,  and  the  refund  policy,  if  any.134 
There is no national uniform format for disclosures on phone cards, unlike disclo-
sure  for  credit  and  debit  card  transactions.135 California,  however,  has  tried  to  im-
pose some uniformity on cards sold to consumers in its state.136 The statute requires 
the  value  of  the  card  and  the  amount  of  the  charges  to  be  disclosed  on  the  card  or 
its  packaging  all  in  the  same  format.137 Moreover,  if  the  value  of  the  card  is  ex-
pressed  in  minutes,  those  minutes  must  be  designated  as  either  domestic  or  inter-
national.138 Finally, that designation must be printed on the same line as the value 
of the card in minutes or on the line immediately following.139 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

62 

In addition to written disclosures at the point of sale, Texas requires verbal disclo-
sures  at  the  beginning  of  each  call.140 The  consumer  must  be  told  the  ‘‘domestic 
minutes, billing increments, or dollars remaining’’ on the prepaid account or card.141 
In  addition,  when  the  balance  on  the  credit  card  is  almost  depleted  the  company 
must provide a verbal announcement of that fact ‘‘at least 1 minute or billing incre-
ment before the time expires.’’ 142 

California law recognizes that many sellers target specific ethnic groups.143 It re-
quires that if a language other than English is used in the advertising or promotion 
of the card, or is used on the card or packaging (other than for dialing instructions), 
the required information on the card or packaging must also be disclosed in the lan-
guage  used  to  advertise  or  promote  the  card.144 If  a  language  other  than  English 
is  used  on  the  card  or  packaging  to  provide  dialing  instructions  for  making  a  call 
or  reaching  customer  service,  the  additional  information  required  on  the  card  or 
packaging must be disclosed in the language used to provide the dialing instructions 
or to reach customer service.145 Similarly, Texas requires that if a card is marketed 
in a language other than English, certain disclosures must be made in the same lan-
guage.146 Bilingual  cards  are  permitted  as  long  as  all  of  the  required  information 
is in both languages.147 

Laws  which  require  sellers  of  prepaid  telephone  cards  to  provide  a  toll-free  tele-
phone number for customer service, and which establish requirements for that serv-
ice  are  perhaps  unique  in  the  law  of  payment  systems.  If  a  person  pays  for  goods 
and  services  with  a  check,  the  Uniform  Commercial  Code  (UCC)  does  not  require 
banks  to  provide  any  kind  of  customer  service  despite  the  importance  of  the  finan-
cial services they provide.148 If the consumer pays using a credit card or debit card, 
Federal law imposes certain error resolution procedures, but the seller of such cards 
is  not  required  to  provide  a  phone  number  for  contacting  the  seller.149 The  seller 
is  required  only  to  resolve  disputes,  not  provide  information.150 Phone  cards  are  a 
type  of  stored  value  card.  Many  states  regulate  another  type  of  stored  value  card, 
the  gift  card,  but  no  gift  card  laws  require  sellers  to  provide  consumers  access  to 
customer service, much less toll-free access.151 Thus, those states having phone card 
laws  requiring  the  seller  to  provide  a  toll-free  customer  service  number  are  going 
beyond what is normally mandated in consumer protection legislation.152 

Requiring  the  seller  to  disclose  a  toll-free  customer  service  number  does  not  help 
consumers unless informed customer service representatives are available to answer 
the consumers’ questions. The studies discussed previously illustrate the difficulties 
consumers have obtaining needed information from customer service.153 States vary 
in  the  degree  to  which  they  impose  quality  standards  for  customer  service.  Cali-
fornia  and  New  York  have  the  most  consumer-friendly  requirements.  The  seller’s 
customer  service  line  must  have  live  operators  to  answer  calls  twenty-four  hours  a 
day, 7 days a week.154 Other states provide that the seller must have a live operator 
available  or  must  record  consumer  calls  and  have  a  live  operator  return  the  call 
within a specified period of time.155 

In  some  states,  phone  card  laws  go  further  than  what  is  required  in  most  con-
sumer  protection  statutes  by  setting  minimum  performance  standards  for  the  serv-
ices  that  customer  service  must  provide.  For  example,  California  and  New  York  re-
quire  the  operator  to  permit  consumers  to  file  complaints.156 In  addition,  the  oper-
ator  must  be  able  to  provide  consumers  with  information  about  rates,  surcharges, 
fees, policies on recharging cards, refunds, expiration dates, and the balance of usa-
ble minutes still available in the consumer’s account.157 

A few states have gone beyond disclosure and customer service by providing sub-
stantive  protection  as  well.  They  impose  detailed  requirements  on  charges  and 
fees.158 These include mandating rules for rounding up to the next minute and pro-
hibiting  sellers  from  excessive  rounding  up.159 Some  laws  provide  that  the  value  of 
the  card  cannot  be  reduced  by  more  than  the  charges  printed  on  the  card  or  the 
packaging or display at the point of sale.160 

State  statutes  also  impose  a  wide  variety  of  refund  requirements.  California  and 
New York require sellers to give the consumer a refund if the service fails to operate 
in  a  ‘‘commercially  reasonable  manner.’’ 161 Although  this  is  a  vague  standard,  the 
statutes at least establish that consumers are entitled to refunds.162 In Florida, con-
sumers  are  entitled  to  a  refund  if  service  is  ‘‘rendered  unusable  for  reasons  beyond 
the  consumer’s  control.’’ 163 Missouri  requires  a  refund  if  the  company  ceases  oper-
ations 164 or  can  no  longer  provide  service.165 Alabama  requires  a  refund  if  service 
is  suspended.166 Texas  requires  a  refund  if  the  company  fails  to  provide  service  at 
the  disclosed  rates  or  the  service  fails  to  meet  technical  standards.167 Florida  re-
quires companies to have a refund policy.168 At a minimum, such a policy must pro-
vide for the consumer to receive a refund if the prepaid calling service is ‘‘unusable 
for reasons beyond the consumer’s control’’ and the services ‘‘have not [exceeded] the 
expiration period.’’ 169 Furthermore, the refund must be for the same amount as the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

63 

value still on the card.170 Alaska requires a refund if the card does not work as rep-
resented  or  the  required  disclosures  are  not  made  to  the  customer.171 In  addition, 
the  Regulatory  Commission  of  Alaska  can  direct  that  a  refund  be  paid  ‘‘for  good 
cause.’’ 172 In  Florida,  a  company  ‘‘may,  but  shall  not  be  required  to’’  provide  a  re-
fund  for  lost  or  stolen  cards.173 States  also  require  that  the  amount  of  the  refund 
cannot  be  less  than  the  value  remaining  on  the  card.174 The  refund  must  be  pro-
vided within 60 days from the date the consumer notifies the company.175 

Some of the states that have enacted prepaid phone card laws have also imposed 
performance standards such as a minimum level of operational capacity for the serv-
ice  being  provided.  These  requirements  are  in  sharp  contrast  to  the  law  governing 
other  payment  devices 176 as  well  as  the  laws  governing  the  quality  of  goods  and 
services.177 

In  California,  companies  must  ‘‘maintain  access  numbers  with  sufficient  capacity 
to  accommodate  a  reasonably  anticipated  number  of  calls  without  incurring  a  busy 
signal or undue delay.’’ 178 Apparently, failure to maintain that capacity would trig-
ger  California’s  requirement  that  consumers  are  entitled  to  a  refund  if  a  company 
fails  to  provide  service  in  a  commercially  reasonable  manner.179 Case  law  from 
other  types  of  transactions  may  be  useful  in  further  defining  what  circumstances 
may  be  commercially  unreasonable.180 Florida  law  formerly  required  that  every 
company  ensure  that  at  least  95  percent  of  all  call  attempts  to  the  company’s  toll- 
free  customer  service  number  be  completed.181 Finally,  there  must  be  at  least  97 
percent accuracy of the length of the conversation. 

Another  substantive  protection  relates  to  expiration  policies.  For  example,  Cali-
fornia, Florida, and New York provide that if the card does not state a specific expi-
ration  date  or  policy,  a  card  is  considered  active  for  at  least  1  year  from  the  date 
of  purchase.182 In  addition,  if  the  card  has  been  recharged,  it  must  be  active  for  1 
year from the date of the last recharge.183 Sellers who consider the 1-year minimum 
onerous  can  easily  avoid  its  imposition  simply  by  providing  on  the  card  that  it  ex-
pires within a shorter period of time.184 However, if the seller establishes an expira-
tion  date  that  is  too  short,  for  example  1  week,  the  consumer  may  be  able  to  con-
vince  a  court  that  the  expiration  date  is  unconscionable,  in  bad  faith,  or  commer-
cially  unreasonable.185 Statutes  do  not  impose  a  minimum  period  before  a  card  ex-
pires. 

State  statutes  and  regulations  of  phone  cards  do  not  include  specific  provisions 
providing that consumers can sue the card companies for violating these laws. Nev-
ertheless, consumers in some states may be able to sue under their ‘‘mini-FTC’’ acts, 
alleging  that  a  violation  of  the  phone  card  requirements  constitutes  a  deceptive  or 
unfair  act  or  practice.186 In  other  states,  consumers  may  confront  substantial  bar-
riers.187 A  government  agency,  such  as  the  state’s  public  service  commission,  may 
be  authorized  to  impose  penalties  for  violation  of  the  phone  card  laws,188 but  con-
sumers  have  no  assurance  they  will  do  so,  especially  if  the  commission  lacks  suffi-
cient resources or strong proof that violations are widespread. 
IX. The Inadequacy of Warranty Law 

The UCC includes provisions on express and implied warranties that may be ben-
eficial  to  consumers  who  purchase  goods.189 The  UCC,  however,  does  not  apply  to 
the sale of services, which would include the sale of telephone services. The Federal 
Magnuson-Moss  Warranty  Act  prohibits  the  disclaimer  of  implied  warranties  once 
a seller provides a written warranty.190 Unfortunately, the Act does not apply to the 
sale of services either.191 

Because  neither  the  UCC  nor  the  Magnuson-Moss  Warranty  Act  applies  to  the 
sale of phone services, general contract law applies. Under contract law, courts will 
enforce  express  warranties.  The  seller,  however,  can  avoid  that  result  by  carefully 
drafting  the  contract  so  it  does  not  include  any  express  warranties  regarding  the 
quality of the service provided to the consumer. Some courts have held that service 
contracts  include  implied  warranties.192 The  cases,  however,  do  not  involve  provi-
sions  of  telephone  services  or  comparable  services.193 Consequently,  it  is  not  at  all 
clear  how  courts  would  apply  those  standards  to  prepaid  phone  service.  Moreover, 
sellers  most  likely  can  avoid  enforcement  of  the  implied  warranties  by  disclaiming 
them.194 
X. Problems Not Addressed in Regulations 

As described above, while most states have not regulated phone cards at all, some 
which  have  enacted  regulations  have  gone  far  beyond  the  protection  accorded  con-
sumers  using  other  types  of  payment  devices.  However,  even  the  states  with  the 
most  comprehensive  regulations  have  failed  to  do  anything  to  protect  consumers 
who confront many serious problems. In order for our Model to accomplish its objec-
tive, it was necessary to identify the gaps in current law. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

64 

For example, regulations include many required disclosures,195 but do not require 
sellers  to  inform  consumers  of  their  policy  with  regard  to  unilaterally  changing  the 
terms  and  conditions  of  providing  service  without  prior  notice  to  the  consumer.196 
Statutes do not require disclosure of the seller’s policy on lost, stolen, unauthorized, 
or  malfunctioning  cards.197 Finally,  statutes  do  not  require  sellers  to  inform  con-
sumers  whether  they  can  redeem  unused  value  on  their  card,  and  if  they  can,  how 
it can be redeemed and what charges may be imposed.198 

Statutes also fail to provide consumers with any protection if a card is lost or sto-
len.199 In addition, consumers may lose the piece of paper or other record on which 
they  have  written  their  Personal  Identification  Number  (PIN)  and  may  not  have 
their  PIN  memorized.200 Without  the  PIN,  the  card  cannot  be  used  and  the  con-
sumer loses the value of the balance remaining on the card.201 State law is deficient 
in not requiring the seller to replace the PIN. At the very least, statutes should re-
quire a warning to consumers about the consequences of losing their PIN. If the con-
sumer  cannot  remember  the  PIN  and  the  seller  refuses  to  inform  the  consumer 
what the PIN is, or issue a new PIN, the balance of unused value remaining on the 
card becomes pure profit for the card issuer.202 

A  card  may  also  be  defective.  For  example,  the  access  number  or  the  PIN  may 
not work,203 or the card may have some other defect making it impossible to operate 
as it should.204 Consumers will lose the entire balance on the card if the card issuer 
refuses  to  replace  the  card.  Statutes  do  not  require  card  issuers  to  replace  cards. 
Even  if  the  issuer  does  replace  cards,  it  may  charge  such  a  high  fee  that  it  is  not 
economically advisable for consumers to purchase a replacement. 

Additionally,  the  card  issuer  may  go  out  of  business.205 The  issuer  may  simply 
close  its  doors  and  disappear.  Statutes  provide  purchasers  of  phone  cards  with  no 
satisfactory  remedy  when  this  occurs.  Alternatively,  the  issuer  may  file  for  bank-
ruptcy,  leaving  consumers  with  unsecured  claims  that  are  unlikely  to  be  satisfied. 
States  do  not  regulate  the  amount  of  charges  and  fees.  Rather,  states  require  an 
issuer who charges fees for various services, to inform consumers about the fees.206 
However,  the  disclosure  requirements  of  state  laws  are  not  adequate.  For  example, 
states  do  not  require  sellers  to  inform  consumers  of  the  extra  charges  they  incur 
if they use their phone card at a pay phone.207 

In  states  that  have  no  laws  regulating  phone  cards,  the  rights  and  obligations  of 
the parties are governed by the contract between the card issuer and the consumer. 
In  states  with  phone  card  laws,  the  many  matters  not  regulated  are  subject  to  the 
terms of the contract. The contracts between issuers and consumers are not the re-
sult  of  a  negotiated  bargain  between  the  parties,  and,  in  fact  the  consumer  never 
even signs the agreement. Rather, the law deems that consumers agree to the terms 
of  the  take-it-or-leave-it  adhesion  contracts  by  paying  their  money  and  using  the 
card. The cards often include unilateral change of terms provisions under which the 
issuers  can  modify  the  contract’s  terms  without  notice  to  consumers.208 Those 
changes  could  deprive  consumers  of  important  rights  they  had  under  the  contract 
when they originally bought the card or impose substantial new charges upon them. 
States have not enacted laws specifically governing this problem. 

Finally,  even  states  that  have  enacted  strong  phone  card  laws  do  not  include  in 
those statutes provisions granting consumers explicit causes of action and meaning-
ful remedies for violation of the law such as those included in Federal consumer pro-
tection statutes.209 This is a serious omission that may make the protections in the 
laws largely illusory. 

The  Model  Act  described  in  the  following  section  fills  the  gaps  in  current  law  by 
including  provisions  to  deal  with  the  issues  identified  above,  that  statutes  do  not 
address. 
XI. Model Prepaid Telephone Card Act 

Based  on  the  foregoing  analysis  of  the  problems  consumers  of  prepaid  telephone 
cards encounter, the information they need, the nature of the marketplace, the dis-
mal  prospects  for  self-regulation,  and  the  inadequacy  of  the  states’  responses  to 
date, we propose that Congress enact a Federal law to regulate phone cards. As dis-
cussed  previously,210 a  Federal  statute  provides  benefits  to  both  the  industry  and 
consumers that state laws cannot offer. Matters not included in the Federal statute 
are  appropriate  for  individual  states  to  adopt  if  they  see  fit  to  do  so.  Our  proposal 
breaks very little new ground. Rather we have taken those features of state law that 
offer  consumers  needed  protection  and  recommend  that  they  be  incorporated  into  a 
Federal law. Most of our suggestions represent approaches that states have already 
adopted. Therefore, it is reasonable to assume that they pose no significant techno-
logical or financial impediments to the prepaid phone card industry. 

Our Model Act covers those matters that should be governed by a Federal statute. 
Some  matters  are  not  included  in  our  Model  Act  because  we  believe  they  are  best 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

65 

left for the states to consider on an individual basis. These matters include licensing 
and  registration  of  companies  selling  cards,  the  needs  of  residents  with  special 
needs, as well as regulation of rates and fees. If Congress refuses to pass phone card 
legislation, our Model Act should be enacted by each state. 

The  Federal  statute  should  establish  a  basic  framework  that  ensures  consumers 
a  reasonable  level  of  disclosure  and  protection.  The  statute  should  delegate  to  the 
FTC  the  task  of  issuing  detailed  regulations  pursuant  to  the  statute,  filling  in  the 
details and responding to future changes in technology, marketing, and the market-
place.211 To assist card issuers in complying with the law and to reduce compliance 
costs, the statute should instruct the FTC to draft model disclosure forms for issuers 
to  use  if  they  wish.212 States  would  be  permitted  to  enact  their  own  laws  as  long 
as they were not inconsistent with the Federal statute.213 

The Federal statute should also regulate disclosures in advertising. As previously 
noted,214 advertising  is  important  in  inducing  consumers  to  buy  a  certain  brand  of 
card. In addition, a Federal law is appropriate because a radio or television commer-
cial  or  Internet  ad  can  be  seen  and  heard  across  state  borders.  The  Federal  law 
should incorporate the provisions of California’s law that requires phone card adver-
tisements  to  disclose  geographic  limits  to  the  advertised  price,  rate,  or  unit  value, 
as  well  as  to  disclose  additional  surcharges,  call  setup  charges,  or  fees  applicable 
to the advertised price, rate, or unit value.215 The FTC should be authorized to issue 
additional  disclosures  from  time  to  time  if  it  finds  they  are  needed.  This  flexibility 
is  appropriate  given  the  new  advertising  avenues  that  emerging  technologies  con-
tinue to make possible.216 

The  Federal  law  should  require  disclosures  that  are  available  to  consumers  prior 
to  purchasing  prepaid  phone  cards.  Disclosure  plays  a  crucial  role  in  phone  card 
transactions because of the manner in which consumers become bound by the terms 
of  the  contract.  As  is  evident  from  the  discussion  in  this  article,  the  purchase  and 
use of phone cards involves many elements. Some of the features of this service are 
complex and confusing, such as the calculation of fees and charges. Consumers and 
card  issuers  do  not  enter  into  a  formal  written  contract  that  includes  the  terms  of 
agreement,  with  consumers  expressing  their  agreement  to  be  bound  in  some  man-
ner,  such  as  signing  the  contract.  Instead,  the  card  issuer  notifies  the  consumer  of 
rights,  obligations,  restrictions,  limitations,  and  conditions  on  the  card  or  in  the 
packaging, and the consumer purchases the card. Therefore, the consumer does not 
participate in the negotiation of the terms. Courts uphold the enforceability of these 
types  of  contracts,  finding  that  consumers  have  accepted  and  are  bound  by  any 
terms  of  which  they  have  notice  if  they  use  the  product  after  having  opportunity 
to discover those terms.217 In order to ensure the fairness and reasonableness of the 
terms  that  bind  the  parties,  it  is  essential  that  the  law  require  certain  disclosures 
that become part of the contract. 

The  Federal  law  should  require  certain  disclosures  on  the  card  itself.  This  in-
cludes  the  name  of  the  company  issuing  the  card  and  a  toll-free  customer  service 
number.  The  card  also  should  give  a  toll-free  network  access  number  if  that  is  re-
quired  in  order  to  access  service.  The  card  must  disclose  the  authorization  code  if 
one  is  required  to  access  service.  Most  states  that  have  enacted  legislation  include 
these disclosure requirements. 

The  Federal  statute  should  require  that  all  cards  have  an  expiration  date,  and 
that  the  date  can  be  no  shorter  than  1  year  after  activation.  This  information  is 
vital  for  the  consumer  to  have.  Therefore,  there  should  be  significant  consequences 
if  the  card  does  not  include  that  disclosure.  The  Federal  statute  should  follow  the 
laws enacted in Washington and Texas 218 and provide that if a seller fails to make 
that disclosure, the card is active indefinitely. 

The Federal statute should follow the pattern of state law by requiring other dis-
closures, but permitting the issuer to make them either on the card or on the pack-
aging that comes with the card. Additionally, the issuer should be required to make 
the  disclosures  available  at  the  point  of  sale.219 Disclosures  should  include  all 
charges, taxes, and fees.220 The seller should disclose the minimum charge per call, 
extra charges imposed for calls from pay phones, the billing decrement, the recharge 
policy, if any, and the refund policy.221 The FTC should have the authority to regu-
late  further  in  this  area.  For  example,  phone  card  issuers  may  impose  new  types 
of charges and conditions. The statute should define charges and conditions in gen-
eral terms so the FTC can issue regulations under its disclosure authority to include 
these new costs. 

Surcharges  for  international  calls  deserve  special  attention.  Those  making  inter-
national  calls  have  a  special  need  for  clear  and  accurate  information.  Therefore,  it 
is  important  that  the  surcharges  for  international  calls  not  be  buried  in  with  the 
other  disclosures.  Consequently,  the  statute  should  provide  that  if  international 
calls  are  a  significant  focus  of  the  issuer’s  marketing  or  if  a  substantial  portion  of 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

66 

the  calls  made  on  its  cards  are  subject  to  surcharges  for  international  calls,  the 
issuer  must  make  the  disclosure  of  those  surcharges  in  a  prominent  place  on  the 
card  as  well  as  on  the  packaging  and  at  the  point  of  sale.  The  statute  should  dele-
gate  to  the  FTC  the  responsibility  to  issue  regulations  further  specifying  the  cir-
cumstances under which the special rules for international calls apply. 

Consumers  also  need  to  know  the  balance  remaining  on  their  cards.  Otherwise, 
when  they  have  an  important  call  to  make,  they  may  mistakenly  believe  they  have 
more time than they actually have to make their call. The Federal law should follow 
Texas’  lead  by  requiring  verbal  disclosures  at  the  beginning  of  each  call  informing 
the  consumer  of  the  minutes,  billing  increments,  or  dollars  remaining  on  the 
card.222 When the balance on the card is nearly exhausted, the issuer should be re-
quired to inform the consumer verbally that the time is about to expire.223 

Furthermore, the Federal statute should require several disclosures not mandated 
by  state  statutes.  Sellers  should  have  to  inform  consumers  of  their  policy  with  re-
gard to unilaterally changing the terms and conditions of providing service without 
prior  notice  to  the  consumer.224 Even  better  would  be  a  provision  requiring  sellers 
to  notify  consumers  beforehand  of  all  proposed  changes.  Notification  could  be  given 
verbally  at  the  beginning  of  the  consumer’s  call  using  the  card.225 The  consumer 
should  be  given  the  option  of  refusing  to  agree  to  the  change.  If  the  consumer  re-
fuses,  she  should  be  entitled  to  a  refund  of  the  unused  value  on  the  card.  Sellers 
should be prohibited from charging a fee to obtain the refund. 

Sellers  should  be  required  to  disclose  their  policy  on  lost,  stolen,  unauthorized, 
and  malfunctioning  cards.226 In  addition,  the  Federal  statute  should  require  sellers 
to  inform  consumers  whether  they  can  redeem  unused  value  on  their  card,  and  if 
they can, how it can be redeemed and what charges may be imposed. 

The statute should mandate the use of standard uniform terms that would be de-
fined  in  the  statute.  This  would  enable  consumers  to  comparison  shop.  Uniform 
terms  would  have  uniform  meanings,  regardless  of  the  state  where  the  consumer 
purchased  the  card.  In  addition  to  requiring  standard  terms,  certain  terms  should 
be  prohibited  to  prevent  the  confusing  and  contradictory  wording  that  many  agree-
ments  contain.227 For  example,  some  companies  state  there  is  no  connection  fee, 
leading  consumers  to  believe  there  are  no  additional  fees.228 This  claim  is  mis-
leading because instead of that fee they impose a fee at the conclusion of each call, 
called  a  ‘‘post-call’’  or  ‘‘hang-up’’  fee.  Sellers  should  be  required  to  use  a  standard 
term  that  would  apply  to  all  fees  imposed  per  call.  Companies  impose  periodic 
charges  for  maintenance  fees.229 The  statute  should  require  companies  to  use  a 
standard term that would apply to all such maintenance fees. Companies should not 
be  allowed  to  confuse  consumers  by  using  a  variety  of  terms  for  such  charges  such 
as  ‘‘administrative  fee’’  or  ‘‘service  fee.’’  The  statute  should  require  a  standard  for-
mat  for  charges  imposed  for  taxes.  Standard  uniform  terms  would  benefit  card 
issuers as well as consumers because the standardization would be easier for issuers 
to comply with than various state laws with differing requirements and definitions. 
The  statute  should  authorize  the  FTC  to  develop  a  standard  format  for  disclosures 
and model forms. 

The  Federal  statute  should  require  that  if  the  issuer  uses  a  language  other  than 
English  in  advertising  or  promoting  the  card,  or  on  the  card  or  its  packaging,  then 
the  required  disclosures  on  the  card  or  packaging  must  also  be  in  that  other  lan-
guage.230 If another language is used to provide dialing instructions for making calls 
or  calling  customer  service,  the  disclosures  required  to  be  on  the  card  or  its  pack-
aging also must be in that other language.231 

Disclosure  by  card  companies  alone  is  not  sufficient.232 The  Federal  statute 
should also require dispute resolution procedures and substantive rights and protec-
tions. The Federal statute should ensure the effectiveness of customer service or else 
consumers  will  be  at  a  severe  disadvantage  in  learning  essential  information  and 
seeking  solutions  for  problems  that  arise.  Issuers  should  be  required  to  provide  a 
toll-free  telephone  number  for  customer  service,  with  that  number  clearly  disclosed 
on  the  card  itself.  The  issuer  should  be  required  to  have  an  adequate  number  of 
trained,  live  operators  available  at  least  Monday  through  Friday,  8  hours  each 
day.233 The  statute  should  require  that  the  issuer  record  all  calls  made  at  other 
times,  and  that  the  recorded  calls  be  returned  no  later  than  the  end  of  the  next 
business day.234 Consumers should have the right to file complaints when they call 
customer  service,235 and  the  issuer  should  be  required  to  investigate  within  ten 
business days, crediting the consumer’s card or providing a refund if the consumer’s 
complaint  is  justified.236 Consumers  also  need  information  when  they  call,  and  the 
issuer’s  customer  service  operators  should  have  the  capacity  to  provide  information 
about  rates,  surcharges,  fees,  refunds,  expiration  dates,  recharging  cards,  and  the 
available balance.237 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

67 

The  Federal  statute  should  include  rules  for  rounding  charges  up  to  the  next 
minute and should prohibit excessive upwards rounding.238 Federal law should also 
prohibit  the  issuer  from  reducing  the  value  of  the  card  by  more  than  the  charges 
printed on the card or the packaging or information displayed at the point of sale.239 
Moreover, the seller should be prohibited from imposing a fee if there is no connec-
tion made to the party dialed. 

The Federal statute should require the issuer to provide a refund when the issuer 
fails  to  provide  service  at  the  disclosed  rates  or  charges  more  than  disclosed  or  al-
lowed.240 In addition, the consumer should receive a refund if the phone service fails 
to  meet  certain  technical  standards.241 Refunds  are  warranted  if  service  is  sus-
pended,  terminated,242 or  unusable.243 Consumers  should  be  entitled  to  a  refund  if 
the service does not work as represented, the required disclosures are not made,244 
or  the  card  is  defective.  Consumers  should  also  be  able  to  receive  a  refund  of  the 
unused  balance  on  their  card  if  they  report  their  card  as  lost  or  stolen  and  the 
issuer  has  the  capacity  to  block  all  future  use  of  the  card  after  receiving  the  con-
sumer’s notice.245 

There  may  be  other  circumstances  under  which  refunds  should  be  required. 
Therefore, the statute should include more general standards as well. California and 
New  York’s  models  require  a  refund  of  at  least  the  value  remaining  on  the  card  if 
the service fails to operate in a ‘‘commercially reasonable manner.’’ 246 Other exam-
ples of general standards are provisions requiring a refund if the issuer fails to exer-
cise ordinary care, acts in bad faith, or uses a contract that includes unconscionable 
terms.247 

The  Federal  statute  should  impose  minimum  performance  standards.  The  seller 
should  be  required  to  have  the  capacity  to  accommodate  a  reasonably  anticipated 
number  of  calls  without  consumers  encountering  a  busy  signal  or  unreasonable 
delay.248 The  FTC  should  set  requirements  for  what  percentage  of  calls  must  be 
completed and the accuracy of the company’s calculation of the conversation time.249 
The Federal statute should also include a guaranty stating that both the card and 
the  service  provided  meet  minimum  standards.  Accordingly,  it  should  provide  that 
there  is  an  implied  warranty  of  merchantability  in  every  phone  card  transaction. 
This is the law under the UCC with regard to the sale of goods.250 Unlike the UCC, 
however, the issuer should not be allowed to disclaim that implied warranty.251 

The Federal statute should establish a maximum cap on a consumer’s liability as 
long  as  the  card  issuer  has  the  ability  to  block  access  so  the  thief  cannot  continue 
to  use  the  card.252 If  the  issuer  does  not  have  that  ability,  the  law  should  require 
a prominent disclosure on the card or its packaging that the purchaser will lose the 
entire  balance  on  the  card  if  it  is  lost,  stolen,  or  used  in  an  unauthorized  fashion, 
if that is the issuer’s policy. 

Consumers  may  lose  their  PINs  rendering  the  card  useless  and  resulting  in  the 
loss  to  the  consumer  of  the  value  remaining  on  the  card.253 A  seller  should  be  re-
quired  to  supply  a  new  PIN  if  the  consumer  notifies  the  seller  and  the  seller  has 
the ability to block access to anyone using the lost PIN. If the seller lacks the ability 
to block access and does not want to provide consumers any relief, the Federal stat-
ute  should  require  the  seller  to  clearly  warn  consumers  either  on  the  card  or  its 
packaging that they have no protection if the PIN is lost. 

Additionally, the statute should require sellers to replace defective cards.254 Con-
sumers will lose the entire balance on the card if the card issuer refuses to replace 
it.  The  law  should  prohibit  sellers  from  charging  more  than  a  reasonable  fee  for  a 
replacement.255 If sellers can charge exorbitant replacement fees, it will be economi-
cally inadvisable for the consumer to order a replacement. 

Consumers  need  meaningful  remedies  otherwise  they  have  no  means  for  recov-
ering  the  losses  they  incur  as  a  result  of  violations  of  the  law.  The  Federal  statute 
should  include  the  remedies  contained  in  Federal  consumer  protection  laws,  pro-
viding for actual damages, statutory damages, costs and attorney’s fees.256 Class ac-
tions should be expressly permitted, or else litigation will not be feasible, given the 
small  amount  of  each  individual’s  damages.  Predispute  mandatory  arbitration 
should be prohibited.257 

The  recommendations  made  thus  far  should  be  in  a  Federal  statute  or  accom-
panying  FTC  regulations.  They  involve  national  problems  that  are  best  dealt  with 
on a uniform nationwide basis both to ensure that consumers can enjoy a basic level 
of  protection  wherever  they  live  and  to  lower  compliance  costs  for  the  industry.  If 
Congress fails to enact a law, however, states should pass their own statutes, using 
the  above  as  a  model,  and  delegating  regulatory  authority  to  the  appropriate  state 
agency. 

Some  issues  are  best  dealt  with  on  a  state  basis  rather  than  through  a  Federal 
law.  Examples  of  this  include  the  licensing  and  registration  of  companies.  Some 
states require this already, and the rest should be encouraged to consider it. States 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

68 

also  should  require  companies  to  post  a  bond  so  consumers  will  have  a  fund  from 
which they can be compensated in case a company goes out of business. Some states 
require  phone  card  companies  to  file  tariffs  listing  all  of  their  rates  and  fees,  with 
a  state  agency  empowered  to  reject  those  rates.258 We  believe  it  best  to  leave  that 
decision  to  the  states  rather  than  establish  a  Federal  bureaucracy  to  oversee  rate 
regulation  for  all  sellers.  While  lawmakers  generally  are  reluctant  to  regulate  fees, 
regulation of phone card fees is warranted because of the low income and vulnerable 
status of many of the consumers who are specifically targeted by the industry. Con-
sequently,  states  should  consider  enacting  laws  prohibiting  rates  above  a  certain 
amount, as states already do for consumer credit. There is a great deal of diversity 
in  the  demographic  characteristics  of  various  states.  Individual  states  may  find  it 
necessary to enact special protections for vulnerable groups within their states, such 
as immigrants. 

Finally,  Federal  and  state  laws  governing  phone  cards  should  prohibit  waiver  of 
the  requirements  mandated  in  the  laws.  Strong  consumer  protection  laws  do  not 
benefit  consumers  if  sellers  can  enforce  contractual  provisions  by  which  consumers 
agree to waive provisions in those laws intended to benefit and protect them. 
XII. Conclusion 

Empirical  studies  indicate  that  consumers  have  difficulty  obtaining  necessary  in-
formation  about  prepaid  telephone  cards  before  purchase.  Information  is  often  un-
available,  misleading,  and  confusing.  There  is  no  Federal  regulation  of  prepaid 
phone cards. Although numerous states have statutes or administrative regulations, 
they  vary  widely  and  many  states  have  no  laws  regulating  phone  cards.  Both  card 
issuers and consumers could be better served with Federal legislation. 

This  article  presents  a  case  for  Federal  legislation  and  a  proposed  model  act 
which  would  draw  upon  the  best  of  current  state  regulations.  The  Federal  Trade 
Commission  is  the  suggested  avenue  for  administrative  agency  regulations  and  en-
forcement  of  the  proposed  legislation.  The  Federal  legislation  also  must  provide  a 
private  right  of  action  for  consumers,  providing  them  with  meaningful  remedies 
when they are injured due to a company’s failure to comply with the law. However, 
a few issues should be left to the states’ discretion. If Congress fails to enact legisla-
tion, the states should pass the model act. 
Footnotes 

* Mark E. Budnitz is a Professor of Law at Georgia State University College of Law. He holds 
a B.A. from Dartmouth College and J.D. from Harvard Law School. Professor Budnitz gratefully 
acknowledges the research assistance of Jodi L. Green, a student at GSU College of Law. 

† Martina  Rojo  is  a  Professor  of  Law  in  the  School  of  Law  at  the  Universidad  del  Salvador, 
Argentina. She holds a J.D. from the Universidad del Salvador, Argentina and L.L.M. from the 
University of Georgia. The author has researched and published in the areas of Consumer Law, 
Comparative Law and Law and Economics. 

‡ Julia Marlowe is an Associate Professor in the Department of Housing & Consumer Econom-
ics  at  the  University  of  Georgia.  She  holds  a  B.A.  from  The  University  of  New  Mexico,  Albu-
querque, and M.S. and Ph.D. in Consumer Economics from The University of Tennessee, Knox-
ville.  The  author  wishes  to  thank  the  University  of  Georgia  President’s  Venture  Fund  and  the 
Georgia Governor’s Office of Consumer Affairs for funding the research. 

1 Mitch  Morrison,  Paying  Dividends:  The  Prepaid  Category  Continues  to  Grow  and  it’s  Not 

Just Phone Cards Anymore, 39 CONVENIENCE STORE NEWS 48 (2003). 

2 Brian  Cook,  Thomas  K.  Crowe  &  Jo  Ann  Scott  Cullen,  Experts  Predict—Prepaid  Forecast 
2002,  INTELE-CARD NEWS,  Jan.  2001,  http://www.intelecard.com/storylhome.asp?StoryID=342 
(last  visited  Sept.  11,  2006);  Richard  Gutwillig,  Calling  on  Savvy,  55  SUPERMARKET BUS.  MAG. 
89 (2000). 

3 Michael  Browne,  Generally  Speaking:  Selling  a  Variety  of  General  Merchandise  Draws  Cus-

tomers, High Margins, 40 CONVENIENCE STORE NEWS 37, 37 (2004). 

4 Howard  Segermark,  Why  Market  Phone  Cards?  30  NAT’L PETROLEUM NEWS 30,  30  (June 

2002). 

5 Cook,  Crowe  and  Cullen,  supra  note  2,  at  14;  Gutwillig,  supra  note  2  (reporting  that  card 
sellers are targeting home-based businesses and traveling salespersons). Military personnel also 
are  major  users  of  prepaid  calling  cards.  FCC  Taps  Calling  Cards  for  Access,  USF  Payments, 
TELECOM POL’Y REP., July 10, 2006. 

6 Gutwillig,  supra  note  2.  Digitac  sells  computers  and  computer  services.  Id.  http:// 

www.digitac.com.aa (last visited Sept. 27, 2006). 

7 Mary  Louise  Pickel,  Phoning  Mexico  . . .  for  profit,  ATL.  J.-CONST.,  June  8,  2006;  Cook, 

Crowe and Cullen, supra note 2; Gutwillig, supra note 2. 

8 Alan R. Andreasen, Disadvantaged Hispanic Consumers: A Research Perspective and Agenda, 
16  J.  OF CONSUMER AFF.  46,  48  (1982);  Jinkook  Lee  &  Horacia  Soberon-Ferrer,  Consumer 
Vulnerablity to Fraud: Influencing Factors, 31 J. OF CONSUMER AFF. 70, 72 (1997). 

9 Julia  Marlowe,  Investigation  of  Pre-Purchase  Information  on  Prepaid  Telephone  Cards,  Re-
port  to  the  Georgia  Governor’s  Office  of  Consumer  Affairs  1  (Sept.  2005);  Julia  Marlowe  and 
Martina Rojo, Consumer Problems With Prepaid Telephone Cards, 51 CONSUMER INTS. ANN. 126, 
128–30 (2005). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

69 

(1970). 

10 The Mexico Tri Color card, purchased in 2005, provides an example of misleading informa-
tion.  The  card  reads  ‘‘sin  cargo  de  conexio´n’’  on  the  front  in  large  print,  but  the  small  print  on 
the back reads ‘‘cargos de conexio´n aplicaran.’’ The statement on the front informs the consumer 
there are no connection charges, but the statement on the back says the opposite. Marlowe and 
Rojo, supra note 9, at 127. Customer service representatives sometimes provide confusing infor-
mation. For example, one told a consumer the phone card had a ‘‘maintenance fee of $0.50 every 
one or 2 days.’’ Id. 

11 AT&T  v.  Ting,  182  F.  Supp.2d  902,  930  (N.D.  Cal.  2002),  aff’d  319  F.3d  1126  (9th.  Cir. 
2003), cert. denied, 124 S. Ct. 53 (2003); see Jean Sternlight, As Mandatory Binding Arbitration 
Meets the Class Action, Will the Class Action Survive? 42 WM. & MARY L. REV. 1 (2000). 

12 According to the U.S. Census Bureau, 37 million people in the United States live in poverty. 
Bradley R. Schiller, Fluid Poverty, ALBANY TIMES UNION, Sept. 24, 2006 (noting that more than 
20 percent of Hispanics in the United States live in poverty). 

13 See, e.g., Press Release, FTC, Marketer of Pre-Paid Cards Agrees to Settle Charges of Fail-
ing to Disclose Actual Cost of Using Card; Additional Charges Per Call Added, Some Cards In-
curred Monthly Maintenance Fee (Mar. 4, 1999). 

14 Phone  Card  Issuers  Must  Pay  Access  Fees,  N.Y.  TIMES,  July  4,  2006,  at  C9  (reporting  that 
the  FCC  ruled  AT&T  must  make  Universal  Service  Fund  payments  on  its  prepaid  calling  card 
transactions). 

15 See  Phillip  Nelson,  Information  and  Consumer  Behavior,  78  J.  OF POL.  ECON.  311,  312 

16 Segermark, supra note 4, at 30. 
17 Marlowe, supra note 9, at 4–5; Marlowe and Rojo, supra note 9, at 128. 
18 Nancy  Luna,  Phone  Card  or  PhonyCard?  ORANGE COUNTY REG.,  Aug.  20,  2005  (reporting 

experience of consumer who was never able to use her defective card to make a call). 

19 Julia  Marlowe  and  Jorge  H.  Atiles,  Consumer  Fraud  and  Latino  Immigrant  Consumers  in 

the United States, 29 INT’L J. OF CONSUMER STUD. 391, 395–96 (2005). 

20 Id. at 395–96. 
21 Marlowe and Rojo, supra note 9, at 130–31. 
22 Id. at 132–33. 
23 Id. at 133. 
24 Id. at 130. 
25 Id. 
26 Marlowe and Rojo, supra note 9, at 130. 
27 Id. 
28 Id. 
29 Id. 
30 Id. 
31 Marlowe and Rojo, supra note 9, at 130. 
32 Id. 
33 Id. at 132. 
34 Id. at 133. 
35 Id. 
36 Marlowe and Rojo, supra note 9, at 133. 
37 Id. 
38 Id. 
39 Id. at 130. 
40 Id. 
41 Marlowe and Rojo, supra note 9, at 130. 
42 Id. at 131. 
43 Id. 
44 Marlowe, supra note 9, at 18–19. 
45 Id. at 4. 
46 Id. 
47 Id. at 4–5. 
48 Id. at 4. 
49 Julia  Marlowe  and  Francisco  Diaz,  Verification  of  Advertised  Claims  for  Prepaid  Phone 

Cards (Working Paper, 2006). 

50 Marlowe, supra note 9, at 4. 
51 Id. 
52 Id. 
53 Id. 
54 Id. at 5. 
55 Marlowe and Rojo, supra note 9, at 132. 
56 Id. 
57 Marlowe, supra note 9, at 4. 
58 Id. at 4–5. 
59 CAL. BUS. & PROF. CODE § 17538.9(12) (West 2006) (a customer is not considered connected 
if the customer receives a busy signal or the call is unanswered); AL. PUB. SERV. COMM’N RULE 
T–18.1(7) (1997) (usage rates can be charged only for connected minutes); 16 TEX. ADMIN. CODE 
§ 26.34(e)(2)  (2000)  (account  may  be  decreased  only  for  completed  calls;  busy  signals  and  unan-
swered calls are not considered completed). 

60 ITA  Phonecard  Disclosure  Guidelines,  The  Int’l  Telecard  Ass’n  Standards  Comm.,  June  5, 

61 Id. 
62 Howard Segermark, Executive Director, International Prepaid Communications Association, 
personal  interview  with  Julia  Marlowe  and  Martina  Rojo,  at  the  offices  of  the  Association,  904 

2000. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

70 

Massachusetts  Avenue,  Washington,  D.C.,  March  29,  2004.  The  International  Prepaid  Commu-
nications Association is the successor organization to the International Telecard Association. 

63 Compare ITA Phonecard Disclosure Guidelines, supra note 60, with the Model Act discussed 
infra in Part XI. For example, the IPCA standards do not include any rules on advertising. They 
do  not  require  a  minimum  period  before  the  card  expires  or  redemption  of  unused  value.  Card 
issuers are not required to replace defective cards. 

64 Marlowe and Rojo, supra note 9, at 131. 
65 Id. 
66 Id. 
67 Gutwillig, supra note 2. 
68 Marlowe, supra note 9, at 3. 
69 15 U.S.C. § 45(a)(1) (2006). 
70 Id. § 45(a). 
71 Id. § 45(a)(1). 
72 Id. 
73 The FTC Act merely declares unfair and deceptive acts to be unlawful. 15 U.S.C.  § 45(a)(1) 
(2006).  It  does  not  establish  any  requirements  for  disclosure  of  essential  information,  levels  of 
performance, customer service or error resolution. 

74 See infra Part X discussing problems not dealt with in any laws. 
75 MICHAEL M. GREENFIELD, CONSUMER LAW: A GUIDE FOR THOSE WHO REPRESENT SELLERS, 

LENDERS, AND CONSUMERS 160, 559 (Little, Brown 1995). 

76 Courts in some states have made it very difficult for consumers to bring actions under these 
laws.  See,  e.g.,  Zeeman  v.  Black,  273  S.E.2d  910,  915  (Ga.  Ct.  App.  1980)  (imposing  a  ‘‘public 
interest’’ requirement that is not included in the statute). 

77 E.g., GA. CODE ANN. § 10–1–399(a) (2006). 
78 Most  courts  require  consumers  to  prove  both  procedural  and  substantive  unconscionability. 
Greenfield, supra note 75, at 529–34. To prove procedural unconscionability the consumer must 
show  the  process  under  which  the  consumer  entered  into  the  contract  was  unconscionable.  To 
prove  substantive  unconscionability,  the  consumer  must  prove  the  terms  in  the  contract  were 
unconscionable. Some courts allow the doctrine to be raised only as a defense, which means con-
sumers can challenge a contract as unconscionable only if the seller has sued them. They cannot 
use  it  affirmatively  as  the  basis  of  their  own  lawsuit  against  the  seller.  Rosboro  Lumber  Co. 
v.  Employee  Benefits  Ins.  Co.,  672  P.2d  1336,  1338  (Or.  Ct.  App.  1983),  rev’d  on  other  grounds, 
680 P.2d 386 (Or. 1984). 

79 See  generally  Official  Comment  U.C.C.  § 1–203  (2005).  The  Comment  provides  that  ‘‘failure 
to perform or enforce, in good faith, a specific duty or obligation under the contract, constitutes 
a  breach  of  that  contract.  . . .  [T]he  doctrine  of  good  faith  merely  directs  a  court  toward  inter-
preting  contracts  within  the  commercial  context  in  which  they  are  created,  performed  and  en-
forced,  and  does  not  create  a  separate  duty  of  fairness  and  reasonableness  which  can  be  inde-
pendently breached.’’ 

80 See  generally  Discover  Bank  v.  Superior  Court,  30  Cal.  Rptr.  3d  76,  113  P.3d  1100,  1109– 
10  (Cal.  2005)  (stating  that  adhesion  contracts  are  unconscionable,  ‘‘at  least  to  the  extent  they 
operate  to  insulate  a  party  from  liability  that  otherwise  would  be  imposed  under  [state]  law’’). 
81 This  is  in  contrast  to  gift  cards.  Far  more  states  have  enacted  laws  regulating  that  type 
of  stored  value  card.  MARK BUDNITZ &  MARGOT SAUNDERS,  CONSUMER BANKING &  PAYMENTS 
LAW CREDIT,  DEBIT &  STORED VALUE CARDS,  CHECKS,  MONEY ORDERS,  E-SIGN,  ELECTRONIC 
BANKING AND BENEFIT PAYMENTS 178–79 (National Consumer Law Center 3rd ed. 2005). 

82 Prepaid  phone  cards  have  been  identified  as  a  key  problem  area  for  Hispanics.  Federal 
Trade  Commission,  Hispanic  Outreach  Forum  &  Law  Enforcement  Workshop:  A  Summary  of 
the  Proceedings,  at  8 
(Oct.  2004),  http://www.ftc.gov/reports/hispanicoutreach/hispanic 
outreach.pdf.  (last  visited  Sept.  11,  2006).  Fraudulent  practices  involving  the  cards  are  ‘‘likely 
to  be  targeted  to  immigrant  populations.’’  Id.  at  9.  ‘‘Hispanics  are  noted  for  their  trusting  na-
ture,  which  means  they  maybe  easier  prey  for  scam  artists.’’  Id.  at.  8.  See  generally  Hoover’s 
In-Depth Company Records, Ace Cash Express, Inc. Aug. 24, 2005 (reporting that Ace Cash Ex-
press, Inc. targets consumers who do not have bank accounts, selling them prepaid phone cards, 
and controversial products such as payday loans). 

83 Hispanic  Outreach  Forum  &  Law  Enforcement  Workshop:  A  Summary  of  the  Proceedings, 
supra  note  82,  at  10.  ‘‘. . .  the  concept  of  the  government  protecting  consumers  may  be  foreign 
to many Hispanics.’’ Id. 

84 Administrative  agencies  in  the  following  states  have  regulations  pertaining  to  prepaid 
phone cards. AL. PUB. SERV. COMM’N RULE T–18.1 (2000); FLA. ADMIN. CODE ANN. r. 25–24.900– 
935  (2006);  MO.  CODE REGS.  ANN.  tit.  4,  § 240–32.160–70  (2006);  16  TEX.  ADMIN.  CODE 
§ 26.34(e)(4) (2000). 

85 815  ILL.  COMP.  STAT.  505/2QQ  (2006);  FLA.  ADMIN.  CODE ANN.  r.  25–24.910  (2006).  Some 
states require providers of the service to file tariffs. FLA. ADMIN. CODE ANN. r. 25–24.915 (2006); 
16 TEX. ADMIN. CODE § 26.34(e)(1) (2000). 

86 Id. 
87 Id. 
88 ‘‘. . . Federal law applies nationally.’’ Salt Lake Tribune Publ’g Co. v. Mgmt. Planning, Inc., 

390 F.3d 684, 688 (10th Cir. 2004). 

89 ‘‘Because  Federal  law  applies  nationally,’’  courts  should  assume  ‘‘that  Congress  desires  na-
tional  uniformity  in  the  application  of  its  laws.’’  Id.  See  Laura  S.  Langley,  Sperm,  Egg,  and  a 
Petri Dish, 27 J. LEG. MED. 167, 206 (2006) (proposing Federal legislation because it would cre-
ate uniformity among the states). 

90 See,  for  example,  the  industry’s  response  to  state  laws  requiring  companies  to  notify  con-
sumers  when  there  is  a  security  breach  resulting  in  the  possible  exposure  of  personal  informa-
tion about consumers. Katie Kuehner-Hebert, Data Privacy Now Issue for States, 170 AM. BANK-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

71 

ER 1,  Mar.  28,  2005  (noting  how  businesses  prefer  a  Federal  statute  over  a  patchwork  of  state 
laws). 

91 Fourteen  percent  of  the  people  in  the  United  States,  totaling  40  million  people,  move  or 
change  their  address  every  year.  Stephanie  Fiereck,  Focus  on  Class  Action,  NEW JERSEY LAW., 
Oct.  31,  2005  (relying  on  data  from  the  U.S.  Census  Bureau’s  Geographical  Mobility  Study 
2002–2003). 

92 E.g., Neogen Corp. v. Neo Gen Screening, Inc., 282 F.3d. 883, 887 (6th Cir. 2002); Gator.com 

Corp. v. L.L. Bean, Inc., 341 F.3d 1072, 1075 (9th Cir. 2003). 

93 Prepaid phone cards are analogous to payment devices such as credit cards, that are defined 
as  devices  for  ‘‘the  purpose  of  obtaining  . . .  property  . . .  or  services.’’  15  U.S.C.  § 1602(k) 
(2006). 

94 The  Federal  Communications  Commission  has  authority  to  regulate  interstate  telephone 
service.  47  U.S.C.  § 201  (2006).  See  AT&T  Corp.  v.  Iowa  Util.  Bd.,  525  U.S.  366,  384  (1999) 
(clarifying the FCC’s rulemaking authority under the Telecommunications Act). 

95 FCC,  Prepaid  Phone  Cards:  What  Consumers  Should  Know,  http://ftp.fcc.gov/cgb/ 

consumerfacts/prepaidcards.html (last visited Sept. 11, 2006). 

96 FTC Telemarketing Sales Rule, 16 C.F.R. § 310 (2006). 
97 FTC  v.  PT–1  Commc’ns,  Inc.,  Civ.  Action  No.  99–1432  (S.D.N.Y.  1999)  (stipulating  final 
judgment  and  order  for  permanent  injunction  and  consumer  redress  against  defendant  PT–1 
Communications, Inc.). 

98 As discussed infra in Part XI, we propose that states be allowed to enact their own legisla-
tion  if  it  is  not  inconsistent  with  the  Federal  law.  State  administrative  involvement  may  be 
needed  if  a  state  wishes  to  require  sellers  to  register  or  follow  the  example  of  some  states  that 
require  sellers  to  obtain  a  certificate  of  authority  or  certificate  of  public  convenience.  E.g.,  AL. 
PUB. SERV. COMM’N Rule T–18.1 (2000); FLA. ADMIN. CODE ANN. r. 25–24.910 (2006); MO. CODE 
REGS. ANN. tit. 4, § 240–32.150(1) (2006); 815 ILL. COMP. STAT. 505/2QQ(b) (2006). 

99 Other Federal consumer protection laws demonstrate how consumers can get the benefit of 
national  coverage  as  well  as  protection  for  special  local  needs.  These  laws  establish  a  national 
floor  of  minimum  requirements.  Rather  than  completely  preempting  state  law,  they  permit 
states  to  enact  laws  that  provide  consumers  with  greater  protection  as  long  as  the  state’s  law 
is not inconsistent with the Federal law. E.g., Truth in Lending Act, 15 U.S.C.  § 1666(j) (2006); 
Electronic  Fund  Transfers  Act,  15  U.S.C.  § 1693(q)  (2006);  Fair  Debt  Collection  Practices  Act, 
15 U.S.C. § 1692(n) (2006). 

100 Christopher B. Woods, Stored Value Cards, 59 CONS. FIN. QTLY. REP. 211, 211 (2005). One 
commentator suggests that the card issuer has special legal duties that arise from the fact that 
the  card  is  prepaid.  ‘‘And  a  fiduciary  responsibility  is  involved  for  those  who  take  money  prior 
to providing service.’’ Howard Segermark, Ensuring Fair Competition Remains Regulatory Chal-
lenge  for  Prepaid,  PHONE PLUS MAG.,  Mar.  2001,  available  at:  http://www.phoneplusmag.com/ 
articles/131soap.html (last visited Sept. 11, 2006). Segermark is Executive Director of the Inter-
national Prepaid Communications Association. 

101 ATMs  can  be  used  to  perform  a  variety  of  services  including  cash  deposits,  cash  with-
drawals,  balance  inquiries,  and  transfers  from  one  account  to  another.  Candace  Heckman,  Get-
ting Money Back After ATM Theft Proving To Bank You’re A Victim Is The Hard Part, SEATTLE 
POST INTELLIGENCER, Aug. 9, 2006 (describing thefts involving ATM balance inquiries and ATM 
withdrawals); Citibank Home Page, http://www.citibank.com (describing ATM features enabling 
customers to withdraw cash and make transfers from one account to another) (last visited Sept. 
27,  2006);  Bank  of  America  Home  Page,  http://www.bankofamerica.com  (describing  ATM  fea-
tures  enabling  customers  to  make  withdrawals,  make  transfers  from  one  account  to  another, 
and make balance inquiries (last visited Sept. 27, 2006). 

102 See e.g., 47 U.S.C. § 251 (2006) (prescribing the duties of telecommunications carriers). 
103 E.g.,  Cont’l  Dredging,  Inc.  v.  De-Kaizered,  Inc.,  120  S.W.3d  380,  394  (Tex.  Ct.  App.  2003). 
104 The applicable law is the Electronic Fund Transfers Act, 15 U.S.C. § 1693 et seq. 
105 71 Fed. Reg. 51437 (2006) (to be codified at 12 C.F.R. pt. 205) (Final Rule, effective July 1, 

2007). 

106 E.g.,  in  Texas,  prepaid  calling  card  services  companies  are  required  to  register  with  the 

Public Service Commission. 16 TEX. ADMIN. CODE § 26.34 (2000). 

107 Compare AL. PUB. SERV. COMM’N RULE. T–18.1 (1997) (requiring only the disclosure of es-
sential information), with CAL. BUS. & PROF. CODE § 17538.9(b)(1) (West 2006) (covering adver-
tising, disclosures, refunds, and customer service). 

108 Id. 
109 Marlowe and Rojo, supra note 9, at 134–35; Marlowe, supra note 9, at 9. 
110 Id. 
111 Marlowe, supra note 9, at 4. 
112 See Federal Trade Commission, http://www.ftc.gov, listing all the FTC’s guides and policy 
statements  on  advertising,  none  related  directly  to  prepaid  phone  card  services.  (last  visited 
Sept. 27, 2006). 

113 Chester  S.  Galloway,  Herbert  Jack  Rotfield  and  Jef  I.  Richards,  Holding  Media 
Responsibile for Deceptive Weight-Loss Advertising, 107 W. VA. L. REV. 353, 383 (2005) (stating 
that  the  FTC  does  not  have  the  resources  to  investigate  many  cases  of  deceptive  advertising). 
The  FTC,  however,  has  brought  at  least  one  action  against  a  phone  card  company.  See  supra 
text at note 97. 

114 Edward  A.  Blair,  Judy  Harris  and  Kent  B.  Monroe,  Effects  of  Shopping  Information  on 
Consumers’  Responses  to  Comparative  Price  Claims,  78  J.  OF RETAILING 76  (2002);  Larry  D. 
Compeau,  Dhruv  Grewal  and  Rajesh  Chandrashedaran,  Comparative  Price  Advertising:  Believe 
it  or  Not,  36  J.  OF CONSUMER AFF.  287–88  (2002);  Valarie  A.  Zeithaml,  Consumer  Perceptions 
of  Price,  Quality,  and  Value:  A  Means-End  Model  and  Synthesis  of  Evidence,  52  J.  OF MAR-
KETING 2–3 (1988). 

115 Blair, Harris and Monroe, supra note 114, at 76. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

72 

116 Truth  in  Lending  imposes  requirements  for  ads  that  mention  specific  credit  terms.  12 

C.F.R. § 226.24 (2006). 

117 CAL. BUS. & PROF. CODE § 17538.9(b)(1) (West 2006). 
118 States  require  disclosures  on  the  card  itself.  See  e.g.,  CAL BUS.  &  PROF.  CODE 
§ 17538.9(b)(2)(A)  (West  2006).  Some  states  require  other  disclosures  on  the  card  or  its  pack-
aging. See e.g., Id. § 17538.9(b)(3). 

119 CAL.  BUS.  &  PROF.  CODE § 17538.9(b)(2)(A)  (West  2006).  California  law  defines  ‘‘company’’ 
as  ‘‘an  entity  providing  prepaid  calling  services  to  the  public  using  its  own  or  a  resold  tele-
communications network.’’ CAL. BUS. & PROF. CODE at § 17538.9(a)(1) (West 2006). Other states 
that  require  the  name  of  the  company  on  the  card  include  the  following:  Alaska,  see  ALASKA 
ADMIN. CODE tit. 3,  § 52.377(d)(1)(A) (2006); Alabama, see AL. PUB. SERV. COMM’N Rule. T–18.1 
(1997); Florida, see FLA. ADMIN. CODE ANN. r. 25–24.920(1)(a) (2006); Illinois, see 815 ILL. COMP. 
STAT. 505/2QQ(d)(1)(A) (2006); Missouri, see MO. CODE REGS. ANN. tit. 4, § 240–32.150(2) (2006); 
New  York,  see  N.Y.  PUB.  SERV.  LAW § 92–f(2)(a)  (McKinney  2006);  Texas,  see  16  TEX.  ADMIN. 
CODE § 26.34(f)(1)(B)(ii)  (2000);  and  Washington,  see  WASH.  ADMIN.  CODE 480–120–264(5)(a)(ii) 
(2006). 

120 CAL.  BUS.  &  PROF.  CODE § 17538.9(b)(2)(B)  (West  2006);  FLA.  ADMIN.  CODE ANN.  r.  25– 
24.920(1)(b)  (2006);  ILL.  COMP.  STAT.  815  505/2  QQ(d)(1)(B)  (2006);  MO.  CODE REGS.  ANN.  tit. 
4, § 240–32.160(2)(B) (2006); N.Y. PUB. SERV. LAW § 92–f(2)(b) (McKinney 2006); 16 TEX. ADMIN. 
CODE § 26.34(f)(1)(A)(i) (2000). 

121 Marlowe and Rojo, supra note 9, at 134–35; Marlowe, supra note 9, at 9. 
122 CAL.  BUS.  &  PROF.  CODE § 17538.9(b)(3)(C)  (West  2006);  FLA.  ADMIN.  CODE ANN.  r.  25– 
24.920(1)(c)  (2006);  815  ILL.  COMP.  STAT.  505/2  QQ(d)(1)(C)  (2006);  MO.  CODE REGS.  ANN.  tit. 
4, § 240–32.160(2)(C) (2006); N.Y. PUB. SERV. LAW § 92–f(2)(c) (McKinney 2006). 

123 CAL.  BUS.  &  PROF.  CODE § 17538.9(b)(2)(D)  (West  2006);  FLA.  ADMIN.  CODE ANN.  r.  25– 
24.920(1)(d); MO. CODE REGS. ANN. tit. 4, § 240–32.160(2)(D) (2006); N.Y. PUB. SERV. LAW § 92– 
f(2)(d) (McKinney 2006). 

124 The  situation  is  analogous  to  the  person  who  issues  a  check  drawn  on  an  account  that 
doesn’t exist or that contains no funds, providing the payee with an action in deceit. See Green-
field, supra note 75, at 12. 

125 CAL.  BUS.  &  PROF.  CODE § 17538.9(b)(3)(I)  (West  2006);  FLA.  ADMIN.  CODE ANN.  r.  25– 
24.920(2)(c) (2006); 815 ILL. COMP. STAT.  § 505/2 QQ (d)(2)(F) (2006); MO. CODE REGS. ANN. tit. 
4, § 240–32.160(1)(C) (2006); N.Y. PUB. SERV. LAW § 92–f(2)(e) (McKinney 2006); 16 TEX. ADMIN. 
CODE § 26.34(f)(1)(B)(iv) (2000); WASH. ADMIN. CODE 480–120–264(5)(a)(v) (2006). 

126 CAL.  BUS.  &  PROF.  CODE § 17538.9(b)(8)  (2006);  FLA.  ADMIN.  CODE ANN.  r.  25–24.920(7) 
(2006);  MO.  CODE REGS.  ANN.  tit.  4,  § 240–32.170(8)  (2006);  N.Y.  PUB.  SERV.  LAW § 92–f(6) 
(McKinney 2006). 

127 WASH. ADMIN. CODE 480–120–264(5)(a)(v) (2006). Texas has the same policy; if the expira-
tion  date  or  policy  is  not  disclosed,  on  the  card,  it  is  considered  active  ‘‘indefinitely.’’  16  TEX. 
ADMIN. CODE § 26.34(f)(1)(B)(iv) (2000). 

128 CAL. BUS. & PROF. CODE § 17538.9(b)(3) (West 2006). 
129 Id. 
130 FLA. ADMIN. CODE ANN. r. 25–24.920(2) (2006). 
131 CAL. BUS. & PROF. CODE § 17538.9(b)(3) (West 2006). 
132 Fees  include  ‘‘monthly  or  other  periodic  fees,  maintenance  fees,  per-call  access  fees,  sur-
charges  for  calls  made  on  pay  telephones,  or  surcharges  for  the  first  minute  or  other  period  of 
use. . . .’’ Id. § 17538.9(b)(3)(A). 

133 Id. § 17538.9(b)(3)(B). 
134 Id. Illinois’ and New York’s requirements on disclosure of fees are similar. 815 ILL. COMP. 

STAT. § 505/2QQ(d)(2) (2005); N.Y. PUB. SERV. LAW § 92–f(3) (McKinney 2006). 

135 12 C.F.R. § 22612 (1994) (regarding credit cards); 12 C.F.R.  § 205.4 (2001) (regarding debit 

cards). 

136 CAL. BUS. & PROF. CODE § 17538.9(b)(13) (West 2006). 
137 Id. 
138 Id. 
139 Id. 
140 16 TEX. ADMIN. CODE § 26.34(g)(1) (2000). 
141 Id. 
142 Id. § 26.34(g)(2) (2000). 
143 CAL. BUS. & PROF. CODE § 17538.9(b)(4) (West 2006). 
144 Id. 
145 Id. 
146 16 TEX. ADMIN. CODE § 26.34(f)(1) (2000). 
147 Id. 
148 See U.C.C. § 4–406 (2002) (requiring customers to report check forgeries and alterations to 
the bank, and if timely reported the non-negligent customer is not liable, but the UCC does not 
require any dispute resolution procedure. If the bank refuses to investigate the customer’s claim 
and  recredit  the  customer’s  account,  the  customer’s  only  recourse  is  to  sue.  The  bank’s  refusal 
to investigate and recredit does not violate the UCC). 

149 12  C.F.R.  § 226.13  (1994)  (regarding  credit  cards);  12  C.F.R.  § 205.11  (2001)  (regarding 

debit cards). 

150 Id. 
151 Budnitz and Saunders, supra note 81, at 178–79. 
152 Id. 
153 Marlowe and Rojo, supra note 9, at 130–31. 
154 CAL.  BUS.  &  PROF.  CODE § 17538.9(b)(6)  (West  2006);  N.Y.  PUB.  SERV.  LAW § 92–f(4) 

(McKinney 2000). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

73 

155 See,  e.g.,  AL.  PUB.  SERV.  COMM’N Rule  T–18.1(5)  (2000)  (requiring  that  customer  service 
be  manned  8  hours  per  day,  5  days  per  week);  FLA.  ADMIN.  CODE ANN.  r.  25–24.920(4)  (2006) 
(requiring live operator 24/7 or electronically recorded and attempt to contact the next business 
day);  MO.  CODE REGS.  ANN.  tit.  4,  § 240–32.140(4)  (2001)  (requiring  availability  24/7);  16  TEX. 
ADMIN.  CODE § 26.34(i)  (2000)  (requiring  live  operator  24/7  or  electronically  recorded  and  at-
tempt to contact the next business day); WASH. ADMIN. CODE 480–120–264(2)(a) (2003) (requir-
ing ability to respond 24/7). 

156 CAL.  BUS.  &  PROF.  CODE § 17538.9(b)(6)(B)  (West  2006);  N.Y.  PUB.  SERV.  LAW § 92–f(4) 

157 N.Y. PUB. SERV. LAW § 92–f(4) (McKinney 2006). New York also requires that the operator 
be  able  to  provide  information  about  the  ‘‘terms  and  conditions  of  service  and  monthly  service 
charges.’’ Id. § 92–f (4)(iv). 

158 FLA.  ADMIN.  CODE ANN.  r.  25–24.920(9)  (2006);  CAL.  BUS.  &  PROF.  CODE § 17538.9(b)(7) 

(West 2006); N.Y. PUB. SERV. LAW § 92–f(5) (McKinney 2006). 

159 FLA. ADMIN. CODE ANN. r. 25–24.920(9) (2006). 
160 CAL.  BUS.  &  PROF.  CODE § 17538.9(b)(7)  (West  2006);  N.Y.  PUB.  SERV.  LAW § 92–f(5) 

(McKinney 2006). 

(McKinney 2006). 

161 Id. 
162 Id. 
163 FLA. ADMIN. CODE ANN. r. 25–24.925(1)(a) (2006). 
164 MO. CODE REGS. ANN. tit. 4, § 240–32–170(5)(B) (2006). 
165 Id. § 240–32–170(6)(A). 
166 AL. PUB. SERV. COMM’N Rule T–18.1(4) (1998). 
167 16 TEX. ADMIN. CODE § 26.34(j) (2000). 
168 FLA. ADMIN. CODE ANN. r. 25–24.925(1)(a). 
169 Id.;  see  also  MO.  CODE REGS.  ANN.  tit.  4,  § 240–32.170(6)  (2006)  (requiring  a  company  to 
refund  the  unused  value  remaining  on  the  card  if  the  ‘‘company  is  no  longer  able  to  provide 
service.’’) 

170 FLA.  ADMIN.  CODE ANN.  r.  25–24.925(1)(a)  (2006).  The  company  can  choose  whether  to 
make  the  refund  in  cash  or  by  means  of  a  replacement  service.  It  must  be  provided  within  60 
days of when the consumer notifies the company. Id. r. 25–24.925(1)(b). 

171 ALASKA ADMIN. CODE tit. 3, § 52.377(e) (2006). 
172 Id. 
173 FLA. ADMIN. CODE ANN. r. 25–24.925(2) (2006). Compare the rules for lost and stolen credit 
cards. Under Federal law, a consumer has a maximum liability of $50. The liability will be less 
if  the  consumer  notifies  the  card  issuer  before  the  thief  charges  less  than  $50  prior  to  the  con-
sumer providing the notification. 12 C.F.R. § 226.12(b) (2006). 

174 CAL.  BUS.  &  PROF.  CODE § 17538.9(b)(7)  (West  2006);  FLA.  ADMIN.  CODE ANN.  r.  25– 
24.925(1)(a) (2006); MO. CODE REGS. ANN. tit. 4, § 240–32.170(6)(A) (2006); N.Y. PUB. SERV. LAW 
§ 92–f(5) (McKinney 2006). 

175 Id. 
176 Credit card law provides a limited remedy if there is a failure in the goods or services pur-
chased.  Consumers  can  dispute  the  charges  and  refuse  to  pay  for  those  goods  or  services.  12 
C.F.R.  § 226.12(c)  (2006).  The  card  issuer  will  charge  the  amount  back  to  the  merchant  and 
leave  the  consumer  and  merchant  to  resolve  the  dispute  on  their  own.  Budnitz  &  Saunders, 
supra note 81, at 152. Debit card law does not provide any remedy. Id. at 82. 

177 In regard to the sale of goods, the Uniform Commercial Code includes rules on express and 
implied warranties, but a merchant can avoid these by disclaiming them in the contract between 
the  parties.  U.C.C.  § 2–316  (2003).  The  Federal  Magnuson-Moss  Warranty  Act  provides  limited 
protection. 15 U.S.C. §§ 2301–2312 (2006). The warranty laws regarding the provision of services 
are even more problematic. See infra at Part IX. 

178 CAL. BUS. & PROF. CODE § 17538.9(b)(10) (West 2006). 
179 Id. § 17538.9(b)(7). 
180 Many  laws  require  parties  to  act  in  a  commercially  reasonable  manner.  See,  e.g.,  U.C.C. 

§§ 3–103(a)(6)–(9) (2002), 9–607(c), 9–608(a)(3), 9–610 (2000). 

181 FLA. ADMIN. CODE ANN. r. 25–24.930 (repealed 2005). 
182 CAL.  BUS.  &  PROF.  CODE § 17538.9(b)(8)  (West  2006);  N.Y.  PUB.  SERV.  LAW § 92–f(6) 

(McKinney 2006). 

183 N.Y. PUB. SERV. LAW § 92–f(6) (McKinney 2006). 
184 Id. 
185 See  generally  Borowski  v.  Firstar  Bank  Milwaukee,  579  N.W.2d  247  (Wis.  Ct.  App.  1998) 
(upholding a bank’s contract requiring a customer to notify the bank of any unauthorized signa-
ture or alteration of a check within 14 days as reasonable, and rejecting the dissent’s view that 
such a short time period was contrary to customers’ reasonable expectations and conduct). 

186 Greenfield, supra note 75, at 160 (describing how legislation prohibiting deceptive practices 
has  been  enacted  in  every  state).  See  also,  id.  at  559  (most  states  have  prohibited  unfair  prac-
tices). 

187 See,  e.g.,  Taylor  v.  Jacques,  292  B.R.  434,  434  (Bankr.  N.D.  Ga.  2002)(holding  that  con-
sumer cannot sue under Georgia’s Fair Business Practices Act if the industry is regulated, even 
if the regulations do not address the problem the consumer alleges violates the Act). Consumers 
also face formidable barriers to obtaining judicial relief if a company stops doing business. Alter-
natively  the  company  may  stop  doing  business  in  one  state,  then  resume  business  in  another 
state under a different name. See generally, Pickel, supra note 7 (reporting that companies lose 
consumer  loyalty  with  their  unfair  and  deceptive  practices,  but  then  market  the  cards  with  a 
new brand name, cheating consumers who do not realize it is the same company). 

188 16 TEX. ADMIN. CODE § 26.34(m) (2000) (explaining that the commission can order the com-
pany  to  take  corrective  action,  impose  administrative  penalties,  and  coordinate  with  the  Office 
of the Attorney General). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

74 

189 Once  a  seller  makes  an  express  warranty,  it  cannot  disclaim  that  warranty.  U.C.C.  § 2– 
316(1)  (2003).  However,  the  seller  is  not  required  to  make  any  express  warranties.  Certain  im-
plied  warranties  arise  by  operation  of  law,  U.C.C.  § 2–314  &  2–315  (2003),  but  the  seller  can 
easily disclaim these. U.C.C. § 2–316(2) & (3) (2003). 

190 15 U.S.C. § 2308(a) (2006). 
191 16 C.F.R. § 700.1(h) (2006). Even if the Act did apply, the Act prohibits only the disclaimer 
of  implied  warranties  that  are  created  by  state  law;  the  Act  itself  does  not  create  any  implied 
warranties. 

192 ‘‘. . . [A] duty is implied in every service, repair or construction contract to perform it skill-
fully, carefully, diligently, and in a workmanlike manner.’’ Alco Standard Corp. v. Westinghouse 
Elec. Corp., 206 Ga. App. 794, 796, 426 S.E.2d 648, 650 (Ga. Ct. App. 1992). 

193 Id. 
194 No  cases  were  found  addressing  this  issue,  but  since  the  UCC  permits  disclaimers  of  im-
plied warranties for the sale of goods, presumably courts also would allow it for the sale of serv-
ices.  See  generally  Richard  M.  Alderman,  Warranty  Disclaimers  and  the  Texas  Deceptive  Prac-
tices  Act,  29  HOUS.  LAW.  14,  15  (Jan./Feb.  1992)  (discussing  express  warranty  disclaimers  in 
service contracts). 

195 See Budnitz and Saunders, supra note 81, at 177–178. 
196 Id. 
197 Id. 
198 Id. 
199 See FLA. ADMIN. CODE ANN. r. 25–24.925(2) (providing that a company ‘‘may, but shall not 
be required to, provide a refund’’ for lost or stolen phone cards). Compare credit card and debit 
card  law  that  imposes  specific  caps  that  limit  the  consumer’s  liability  if  a  thief  makes  charges 
on  a  lost  or  stolen  card.  15  U.S.C.  § 1643(a)  (2006)  (credit  cards);  Id.  § 1693(g)  (debit  cards  and 
other electronic fund transfers). 

200 See  Cheryl  Johnson,  Faux  Williams  makes  rounds;  Star  impersonator  leaves  trail  of  angry 
victims,  STAR TRIB.,  Dec.  26,  2004  (reporting  consumer’s  allegations  of  unauthorized  use  of 
phone card after he lost the piece of paper on which he had written his PIN). 

201 Id. 
202 The  card  issuer  may  be  required  to  transfer  those  funds  to  the  state  under  abandoned 
property  or  escheat  laws.  Christopher  B.  Woods,  Stored  Value  Cards,  59  CONSUMER FIN.  L.  Q. 
REP.  211,  219  (2005);  Anita  Ramasastry,  State  Escheat  Statutes  and  Possible  Treatment  of 
Stored  Value,  Electronic  Currency,  and  Other  New  Payment  Mechanisms,  57  BUS.  LAW.  475, 
480–81 (2001) (stating that North Carolina and Arizona exclude prepaid phone cards from their 
escheat  laws).  Even  where  those  laws  apply  to  prepaid  phone  balances,  the  seller  has  the  use 
of those funds until they are paid to the state. 

203 Marlowe & Rojo, supra note 9, at 130. 
204 Luna,  supra  note  18  (highlighting  an  instance  where  a  consumer  reported  that  her  card 
was  cutoff  immediately  after  making  her  first  call,  and  the  card  did  not  work  thereafter).  The 
New  York  Attorney  General  persuaded  eighteen  retailers  to  agree  to  deactivate  and  reissue 
damaged  gift  cards.  Big  Retailers  Agree  to  Replace  Gift  Cards,  DETROIT FREE PRESS,  Mar.  3, 
2003. 

205 See  http://www.ftc.gov/bcp/conline/pubs/products/buytime.htm;  http://www.fcc.gov/ 
cgb/consumerfacts/prepaidcards.html;  see  also  Mark  E.  Budnitz,  Stored  Value  Cards  and  the 
Consumer: The Need for Regulation, 46 AM. U. L. REV. 1027, 1035, n. 54 (1997) (reporting that 
issuers of prepaid phone cards have gone out of business after selling tens of thousands of cards 
which thereafter became worthless). 

206 See  Getting  the  Best  Value  from  Prepaid  Phone  Cards,  Consumer  Action  (April  1,  2001), 

available at http://www.consumeraction.org (last visited Oct. 5, 2006). 

207 Id. 
208 Budnitz  and  Saunders,  supra  note  81,  at  172–173.  See  infra  text  accompanying  note  200. 
209 See,  e.g.,  the  Electronic  Fund  Transfers  Act,  15  U.S.C.  § 1693(m)  (2006)  (providing  actual 

damages, statutory damages, costs, and reasonable attorney’s fees). 

210See infra Part VI. 
211 As  discussed  above,  the  FRB  and  FCC  might  be  appropriate  agencies  as  well.  See  supra 
text  accompanying  notes  89–94.  The  FTC,  however,  seems  best  suited.  The  FRB  deals  with  fi-
nancial  institutions,  and  sellers  of  phone  cards  are  not  financial  institutions.  The  FCC’s  focus 
is on the telecommunications industry, not on payment devices such as phone cards, or the types 
of problems consumers face when they use phone cards. 

212 As  provided  in  other  statutes,  using  the  agency-approved  form  would  be  deemed  compli-
ance with the disclosure requirements. Electronic Fund Transfers Act, 15 U.S.C. § 1693(m)(d)(2) 
(2006). 

213 See  Electronic  Fund  Transfers  Act,  15  U.S.C.  § 1693(q)  (2006)  The  Act  does  not  annul, 
alter, or affect state law except to the extent it is inconsistent with the Act. Furthermore, a state 
law  is  not  inconsistent  if  it  affords  consumers  greater  protection  than  is  provided  in  the  Act. 
214 See  supra  text  accompanying  note  108.  See  also  FTC  v.  Pt–1  Commc’ns,  Civ.  Action  #  99– 
1432  (S.D.N.Y.  1999)  (stipulated  final  judgment  and  order  for  permanent  injunction  and  con-
sumer redress; permanent injunction in connection with phone card company’s advertising). See 
also  Hispanic  Outreach  Forum  &  Law  Enforcement  Workshop:  A  Summary  of  the  Proceedings, 
supra  note  82,  at  9  (discussing  how  phone  cards  and  other  various  types  of  media,  excluding 
direct mail, are sources of deceptive claims targeted at Hispanics). 

215 CAL. BUS. & PROF. CODE § 17538.9(b)(1) (West 2006). 
216 See  Federal  Trade  Commission,  Facts  for  Business:  DotCom  Disclosures,  available  at 

http://www.ftc.gov/bcp/conline/pubs/buspubs/dotcom (last visited May 31, 2006). 

217 See e.g., Boomer v. AT&T Corp., 309 F.3d 404 (7th. Cir. 2002) (holding that the consumer 
accepted  a  contract  when  using  the  service  after  he  received  agreement).  See  generally  Ronald 
J.  Mann,  Panel  One:  Boilerplate  In  Consumer  Contract:  ‘‘Contracting’’  For  Credit,  104  MICH.  L. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

75 

264(5)(a)(v). 

REV.  899,  910  (2006)  (discussing  the  credit  card  issuer’s  use  of  contract  terms  providing  that 
notice  and  continued  use  bind  consumers  when  issuers  unilaterally  change  contract  terms).  As 
Howard  Segermark,  the  Executive  Director  of  the  International  Prepaid  Communications  Asso-
ciation,  has  commented  regarding  the  special  nature  of  phone  card  contracts,  ‘‘handing  over  a 
package—a  phone  card  or  prepaid  cellular—does  not  provide  an  opportunity  for  a  formal  con-
tract.’’ Segermark, supra note 100. 

218 16  TEX.  ADMIN.  CODE § 26.34(f)(1)(B)(iv)  (2006);  WASH.  ADMIN.  CODE § 480–120– 

219 CAL. BUS. & PROF. CODE § 17538.9(b)(3) (West 2006). 
220 Examples of fees include ‘‘monthly or other periodic fees, maintenance fees, per-call access 
fees,  surcharges  for  calls  made  on  pay  telephones,  or  surcharges  for  the  first  minute  or  other 
period of use[.]’’ Id. § 17538.9(b)(3)(A). 

221 Id.; Illinois’ and New York’s requirements on disclosure of fees are similar. 815 ILL. COMP. 

STAT. 505/2QQ(d)(2) (2006); N.Y. PUB. SERV. LAW § 92–f(3) (McKinney 2006). 

222 16 TEX. ADMIN. CODE § 26.34(g)(1) (2006). 
223 Id. § 26.34(g)(2). 
224 See Budnitz and Saunders, supra note 81 at 172–73. 
225 Notification  should  not  create  technical  problems.  Texas  requires  sellers  to  inform  con-
sumers  verbally  when  their  balances  are  nearly  exhausted.  16  TEX.  ADMIN.  CODE § 26.34(g)(2) 
(2006). 

226 See supra text accompanying notes 184–186 discussing the requirements for lost and stolen 

cards that the Federal statute should impose. 

227 See supra text accompanying notes 46–56. 
228 Marlowe, supra note 9, at 4. 
229 Id. at 4–5. 
230 CAL. BUS. & PROF. CODE § 17538.9(b)(4) (West 2006). 
231 Id. 
232 Alan  M.  White  and  Cathy  Lesser  Mansfield,  Literacy  and  Contract,  13  STAN.  L.  &  POL’Y 
REV.  233,  264–65  (2002).  ‘‘. . .  disclosure  statements  . . .  may  not  be  able  to  aid  most  con-
sumers in understanding the terms of their agreement.’’ Id. at 261. 

233 California and New York require live operators twenty-four hours a day and 7 days a week. 
CAL. BUS. & PROF. CODE § 17538.9(b)(6)(A) (West 2006); N.Y. PUB. SERV. LAW § 92–f(4) (McKin-
ney 2006). 

234 See  FLA.  ADMIN.  CODE ANN.  r.  § 25–24.920(4)  (2006);  MO.  CODE REGS.  ANN.  tit.  4,  § 240– 
32.160(5)  (2006),  16  TEX.  ADMIN.  CODE § 26.34(i)  (2000).  Alabama  requires  that  the  number  be 
manned 8 hours per day, 5 days per week. AL PUB. SERV. COMM’N Rule 18.1(5) (1997). 

235 Consumers  in  New  York  and  California  can  file  complaints  with  customer  service.  CAL. 
BUS.  &  PROF.  CODE § 17538.9(b)(6)(C)  (West  2006);  N.Y.  PUB.  SERV.  LAW § 92–f(4)  (McKinney 
2006). 

236 This  scheme  is  similar  to  that  in  the  Electronic  Fund  Transfers  Act,  15  U.S.C.  § 1693(f) 

237 N.Y. PUB. SERV. LAW § 92–f (4) (McKinney 2006). New York also requires that the operator 
be  able  to  provide  information  about  the  ‘‘terms  and  conditions  of  service  and  monthly  service 
charges.’’ Id. § 92–f (4)(iv). 

238 FLA. ADMIN. CODE ANN. r. § 25–24.920(3)(c) (2006). 
239 CAL.  BUS.  &  PROF CODE § 17538.9(b)(1)  (2006);  N.Y.  PUB.  SERV.  LAW § 92–f  (McKinney 

(2006). 

2006). 

2006). 

240 CAL.  BUS.  &  PROF CODE § 17538.9(b)(7)  (2006);  N.Y.  PUB.  SERV.  LAW § 92–f  (McKinney 

241 Id.  The  Federal  statute  should  allow  the  FTC  to  describe  technical  standards  because  the 
description  requires  a  high  level  of  technical  expertise  and  specificity.  Moreover,  the  standards 
may need to be adjusted as technology advances over time. 

242 AL. PUB. SERV. COMM’N Rule T–18.1(4)(1997). 
243 FLA.  ADMIN.  CODE ANN.  r.  § 25–24.925(1)(a)  (2006).  See  also  MO.  CODE REGS.  ANN.  tit.  4, 
§ 240–32.170(6)  (2006)  (providing  that  a  company  must  refund  the  unused  value  remaining  on 
cards when the ‘‘company is no longer able to provide service’’). 

244 ALASKA ADMIN. CODE tit. 3, § 52.3771(e) (2006). 
245 FLA.  ADMIN.  CODE ANN.  r.  § 25–24.925(2)  (2006)  (permitting,  but  not  requiring,  a  refund 

246 CAL.  BUS &  PROF.  CODE § 17538.9(b)(7)  (West  2006);  N.Y.  PUB.  SERV.  LAW § 92–f  (McKin-

for lost or stolen cards). 

ney 2006). 

failure 

247 Commercial  reasonableness, 

faith,  and 
unconscionability are all standards included in the Uniform Commercial Code. Consequently, in-
cluding  them  in  the  proposed  statute  is  not  a  novel  approach.  See  U.C.C.  §§ 3–103(a)(6)  &  (9) 
(2002); U.C.C. § 2–302 (2003); U.C.C. § 9–610(b) (2000). 

to  exercise  ordinary  care,  good 

248 CAL. BUS. & PROF. CODE § 17538.9 (b)(7) (West 2006). 
249 FLA. ADMIN. CODE ANN. r. § 25–24.930 (repealed 2005). 
250 U.C.C. § 2–314 (2003). 
251 Id.  § 2–316  (2003)  (allowing  sellers  to  disclaim  implied  warranties).  See,  e.g.,  MD.  CODE 
ANN.,  COM.  LAW § 2–316.1  (West  2006)  (illustrating  that  some  states  prohibit  sellers  from  dis-
claiming implied warranties in consumer transactions). 
252 See Budnitz and Saunders, supra note 81, at 7.7.1. 
253 David  Wood,  Tips  on  Using  Prepaid  Phone  Cards,  MILITARY MONEY MAG.,  available  at 

http://www.militarymoney.com/lifestyle/1065704890 (last visited Oct. 5, 2006). 

254 Examples  of  defects  include  access  numbers  or  PINs  that  do  not  work  and  other  defects 
making  it  impossible  for  the  card  to  operate  as  it  should.  A  lost  PIN  may  never  be  found.  In 
that  situation  the  consumer  has  paid  money  for  the  card  and  the  seller  never  has  to  provide 
any  more  value.  The  card  issuer  may  be  required  to  transfer  those  funds  to  the  state  under 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

76 

abandoned  property  or  escheat  laws.  Even  where  those  laws  apply  to  prepaid  phone  balances, 
the  seller  has  the  use  of  those  funds  until  they  are  paid  to  the  state.  See  Luna,  supra  note  18; 
Big Retailers Agree to Replace Gift Cards, supra, note 204. 

255 The  statute  should  delegate  to  the  FTC  the  authority  to  study  the  actual  costs  to  sellers 
of replacing cards in order to establish more specific guidelines for what would constitute a rea-
sonable fee. 

256 E.g., Electronic Fund Transfers Act, 15 U.S.C. § 1693 (2006). 
257 A  comprehensive  critique  of  mandatory  predispute  arbitration  in  phone  card  contracts  is 
beyond  the  scope  of  this  article.  See  Symposium,  Mandatory  Arbitration,  67  LAW &  CONTEMP. 
PROBS.  1  (2004)  (showing  that  mandatory  arbitration  agreements  are  a  substantial  barrier  to 
consumers’ ability to obtain meaningful relief). 

258 16  TEX.  ADMIN.  CODE § 26.34(e)(4)  (2000)  (requiring  that  prepaid  calling  card  service  com-

panies register with the Public Service Commission). 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:23 Mar 26, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00080 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\80091.TXT JACKIE

